A 2
CHAPTER I.
A long Voyage!
Much
has been sung and written of the charms
of the glorious Hudsonits smiling villages, its noble
cities, its magnificent banks, and its majestic waters.
The inimitable Knickerbocker, the graphic Cooper,
and a thousand less celebrated writers and tourists
have delighted to luxuriate in descriptions of its rich
fields, its flowery meadows, whispering groves, and
cloud-capped mountains, until its name is become
synonymous with all the beautiful and sublime of
nature. Associated as are these beauties with our
earliest recollections, and nearest, dearest friends
entwined as they inseparably are with memorials
of the past, anticipations of the future, we too would
offer our humble tribute. But the theme has been
exhausted by hands that snatched the pencil from
nature herself, and nothing is left for us but to repress
the feelings of our swelling hearts by silent musings.
Catalina, accompanied by her father, embarked on
board of the good sloop Watervliet, whereof was
commander Captain Baltus Van Slingerland, a most
experienced, deliberative, and circumspective skipper.
This vessel was noted for making quick passages,
wherein she excelled the much-vaunted Liverpool
packets; seldom being more than three weeks in going
from Albany to New-York, unless when she chanced
to run on the flats, for which, like her worthy owners,
she seemed to have an instinctive preference.
Captain
Baltus was a navigator of great sagacity,
and courage, having been the first man that ever
undertook the dangerous voyage between the two
cities without asking the prayers of the church and
making his will. Moreover, he was so cautious in
all his proceedings that he took nothing for granted,
and would never be convinced that his vessel was
near a shoal or a sandbank until she was high and
dry aground. When properly certified by ocular
demonstration, he became perfectly satisfied, and sat
himself to smoking his pipe till it pleased the waters
to rise and float him off again. His patience under
an accident of this kind was exemplary; his pipe
was his consolationmore effectual than all the
precepts
of philosophy.
It was a fine autumnal morning, calm, still, clear,
and beautiful. The forests, as they nodded or slept
quietly on the borders of the pure river, reflected
upon its bosom a varied carpet, adorned with all the
colours of the rainbow. The bright yellow poplar,
the still brighter scarlet maple, the dark-brown oak,
and the yet more sombre evergreen pine and
hemlock
,
together with a thousand various trees and
shrubs, of a thousand varied tints and shades, all
mingled together in one rich, inexpressibly rich
garment
,
with which nature seemed desirous of hiding
her faded beauties and approaching decay. The
vessel glided slowly with the current, now and then
assisted by a little breeze that for a moment rippled the
surface and filled the sails, and then died away again.
In this manner they approached the Overslaugh,
a place infamous in all past time for its narrow
crooked channel, and the sandbanks with which it is
infested. The vigilant Van Slingerland, to be
prepared
for all contingencies, replenished his pipe and
inserted it in the button-holes of his Dutch pea-jacket,
to be ready on an emergency.
Boss, said the ebony Palinarus, who presided
over the destinies of the good sloop Watervliet
boss, don't you tink I'd better put about; I tink
we're close to the Overslaugh now.
Captain Baltus very leisurely walked to the bow
of the vessel, and after looking about a little, replied,
A leetle furder, a leetle furder, Brom; no occasion
to be in such a hurry before you are sure of a ting.
Brom kept on his course grumbling a little in an
under-tone, until the sloop came to a sudden stop.
The captain then bestirred himself to let go the
anchor.
No fear, boss, she won't run away.
Very well, quoth Captain Baltus, I'm satisfied
now, perfectly satisfied. We are certainly on de
Overslaugh.
As clear as mud, answered Brom. The
captain
then proceeded to light his pipe, and Brom
followed
his example. Every quarter of an hour a
sloop would glide past in perfect safety, warned of
the precise situation of the bar by the position of
the Watervliet, and adding to the vexation of our
travellers
at being thus left behind. But Captain Baltus
smoked away, now and then ejaculating, Ay, ay,
the more hashte de lesch shpeed; we shall see
py-and-py
.
As the tide ebbed away, the vessel, which had
grounded on the extremity of the sandbank,
gradually
heeled on one side, until it was difficult to
keep the deck, and Colonel Vancour suggested the
propriety of going on shore until she righted again.
Why, where's de use den, replied Captain
Baltus, of taking all dis trouble, boss? We shall
be off in two or tree days at most. It will be
full-moon
,
day after to-morrow.
Two or three days! exclaimed the colonel.
If I thought so, I would go home and wait for you.
Why, where's de use den of taking so much
trouble, colonel? You'd only have to come pack
again.
But why don't you lighten your vessel, or carry
out an anchor? She seems just on the edge of
the bank, almost ready to slide into the deep
water.
Why, where's de use of taking so much
trouble den? She'll get off herself one of dese
days, colonel. You are well off here; notting to
do, and de young woman dere can knit you a pair
of stockings to pass de time.
But she can't knit stockings, said the colonel,
smiling.
Not knit stockings! By main soul den what is
she good for? Den she must smoke a pipe; dat is
the next best way of passing de time.
But she don't smoke either, captain.
Not smoke, nor knit stockings! Christus,
where was she brought up den? I wouldn't have
her for my wife if she had a whole sloop for her
fortune. I don't know what she can do to pass de
time till next full-moon, but go to sleep; dat is de
next best ting to knitting and smoking.
Catalina was highly amused at Captain Baltus's
enumeration of the sum-total of her resources for
passing the time. Fortunately, however, the next
rising of the tide floated them off, and the vessel
proceeded gallantly on her way, with a fine
northwest
breeze, which carried her on almost with the
speed of a steamboat. In the course of a few
miles they overtook and passed several sloops, that
had left the Watervliet aground on the Overslaugh.
You see, colonel, said Captain Baltus,
complacently
,you
seewhere's de use of being in a
hurry den? Dey have been at anchor, and we have
been on a sandbank. What's de difference den,
colonel?
But it is easier to get up an anchor, captain,
than to get off a sandbank.
Well, suppose it is; if a man is not in a hurry,
what den? replied honest Captain Baltus.
At the period of which we are writing, a large
portion of the banks of the river, now gemmed with
white villages and delightful retreats, was still in a
state of nature. The little settlements were few
and far between, and some scattered Indians yet
lingered in those abodes which were soon to pass
away from them and their posterity for ever. The
river alone was in the entire occupation of the white
man; the shores were still, in many places, inhabited
by little remnants of the Indian tribes. But they
were not the savages of the free wild woods; they
had in some degree lost their habits of war and
hunting, and seldom committed hostilities upon the
whites, from an instinctive perception that they were
now at their mercy.
Still, though the banks of the river were for the
most part wild, they were not the less grand an
beautiful; and Catalina, as she sat on the deck in
the evening, when the landscape, tinselled with
twilight
,
presented one long perspective of lonely
grandeur
and majestic repose, could not resist its holy
influence. On the evening of the sixth day the
vessel was becalmed in the centre of the Highlands,
just opposite where West Point now rears its gray
stone seminaries, consecrated to science, to
patriotism
,
and glory. It was then a solitary rock, where
the eagle made his abode, and from which a lonely
Indian sometimes looked down on the vessels gliding
past far below, and cursed them as the usurpers of
his ancient domain.
The tide ran neither up nor down the river, and
there was not a breath of air stirring. The dusky
pilot proposed to Captain Baltus to let go the
anchor
,
but the captain saw no use in being in such
a hurry. So the vessel lay still, as a sleeping
haleyon upon the unmoving mirror of the waters.
Baltus drew forth his trusty pipe, and the negro
pilot selected a soft plank on the forecastle, on
which he, in a few minutes, found that blessed
repose
which is the golden prize of labour, and a
thousand times outweighs the suicide luxuries of
the lazy, sleepless glutton, whose repose is the
struggle, not the relaxation of nature; the conflict
of life and death. If he sleeps, it is in a chaos of
half-real, half-imaginary horrors, from whence he
awakes to a miserable languor, only to be relieved
for a little while by stuffing and stimulating the
man-beast
,
and preparing him for another nightly struggle
with his dinner and his bottle.
As the golden sun sunk behind the high
mountains
of the west, that other lesser glory of the
heavens
rose in full, round, silver radiance from out the
fleecy foliage of the forest which crowned them on
the east bank of the river. The vessel seemed
embosomed in a little world of its own, with nothing
visible but the sparkling basin of water, the waving
mountains, one side all gloom, the other shining
bright, and the blue heavens sparkling with ten
thousand ever-during glories over head. Catalina
wrapped herself in her cloak, and sat on the
quarter-deck
alone and abstracted, conscious of the scene
and its enchantments only as they awakened those
mysterious associations of thought and of
feeling
that establish the indissoluble union between
the Creator and his works, the soul of man and the
universal soul, which is nothing else but
Omnipotence
itself. Imagination, and memory, and hope
mingled in her bosom, alternately the sphere of
heavenly aspirations and gentle worldly wishes,
such as pure virgins who have given away their
hearts may entertain without soiling the white
ermine of their innocent affections. Gradually her
thoughts concentrated themselves upon Sybrandt
Westbrook; she recalled to mind those past
incidents
of her life which seemed intended by
heaven
to entwine their hearts in one indissoluble being,
and gradually worked herself up to the conviction,
that they neither would nor could be separated. A
flood of tenderness, hallowed by this infusion of a
holy and mysterious sanction, rushed into her soul;
she wished he were present at this apotheosis of
all that was beautiful in nature, all that was tender
in a woman's heart, that she might recline in his
circling arms, lay her head on his bosom, pour out
her overflowing floods of tenderness in his ear, and
exchange her love for his, in one long kiss of
melting
rapture.
At this moment a wild shrill shriek or howl broke
from the shore, echoed among the silent recesses of
the mountains, and roused Catalina from her
delicious
revery. In about a minute it was repeated
and a third time, after a similar interval.
Dat is de old woman, said Captain Baltus, who
was sitting on the hatchway, smoking his pipe,
something
between sleeping and waking.
What old woman? asked Catalina.
Why, de old Indian woman, what keeps about
de rock just ashorederedon't you see it close
under dat pine-tree dere?
What Indian woman? and what does she do
there shrieking? said the young lady.
What! did you never hear dat story? and
don't you know it's no old woman after allbut a
ghost?
A ghost!
Ayyesa spook. I saw it one night when
I got ashore on de flats just above de rock; and
you may depend I was in a great hurry den for once
in my life, I can tell you. It looked like de very
old Duyvel, standing on de rock, and whetting a great
jack-knife, as dey say.
Who say? asked Catalina.
Why, my fader and grandfaderwho are both
dead, for dat matter; but dey told me de story
before
dey died. We shall have sixteen rainy
Sundays
,
one after de oder, and den it will clear up wid
a great snowstorm.
Yes?
Yes; as sure as you sit dere. It always
happens
after dat old woman shows herself, and screams
so, like de very Duyvel.
Do you know the story? asked Colonel
Vancour
,
whose attention had been arrested by the
conversation
.
Know it! why, to be sure I do, colonel. I have
heard it a hundred times from my fader and
grandfader
.
He was de first man dat sailed in a sloop all
de way from Albany to New-York.
We can't have higher authority. Come,
captain
I
see your pipe is just filledtell us the story,
and then I will go to sleep.
The worthy skipper said he was no great hand
at telling a story; but he would try, if they would
promise not to hurry him; and accordingly began:
Once dere was an old womanduyvel! dere
she is again! exclaimed Baltus, as a long quaver
echoed from the shore.
Wellwellnever mind her; go on.
Once dere was an old woman Here
another
quaver, apparently from the mast-head, stopped
Baltus again, and made Catalina start.
Duyvel! cried Baltus; but if I don't pelieve
she is coming apoard of us!
Wellnever mind, said the colonel again; she
wants to hear whether you do her full justice, I
suppose
.
Go on, captain.
Once dere was an old woman, he began, almost
in a whisper; when he was again interrupted by the
black pilot, who came aft with a light, and asked
Baltus whether it would not be better to haul down
the sails, as he saw some appearance of wind towards
the north-east, where the clouds had now obscured
the moon entirely. Don't be in such a hurry,
Brom, quoth the skipper; time enough when de
wind comes.
Once dere was an old woman At that
moment
Brom's light was suddenly extinguished, and
Baltus received a blow in the face that laid him
sprawling on the quarter-deck, at the same instant
that a tremendous scream broke forth from some
invisible being that seemed close at their ears.
Baltus
roared manfully, and Catalina was not a little
frightened at these incomprehensible manuvres of
the old woman. The colonel, however, insisted
he should go onbidding him get up and tell his
story.
Once dere was an old woman But the
legend of honest Baltus, like Corporal Trim's story
of a certain king of Bohemia, seemed destined
never to get beyond the first sentence. He was
again interrupted by a strange mysterious scratching
and fluttering, accompanied by a mighty cackling
and confusion, in the chicken-coop, which the
provident
captain had stored with poultry for the benefit
of the colonel and his daughter.
Duyvel! what's dat? cried Captain Baltus, in
great consternation.
O, it's only the old woman robbing your
hen-roost
,
replied the colonel.
Den I must look to it, said Baltus, and
mustering
the courage of desperation, went to see what
was the matter. In a few moments he returned,
bringing with him a large owl, which had, from some
freak or other, or perhaps attracted by the charms
of Baltus's poultry, first lighted on the mast, and then,
either seduced or confused by Brom's light, darted
from thence into the capacious platter-face of the
worthy skipper, as before stated.
Here is de duyvel! exclaimed Baltus.
And the old woman, said the colonel, laughing,
But come, captain, the more I see the more anxious
I am to hear the rest of the story.
Once dere was an old woman a hollow
murmur
among the mountains again suddenly interrupted
him. There is the old woman again, said the
colonel. 'Tis de old duyvel! said Baltus, starting
up and calling all hands to let go the halyards. But
before this could be accomplished, one of those
sudden
squalls, so common in the highlands in autumn,
struck the vessel and threw her almost on her beam
ends. The violence of the motion carried
Colonel
Vancour and Catalina with it, and had they not
been arrested by the railings of the quarter-deck,
they must inevitably have gone overboard. The
Watervliet was, however, an honest Dutch vessel,
of a most convenient breadth of beam, and it was
no easy matter to capsize her entirely. For a minute
or two she lay quivering and struggling with the
violence of the squall that roared among the
mountains
and whistled through the shrouds, until,
acquiring
a little headway, she slowly luffed up in the
wind, righted, and flapped her sails in defiance. The
next minute all was calm again. The cloud passed
over, the moon shone bright, and the waters slept as
if they had never been disturbed. Whereupon
Captain
Baltus, like a prudent skipper as he was,
ordered
all sail to be lowered, and the anchor to be let
go, sagely observing, it was high time to look out
for squalls.
Such an accident at sea would have been rather
serious, observed the colonel.
I don't know what you tink, colonel, said
Baltus
,
but, in my opinion, it don't make much odds
wedder a man is drowned in de sea or in a river.
The colonel could not well gainsay this, and soon
after retired with his daughter to the cabin.
Bright and early the next morning, Captain
Baltus
,
having looked round in every direction, east,
west, north, and south, to see if there were any
squalls brewing, and perceiving not a cloud in the
sky, cautiously ordered half the jib and mainsail
to be hoisted, to catch the little land-breeze that
just rippled the surface of the river. In a few hours
they emerged from the pass at the foot of the great
Dunderbarrack, and slowly opened upon that
beautiful
amphitheatre into which nature has thrown all
her treasures and all her beauties. Nothing
material
occurred worthy the dignity of our story to
record
during the rest of the passage. True it is that
Skipper Baltus ran the good sloop Watervliet two or
three times upon the oyster-banks of the since
renowned
Tappan Bay; but this was so common a
circumstance that it scarcely deserved
commemoration
,
nor would I have recorded it here but for the
apprehension that its omission might at some future
period, peradventure, seduce some industrious scribe
to write an entire new history of these adventures,
solely to rescue such an important matter from
oblivion
.
Suffice it to say, that at the expiration of ten
days from leaving Albany, the good sloop Watervliet
arrived safe at Coenties-slip, where all the Albany
sloops congregated at that time. This extraordinary
passage was much talked of in both cities, and finally
found its way into the weekly News-Letter, then the
only paper published in the whole new world, as may
be seen by a copy now, or late, in the possession
of the worthy Mr. Dustan, of the Narrows. It is
further recorded, that some of the vessels which
passed the Watervliet as she lay aground on the
Overslaugh, did not arrive in nearly a fortnight after
her; owing, as Captain Baltus observed, to der
being in such a hurry. After this famous exploit
the Watervliet had always a full freight, and as many
passengers as she could accommodate; so that, in
good time, this adventurous navigator retired from
following the water, and built himself a fine brick
house, with the gable end to the street, and the
edges of the roof projecting like the teeth of a saw,
where he sat on his
stoop
and smoked his pipe time
out of mind.
CHAPTER II.
Which may be skipped over by the gentle Reader, as it contains
not a single bloody adventure.
Catalina
was received with a welcome kindness
by Mrs. Aubineau, the lady with whom she had been
invited to spend the winter, and who appeared struck
with the improvement of her person since she left
boarding-school two or three years before. Our
heroine was glad to see Mrs. Aubineau again, having
a vivid recollection of her pleasing manners and
matronly
kindness.
The husband of this lady was a son of one of
the Huguenots driven by the bigotry or policy of
Louis the Fourteenth to this land of libertyliberty
of action, liberty of speech, and liberty of conscience.
These emigrants constituted a portion of the best
educated, most enlightened, polite, and wealthy of
the early inhabitants of New-York. They laid the
foundation of families which still exist in good
reputation
,
and from some of them have descended men
who are for ever associated with the history of our
country. The father of Mr. Aubineau had occupied a
dignified situation under the Dutch government while
it held possession of New-York; but lost it when the
province was assigned to the Duke of York, whose
hungry retainers were portioned off in the new world,
there not being loaves and fishes enough in the old
to satisfy them all. Both father and son cherished
some little resentment on this occasion; and when a
legislative body was established, one or other being
generally a member, they never failed to be found
voting and acting with the popular side, in
opposition
to the governor. They joined the old Dutch
party in all their measures, which were generally
favourable to the rights of the colony, and attained
to great consideration and respect among them.
Notwithstanding his politics, Mr. Aubineau the
younger married a handsome English woman; not
a descendant merely of English parents, but a real
native, born and educated in London. Her father
came over with an appointment, being a younger
brother, with a younger brother's portion, which
generally consists in the family influence employed
on all occasions in quartering the young branches
upon the public. The great use of colonies is to
provide for younger brothers. What this
appointment
was I do not recollect; but whatever it was
it enabled Mr. Majoribanks to live in style, and
carry his head high above the unlucky beings who
furnished the means, and whose destiny it had been
to be born on the wrong side of the Atlantic Ocean,
where it is well known every thing, from men down
to dandies, degenerates. To be born at
home
, as
the phrase then was, operated as a sort of patent of
nobility, and desperate was the ambition of the rich
young citizens, and still more desperate that of the
city heiresses and their mothers, to unite their fate
and fortunes with a real genuine exotic. Many a
soldier of fortune, who spent half-a-crown out of
sixpence a-day, was thus provided for; and not a
few female adventurers gained excellent
establishments
,
over which they were noted for exercising
absolute dominion. For a provincial husband to
contradict a wife from the mother country was held
equivalent to the enormity of a provincial
legislature
refusing its assent to a rescript of his majesty's
puissant governor. It smacked of flat rebellion.
Mr. Aubineau was, however, tolerably fortunate
in his choice. His wife always contradicted him
aside when in public, and issued her commands in
a whisper. She never got angry with him, and only
laughed and took her own way whenever he found
fault; or, what was still more discreet, took no
notice
of his ill-humour, and did just as she pleased.
She was fond of gayety, dress, and equipage, and
particularly fond of flirting with the officers attached
to the governor's family and establishment. These
gentlemen, having nothing to do, and no inclination
to marry, except they were well paid for it,
naturally
selected the married ladies as objects for their
devoirs; very properly concluding, that whatever
might be the case with the ladies, there could be
no breach of promise of marriage on their part, and,
consequently, no dishonour in being as particular as
the lady pleased. As to the provincial husbands,
they were out of the question.
Among the most prominent of the foibles of Mrs.
Aubineau
was an idea at that time very prevalent among
both English and American women. This was an
undisguised and confirmed conviction, that the whole
universe was a nest of barbarians, compared with
old England, and that there was as much moral and
physical difference between being born there and
here, as there was space between the two countries.
Though not much of the blue-stocking, that
sisterhood
not having made its appearance as a distinct
class in those days, like all good English folks, she
could ring the changes on Shakspeare and Milton,
and Bacon and Locke; those four great names on
which English poetry, philosophy, and metaphysics
seem entirely to depend for their renown; and
which form a standard to which every blockhead
more or less assimilates his mind, as if the reflected
rays of their glory had illuminated in some degree
the midnight darkness of his own intellect. This
truly John Bull notion she considered so settled and
established beyond all reasonable question, that she
always spoke of it with an amusing simplicity,
arising
from a perfect confidence in an undisputed point,
upon which all mankind, except her husband, agreed
with as much unanimity as that the sun shone in a
clear day. In regard to the solitary exception
aforesaid
,
Mrs. Aubineau settled that in her mind, by
referring it to that undefinable matrimonial sympathy
which impels so many men to agree with every
other woman when she is wrong, and oppose their
wives whenever they are right. The connexion
between
this lady and our heroine originated in a
marriage between the elder Aubineau and a sister
Colonel Vancour. Into the hands of Mrs. Aubineau
the colonel consigned his daughter for the winter,
at the same time communicating her engagement
with Sybrandt Westbrook, at which she laughed not
a little in her sleeve. She had already a plan in
her head for establishing her rich and beautiful
guest in a far more splendid sphere, as she was
pleased to imagine. At the end of eight or ten days
Colonel Vancour took his departure for home in the
good sloop Watervliet, which had made vast
despatch
in unlading and lading, on account of the
lateness of the season.
Catalina was connected in different ways with
almost all the really respectable and wealthy
inhabitants
of New-York and its vicinity; such as, the
Philipses, the Stuyvesants, the Van Courtlandts, the
Beekmans, Bayards, Delanceys, Gouverneurs, Van
Hornes, Rapalyes, Rutgers, Waltons, and a score of
others too tedious to enumerate. Of course she could
be in no want of visiters or invitations, and there
was every prospect of a gay winter. But all these
good folks were only secondary in the estimation
of Mrs. Aubineau, when compared withnot his
majesty's governor and his family, for they were
out of the sphere of mortal comparisonbut with
the families of his majesty's chief justice, his
majesty's
attorney and solicitor-generals, his majesty's
collector of the customs, and, indeed, with the
families
of any of his majesty's petty officers, however
insignificant. These formed the focus of high life
in the ancient city of New-York, and nothing upon
the face of the earth was more ridiculous in the
eyes of a discreet observer than the pretensions of
this little knot of dependants over the truly
dignified
independence of the great body of the wealthy
inhabitants, except, perhaps, the docility with which
these latter submitted to the petty usurpation.
CHAPTER III.
A Knight and an Honourable. The Reader is desired to make
his best bow.
The
morning after Catalina's arrival she received
the visits of several officers, two of whom had the
honour of being aids to his excellency the
governor
and commander-in-chief. They therefore merit
a particular introduction. Gentle Reader, this
is Sir Thicknesse Throgmorton; and this is the
Honourable Barry Gilfillan, of an ancient and noble
Irish family, somewhat poor, but very honest,
having
suffered divers forfeitures for its loyalty to the
Stuarts,that stupid, worthless race, whose
persevering
pretensions to a crown they had justly
forfeited
by their tyranny, drew after them the ruin of
thousands of generous and devoted victims. Sir
Thicknesse and Colonel Gilfillan, this is the gentle
Reader, a beautiful, accomplished lady of great
taste, as all our female readers are, thank Heaven!
Sir Thicknesse Throgmorton was what is now
generally designated a real John Bull, a being
combining more of the genuine elements of the
ridiculous than perhaps any other extant. Stiff as
buckram, and awkward as an ill-contrived
automaton
;
silent, stupid, and ill-mannered, yet at the same
time full of pretensions to a certain deference, due
only from others in exchange for courtesy and
good-breeding
.
Ignorant of his own country from
incapacity
to learn, and of the rest of the world from a
certain contemptuous stupidity, he exalted the one
and contemned the other without knowing exactly
why, except thatthat it certainly was so, and there
was an end of the matter. His bow was both an
outrage upon nature and inclination, except when
he bent to the lady of the governor, or the governor
himself; and his dancing the essence of solemn
stupidity, aiming at a dignified nonchalance.
Nothing
called forth his lofty indignation more than
being spoken to by an inferior in rank, dress, or
station
.
This indignation was manifested by a most
laughable jumble of insurmountable clumsiness with
affected dignity and high aristocratic breeding.
There was nothing he so much valued himself upon
as the air noble. Independently of the outrage
upon his personal, hereditary, and official dignity
manifested by an abrupt address from an inferior,
Sir Thicknesse had another special cause for
disliking
to be spoken to by strangers. The fact is he
was so long in collecting the materials of an answer
to the most common observation, that he seldom
forgave a person for putting him to the trouble. He
had a most rare and, at that time, original style of
making the agreeable, which is now however pretty
general among high-bred persons. He placed
himself
directly opposite the lady, straddling like a
gigantic
pair of brass tongs, to collect his ideas into
one great explosionsuch, for instance, as Don't
you find it rather warm,
Mawm?
Perfectly
satisfied
with this mighty effort, the knight would strut
off in triumph, to repose himself for the rest of
the evening under the shade of his laurels. Added
to this he was a grumbling, ill-tempered, dissatisfied
being, full of pretensions on the score of his personal
accomplishments and the interest of his family.
There is nothing in fact so dignified in the eyes of
a real John Bull as possessing a family influence,
which renders personal merit and services quite
superfluous
.
With regard to the person of Sir Thicknesse, it was
admirably contrived to set off his exemplary
awkwardness
to the best advantage. It was a perfect
caricature of dignified clumsiness. His limbs struck
you as being too large for his body, until you studied
the latter, when it seemed perfectly clear that the
body was too large for the limbs. Taken by itself,
every feature of his face was out of proportion; but
examine them in connexion as a whole, and there
was an harmonious combination of unfinished
magnitude
,
that constituted a true and just proportion of
disproportions. His eyes sent forth a leaden lustre;
his nose was equally compounded of the pug and
the bottle; his lips would have been too large for
his mouth, had not his mouth been large enough to
harmonize with them; and his cheeks expanded into
sufficient amplitude to accommodate the rest of his
face without any of the features being crowded two
in a room, which every body knows is the
abomination
of every real John Bull in existence. Sir
Thicknesse was of an ancient and honourable family,
distinguished in the annals of England. One of his
ancestors had committed an assassination in the very
precincts of the court, and being obliged to fly in the
disguise of a peasant, in order the more effectually to
escape detection, was overtaken by the king's
pursuivant
,
sawing wood with one of his companions in
a forest. His attendant faltering on the appearance
of the pursuivant, for a moment stopped sawing,
when the other exclaimed significantly, Thorough
or Throughtradition is doubtful which. The
attendant took the hint, continued his work, and the
pursuivant passed them without detection. In
memory
of this great exploit, the illustrious fugitive from
justice adopted this phrase as the motto of his coat
of arms; and it descended to his posterity. Another
of his illustrious ancestors was distinguished in the
wars of York and Lancaster for his inflexible
loyalty
,
being always a most stanch supporter of the
king
de facto
, and holding kings
de jure
in great
contempt
.
A third, and the greatest of all the family
of Sir Thicknesse, was an illegitimate descendant
of a theatrical strumpet and a scoundrel king, who
demonstrated the force of blood by afterward
marrying
an actress of precisely the same stamp as her
from whom he sprung. No wonder Sir Thicknesse
was proud of his family.
But great as his progenitors were, they could not
hold a candle to those of Colonel Barry Fitzgerald
Macartney Gilfillan, a genuine Milesian, whose
ancestors
had been kings of Connaught, princes of
Breffny, and lords of Ballyshannon, Ballynamora,
Ballynahinch, Ballygruddrey, Ballyknockamora, and
several lordships besides. Gilfillan was an Irish
Bull, a perfect contrast to an English Bull. He was
all life, love, gallantry, whim, wit, humour, and
hyperbole
.
His animal spirits were to him as the
wings of a bird, on which he mounted into the regions
of imagination and folly. They flew away with him
ten times an hour. He learned every thing so fast
that he knew nothing perfectly; and such was the
impetuosity of his conceptions, that one-half the time
they came forth wrong end foremost. His ignorance
of a subject never for a moment prevented him from
dashing right into it, or stopped the torrent of his
Vol. II.B
ideas, which resembled a stream swelled by the rains,
being excessively noisy and not very clear. His
ideas, in truth, seemed always turning somersets over
the heads of each other, and for the most part
presented
that precise rhetorical arrangement which is
indicated by the phrase of putting the cart before
the horse. He never pleaded guilty to ignorance
of any thing, nor was ever known to stop a moment
to get hold of the right end of an idea,maintaining
with a humorous obstinacy, that as he always came
to the right end at last, it was of no consequence
where he began.
Nature had given to Colonel Gilfillan a more than
usual share of the truly Irish propensity to falling in
love extempore. His heart was quite as hot as his
head, and between the two there was a perfect
volcano
.
He was always under high steam pressure.
He once acknowledged, or rather boastedfor he
never confessed any thingthat he had fallen in love
at the Curragh of Kildare with six ladies in one day,
and was refused by them all in less than twenty-four
hours afterward. But, faith! added he, I killed
two horses riding about the country after them; and
that was some comfort. Comfort! said a friend,
how do you make that out, Gilfillan? Why,
wasn't it a proof I didn't stand shilly-shally, waiting
my own consent any more than that of the ladies, my
dear! It is scarcely necessary to add, that he was
generous, uncalculating, brave, and a man of his
word, except in love affairs, and sometimes in affairs
of business, when he occasionally lost at play the
money he had promised to a tradesman. His person
exhibited a rich redundancy of manly beauty, luscious
with youth, health, and vigour; he sang charmingly;
played the fiddle so as to bring tears into your eyes;
danced, laughed, chatted, blundered, gallanted,
flattered
,
and made love with a graceful confidence and
fearless audacity, that caused him to be a great
favourite
and rather a dangerous companion for women
of warm imaginations and mere ordinary refinement of
manners and feelings. Like most men of his
profession
,
his ideas on certain subjects were of the
latitudinarian
order. Gilfillan swore he was a man of as
much honour as ever wore a uniform. He would not
pick a pocket; but as for picking a lady's white bosom
of a sweet little heartlet him alone for that. A fair
exchange was no robbery all the world over; and
he always left his own with them, if there were
twenty. When his brother officers laughed at him
for having so many hearts, Och, my dears!
would he reply, what, do you talk about having but
one heart? A man with only one heart in his bosom
is like a poor divil with only a shilling in his pocket
he is afraid to part with it, and so starves himself
just for fear of starving!
CHAPTER IV.
A reigning Belle.
This
combustible gentleman fell in love with
Catalina
at first sightand never man had a better
excuse
;
for she was now in the ripe prime of
womanhood
,
and lovely as the happiest creations of painting
and poetry. Her eyes, her lips, her cheeks, her
nose, her forehead, and her chin were all cast in the
happy mould of symmetry; and the combination
produced an expression of sensibility, intellect, and
virtue, that struck every one at first sight. Her fair
white neck, her harmonious, graceful shoulders, the
confines of that region on which the eye and the
imagination delight to linger as the chosen spot where
grace and beauty revel as on a bed of snow; the little
finished telltale foot, and the graceful lines that gave
the outline of her touching, full, round figure, all and
each of them bore silent testimony to the perfection
of the hidden glories of the inner temple, sacred to
one alone.
That Colonel Gilfillan should fall headlong in love
at the first sight of such an object, was just as
natural
,
not to say inevitable, as the explosion of a
barrel of gunpowder on the application of a firebrand.
I will not affirm there was a spark of interest mingled
with his fires, but it may be safely laid down as a
maxim founded in human nature, that the most
disinterested
lover has no very great objection to his
mistress possessing a competent estate. Gilfillan
made downright love to Catalina the tenth time he
saw her; and at the eleventh interview offered her
his hand and fortune, at the same time laying his
sword at her feet, in which he confessed the latter
entirely consisted. He did this however, in a style so
wild and extravagant, and with so odd a mixture of
humour and pathos, jest and earnest, that the young
lady laughed at it as a rhodomontade. She
gradually
became accustomed to his extravagance, and
amused with his good-humoured eccentricities. In
the mean time she mixed continually in the winter
gayeties, and became the reigning belle of the season.
Now it was that the spirit moved Sir Thicknesse
Throgmorton to gather himself together and honour
Catalina with his notice. It will ever be found that
the dullest fellows are seen hovering about the most
brilliant objects, just as the bugs and moths, and
other imps of the night, hie them to bask in the
splendours of the lighted candle. Besides this
general propensity, Sir Thicknesse was impelled by
another and more particular incitement. He was
especially envious of Gilfillan, who was perpetually
throwing his accomplishments into the shade, and
whose spirit, brilliancy, and good-nature made the
leaden dullness and stultified pride of the other appear
still more ungracious.
The first demonstration Sir Thicknesse gave of
his devotion to our heroine was one night actually
stooping to pick up her fan, at a party at his
puissant
excellency the governor's. Whereupon Madam
Van Borsum, Madam Van Dam, Madam
Twentyman
,
and twenty other madams, who had
marriageable
daughters, were thrown into a trepidation. What
rendered this act of devotion the more conspicuous,
such was the rigidity of Sir Thicknesse's habits and
costume, that he was obliged to go down on one knee
in order to its performance. The young ladies
tittered
behind their fans, and Gilfillan swore it put him
in mind of a wooden god offering incense to a beautiful
young priestess, which sounded somewhat like a bull.
When Sir Thicknesse had performed this
successful
feat of gallantry, he strutted away, and passed
the rest of the evening in a corner, in dignified
indifference
,
justly conceiving he had done enough for
one night.
There was a certain feeling of self-complacency
which was vastly conciliated by having his name
connected
with that of the reigning belle of the day, in the
whispers of the young ladies and the tittle-tattle of
their mothers. With all his absurd affectation of
proud indifference, his vanity was highly excited by
the association. Like my Lord Byron, he was always
pretending the most sovereign indifference and
contempt
for the world and its opinions, while at the
same time his very soul smarted under its
censure
or neglect. Of all the affectations of vanity
that of indifference to the opinions of the world is
the most inconsistent with the feelings and actions
of men, and the most easily detected by its
inconsistencies
.
Sir Thicknesse followed up his first overt
act of picking up the fan by other demonstrations
still more significant, until it came to pass that
Madam
Van Borsum, Madam Van Dam, Madam
Twentyman
,
and the rest, came to a unanimous decision
that it was all over with their daughters, and that
Catalina would certainly, in good time, become Lady
Throgmorton. Not one of them conceived it
possible
she could be so mad as to refuse a baronet, a
governor's aid-de-camp, and a man actually born in
old England. It is unnecessary to say that these
worthy madams from this time took a decided
distaste
to our heroine, and treated her with
extraordinary
marks of attention.
Mrs. Aubineau soon, with the quick instinct of a
chaperon having a young lady to establish, perceived
the important conquests Catalina had achieved in so
short a time. She accordingly forthwith fell to
balancing
accounts between the two suitors, for as to
honest Sybrandt she looked upon that affair as a
mere country arrangement, made to be broken the
first convenient opportunity. Engagements made
in the country are never considered binding in town,
all the world over. If Catalina, quoth Madam
Aubineau
,
in her secret cogitations, marries Gilfillan,
she will be a countess in time, but then it's only
an Irish title, and there is no estate to it I know.
If she marries Sir Thicknesse, she will be a lady
at once, wife to an English baronetand lady is
lady all the world over. Besides he has an estate,
and though it is out at the elbows, a little of
Catalina's
fortune will make it whole again. The
inevitable
conclusion of Madam Aubineau was to
encourage
Sir Thicknesse, and discourage his rival.
But Gilfillan was an Irishman, and, as he affirmed,
he could always tell the difference between the
false and true Milesian, by the latter never being
discouraged. By my soul, would he say, there's
no such word in the old Irish tongueits an
English
importation. To discourage such a man was
out of the question. If Madam Aubineau looked
coolly towards him, or failed in any of the
customary
attentions, he rallied her with such a
triumphant
good humour, or received her slights with such
imperturbable negligence, that the good lady
sometimes
laughed herself friends with him, or sat down
in despair at the perfect impotence of her scheme of
discouragement.
CHAPTER V.
Manuvring.
The
busiest and at the same time the most
injudicious
of all schemers is a good lady
overanxious
to make a match for a daughter, or a young
spinster under her protection. Madam Aubineau did
nothing but give parties at night, and her worthy
husband had no rest until he gave parties by day,
at which Sir Thicknesse was always seated next
to Catalina at dinner, where he never failed to
observe
upon the weather, and drink a glass of wine
with her. There is no telling what these seductive
attentions might have achieved in time, had not the
genius of Gilfillan crossed the path of Sir
Thicknesse
.
That enterprising Milesian, with singular
skill and intrepidity, never omitted to gain a seat on
the other side of our heroine, where his humour,
vivacity, and gallantry seldom failed to obscure the
solemn, dignified stupidity of his rival, and throw him
into utter oblivion. It was observed at these
merry-makings
,
that Sir Thicknesse ate himself into still
greater stupidity, while Gilfillan drank himself into
such an effervescence of spirits, that Catalina
became
actually afraid of him. The good matron,
Madam Aubineau, accordingly soon found out that
dinner-parties are the worst places in the world for
matchmaking, at least with Englishmen and
Irishmen
.
B 2
Madam Aubineau accordingly essayed to
circumvent
Sir Thicknesse, by enthralling him in the
seductions of evening-parties. Catalina had a fine
voice, and all the skill which could be attained
in those degenerate days, when all or nearly all
the music of our western world was warbled in
woods and fields, when not a single lady in all the
land had a harp whereon to commit murder, and
when there were but three old phthisicky spinets
within the bills of mortality. Unfortunately for our
heroine one of these appertained to Madam
Aubineau's
mansion, and night after night was poor
Catalina condemned to torture this impracticable
machine into something like groans and shrieks of
harmony. Catalina was tired to death; and so was
all the company. But everybody said charming,
and cried, what a pretty tune, at the end of every
execution. Sir Thicknesse beat time out of time,
till he fell into a brown study or a nap, no one could
tell which. Still worse than this; here too
Gilfillan
crossed the milky way of Sir Thicknesse's
fortunes
.
His voice was so touching and pathetic, that
it is said he could bring tears into your eyes by
merely warbling an Irish howl; and when he threw
his whole ardent soul into an old Irish melody, such
as Ellen a Roon, it is recorded that the hardest
hearts were softened, and even tea-parties became
silent. He taught Catalina some of these fine old
Doric airs, and as they warbled them together, their
very beings seemed for the time cemented in one
rich harmony; and then did the fortunes of Sir
Thicknesse kick the beam higher than ever.
Madam Aubineau saw that the gods of eating and
of music were both equally adverse to her desires.
She therefore varied her plan once more, and
introduced
dancing at her parties. She summoned the
Orpheus and Orion of the day, to wit, Curaao
Dick, and Will, alias Ticklepitcher; than whom two
greater fiddlers never drew bow in this western
hemisphere. Not Billy, the fiddler of immortal
memory, nor Bennett, nor any of those who now
preside over the midnight, or rather morning revels
of the youthful fair of our city, who so many of
them thus dance themselves into the other world
not one of these, nor all together, could match the
matchless skill of Curaao Dick, and Will, alias
Ticklepitcher. They lived in harmony, and died
in harmonythey were both executed at the same
time for a participation in the famous negro plot.
But alack and alas! for Madam Aubineau; here
too the fates were hostile, and the genius of old
Ireland
triumphed over that of old England. Gilfillan
danced like the feathered Mercury and Sir Thicknesse
like a bear. His face was of lead and his body of
something still heavier. As to his legs, no one could
ever invent a comparison, or discover a material
adequate to giving a just idea of their specific
gravity
.
Gilfillan came the nearest when he affirmed
they put him in mind of two old rusty
twenty-four-pounders
,
planted half-way in the ground at the
opposite
corners of a street. Besides, Sir Thicknesse
was so long in gathering himself together and
crossing
the room to ask Catalina to dance, that Gilfillan,
who delighted to thwart his rival, always was
beforehand
with him, and danced with her twice as
often, to the great discomfiture of Madam Aubineau.
The good lady then resorted to morning visits and
tte--ttes
. She invited Sir Thicknesse, under
various
pretences, to call, and managed to leave
Catalina
alone with him. This was worse than all. Sir
Thicknesse was too stupid for a tte--tte
conversation
.
People ascribed his silence to pride, but take
my word for it, it was sheer dulnessthe want of
something to say. This is what makes so many
people
affect pride. He would sit for hours on the sofa
rapping his military boot with a rattan, and looking
Catalina full in the face, like a leaden statue. Once,
we must do him the justice to sayonce he asked
the young lady if she had been at the review. She
answered in the negative, at which Sir Thicknesse,
who had figured on the occasion in a newly-imported
suit of regimentals, was so grievously affronted that
he pouted all the rest of the morning, and would not
condescend to stare her out of countenance.
These gratifying visits were also frequently broken
in upon by Gilfillan, who did not mind any of the
usual polite denials which shrewdly indicate that
one's company is not quite welcome. The truth is,
he seldom gave himself the trouble to inquire who
was at home, but whistled or hummed himself into
the parlour without ceremony. If he found any one
there, it was well; if not, he staid till some one came,
or if he grew tired, whistled himself out again. His
company was always a relief to our heroine from
the deadly monotony of Sir Thicknesse's silence,
and of course she received him with smiles, which
almost went to the imperturbable heart of his rival,
who always slapped his boot the harder, and looked,
if possible, still more glum on these occasions.
All this time Catalina had no idea of any serious
attentions on the part of the two gentlemen. She
did not feel sufficiently interested in either to make
her very clear-sighted on the occasion; and indeed
the stupidity of the one, and the wild rhodomontade
of the other, made their intentions very obscure as
well as questionable. But young ladies are sure to
be let into these secrets by the kind interest which
every body takes in affairs with which they have no
concern. I will not deny that she flirted a little
with one of her admirers, and what was still more
suspicious, laughed at the other; but certain it is,
she had no idea of any thing serious in the business
until she began to be congratulated on all hands at
the important conquests she had made. Nay, some
of the old ladies affected to ask her very significantly
when
it
was to bewhether the old folks had
given their consent, and especially how master
Sybrandt
Westbrook was, and whether he did not mean
to spend part of the winter in town.
CHAPTER VI.
In which the Reader will be puzzled to discover whether the
gray Mare is the better Horse or not.
Our
heroine was somewhat startled at these
inquiries
.
Though beautiful as an angel, still she was
mortal. The dissipations of a city life, the novelty
of every thing around her, and more especially the
incense every where administered to the sly lurking
vanity which nestles somewhere in every human
heart, had, by degrees, somewhat obscured the
memory
of Sybrandt in her bosom. She frequently
thought of him with affectionate gratitude, but this
thought was so often interrupted by visiters,
engagements
,
and all the attractions of a life of pleasure,
that by degrees it ceased to be the governing
principle
of her actions; and various little coquetries marked
the effect of absence as well as the growth of worldly
passions. During the winter season there was little
intercourse between New-York and Albany, and
consequently
the letters that were interchanged between
her and Sybrandt were few and far between. It must
be confessed too, that when opportunities did occur,
Catalina sometimes had so many engagements on
her hands that she did not always avail herself of
them.
My dear, said Mr. Aubineau one day that he
had been asked by Mrs. Twentyman when Catalina
was to be married,my dear, have you forgot that
your friend Miss Vancour is engaged to be married
to her cousin?
No, my dear, replied she; I've not forgot it.
I've not lost my memory yet, thank heaven.
Well then, my dear, do you wish to make a fool
of Sir Thicknesse Throgmorton?
No, my dear, I don't wish to make a fool of Sir
Thicknesse Throgmorton.
Then perhaps you wish to make a fool of
Catalina
?
I don't understand you, my dear.
Why, my dear, it seems to me that, knowing as
you do the engagement of this young lady, the
encouragement
you give Sir Thicknesse in his
attentions
to her, when it is obvious they must be vain,
is very well calculated to make a fool of him, in the
common acceptation of the term.
Pooh, Mr. Aubineau, what is an engagement
between two people without experience in the world,
who fall in love in the country because they don't
know what to do with themselves?
Why, Mrs. Aubineau, I should think an
engagement
made in the country exactly as binding as if it
were made in the city.
Pshaw! Mr. Aubineau, you talk nonsense. To
miss such an establishment, and a title to boot! What
do you say to that?
Why, I say that neither a title nor an
establishment
furnish sufficient apology for acting
dishonourably
.
Lord! Mr. Aubineau, how you talk!
This young lady is placed under our
guardianship
by her parents, who have sanctioned her
engagement
with her cousin; and we are in some measure
responsible for her conduct. What will her father
say?
Pooh! what signifies what he says?
And her mother?
Why, she'll say we have done right to break off
this foolish country engagement, and thank us for
making her the mother of a lady.
I doubt it.
If she don't she is a most unnatural mother.
Why, Madam Van Borsum, and Madam Van Dam,
and Madam Twentyman, and all the other madams
that have marriageable daughters, are ready to die
of envy.
Well, let them die, if they will.
Let them die?why, you inhuman man,
are you not ashamed of yourself?the poor
souls!
But this is nothing to the purpose. It is not
what others may think or say, but what we ought
to do, that I wish to consult you about.
Well, my dear, I am willing to be consulted as
much as you please; but I tell you beforehand all
you can say will not alter my opinions or my
conduct
,
my dear.
Oh, if that is the case, madam, I shall take my
own course. I shall to-day write to invite Sybrandt
Westbrook to come down and spend the rest of the
winter with us. Let him take care of his own
interests
,
since you won't.
If you do, I tell you once for all, my dear, I won't
be civil to him.
Then I shall be particularly civil.
You will?
Yes!
A monosyllable, however short, is always
significant
of cool determination, and it made Mrs.
Aubineau
start.
There's no room for him in the house, said
she, after a pause of consideration whether it was
time to be angry.
I shall have a bed made for him in my
library.
There's no room for a bed without removing
the bookcases.
Then I shall remove the bookcases.
You will?
Yes!
Another diabolical monosyllable! What woman
in the shape of a wife could bear it?
I'll tell you what, my dear
You need not tell me any thing, my dear. I
recollect you were pleased to observe just now,
nothing I could say would alter your opinions or
your conduct. I am just in the same humour.
There is a government messenger going to Albany
to-morrow,I shall write by him. So saying, Mr.
Aubineau took his hat, and walked very deliberately
to the Perpetual Club, an ancient and honourable
institution which flourished at that time in the good
city of New-York, one of the fundamental principles
of which was that there should always be a quorum
of members present day and night.
What an obstinate mule! exclaimed Mrs.
Aubineau
,
when he was out of hearing. A man that
won't listen to reason is as badas bad as a
woman that won't listen to reason, whispered
conscience
.
Mrs. Aubineau was upon the whole a
reasonable woman, and listened to her monitor until
she thought better of the matter. She determined
to be uncommonly civil to Sybrandt if he came, and
to make herself amends by counteracting his interests
to the utmost of her power. That evening Mr.
Aubineau
informed Catalina he had written to invite
Sybrandt. The news caused a rush of blood from
her heart to her face; but whether it was a flush of
pleasure, surprise, or apprehension I cannot say.
Whatever were her feelings, she uttered not a word,
and the secret remained buried in her bosom.
CHAPTER VII.
The Rape of the Picture.
In
due time Sybrandt received the letter of Mr.
Aubineau, and obtained a slow unwilling assent
from Mr. Dennis Vancour to accept the invitation.
Colonel Vancour also gave his approbation, and
madame did not oppose, though she had a great
inclination to do so. She was a wife of the old
egimethat is to say, an antediluvian wife,for I
have heard of none since the flood who like her acted
on the principle that in matters where men's business
was particularly concerned men should be left to judge
for themselves. But she did not like the
arrangement
.
I don't much approve disclosing the secrets
of ladies, but the truth was there had been a sly
correspondence going on for some time between her
and Mrs. Aubineau, in which the project of making
madame the mother of a titled lady was
communicated
,
and received with singular complacency.
There was probably not a mother in the whole wide
circumference of this new world who could have
resisted the temptation. The apple of Eve was
nothing to it. The good Dame Vancour thought
of little else by day and by night,nay, she dreamed
three nights running that she saw Catalina with a
coronet, instead of a nightcap. However, she made
no opposition to the visit of Sybrandt, trusting to the
assurances contained in a letter from Mrs. Aubineau,
which came by the same messenger who brought
the invitation, that she would take care no good
should come of Mr. Aubineau's impertinent
interference
.
The good Dennis was resolved his nephew and
heir should not disgrace him at the little court of the
little puissant governor of New-York. He got him
two full suits constructed by his own tailor, whom he
considered the greatest hand at inexpressibles in the
whole universe. Certain it is he took the greatest
quantity of broadcloth, though he was never in his
life suspected of cabbaging. The favourite colours
of Dennis were snuff and drab, and accordingly
these were ordered. The tailor was enjoined to be
very particular in not making them too tight, as
people were very apt to grow fat as they grew old;
and Ariel had a glorious time of it. He went to
Albany four times a week, to superintend the
construction
of Sybrandt's wardrobe, and hasten the
completion of this arduous business. Thus
stimulated
,
the tailor, who was called Master Goosee Ten
Broeck, bestirred himself with such consummate
diligence
,
that at the end of three weeks he brought
home the whole twelfth labour of Hercules
triumphantly
.
Sybrandt was out of all patience in the
mean while; but was amply rewarded for the delay,
by the perfection of Master Goosee's work; which
Uncle Dennis affirmed fitted just like wax, though
heaven knows why. It certainly did not stick to him
like wax, but hung around his body and limbs at a most
respectful distance. All things being in readiness,
the good Dennis gave Sybrandt his blessing, together
with abundance of advice, backed by a purse of
guineas, the music of which far transcended that of
the spheres, which the poets make such harangues
about. If they were a little accustomed to the
chincking of guineas, they would find there was no
comparison between the two. Dn it, Sybrandt,
exclaimed the little Ariel, dn it, I should like to
go with you; but now I think of it, I can't neither.
I've promised old Ten Broeck to graft some
peach-trees
for him, as soon as the spring comes on.
Good-by, massa Sybrandt, said old Tjerck,
now almost bent double with age and rheumatism
Good-by, massa Sybrandtnever see old nigger
again. Sybrandt was touched with this homely
address, and the tears came into his eyes. He shook
hands with the old partner of his first adventures,
when he put on the toga and commenced man, and
parted from him with sorrow. His speech to his
young master was propheticthey never met again.
The old man died of a rheumatism about a fortnight
afterward. Peace to his manes, black as they were!
I honour his memory, for he was one of those faithful
servants the race of which has long become extinct,
amid the pious endeavours of pains-taking folks who
have nothing to do but better the condition of
mankind
,
and meddle with other people's concerns.
While these things were going on in the country,
our heroine was in what is called in homely phrase
I like homely phrasesin a sort of a quandary.
Sometimes she was glad that her cousin was coming,
and sometimes she was sorry. Sometimes she was
very angry he was so long in coming, and at others
she found it in her heart to wish he would not come
at all; for mighty were her fears that the fashionable
people of New-York, and more especially the
aids-de-camp
,
would laugh at his country manners and
homely apparel. Sir Thicknesse and Gilfillan still
continued their attentions; the former gentleman
gathered himself together in consequence of being
incited thereto by Mrs. Aubineau, and achieved a
most triumphant piece of gallantry. He actually
spoke to our heroine three times in one morning.
As to the tinderI don't mean tenderhearted
Milesian
,
he swore at least six dozen times a day that
she was an angel, and that he was dying by
barleycorns
for the love of her sweet soul. He certainly
was deeply smitten after the fashion of a soldier and
an Irishman, for notwithstanding he was dying for
love, he was the healthiest, merriest fellow in the
world, and laughed, sang, danced, drank, gamed, and
gallanted, just as if nothing was the matter with him.
Catalina had much ado to keep him in due order
and subjection to the rules of feminine delicacy, for
your true Milesian is ever daringly enterprising.
Even love cannot make them cowards. Our heroine
was always obliged to act on the defensive, when
alone with him, and more than once had occasion
to be seriously angry. One day he came in,
humming
his favourite Ellen a Roon, and finding a
miniature of Catalina, which had just been taken by
an eminent hand, and which is still extant in the
Vancour family, the honest gentleman was seized
with the gallant whim of possessing himself of it, at
least
pro tem
. Our heroine expostulatedGilfillan
laughed; she was angryGilfillan laughed still
louder; she stated to him seriously the
indelicacy
of such a procedure, and the consequences
of the picture being seen in his possessionall
would not do; he replied in rhodomontade and
extravagant
professions, swore he did not mean to
keep it, that he only wanted to worship her image
in secret for one night, when he would return it,
provided it was not demolished with kisses; and,
finally, turned the whole into a joke, and set our
heroine laughing in spite of her vexation. In short,
he carried off the bauble with a solemn lover's
assurance
of returning it the next day. But the next
day, and the next, he made some such odd,
extravagant
,
or humorous excuse for retaining it one
day longer, that Catalina yielded to his irresistible
grotesque, and was actually ashamed to be angry.
In about a week, however, he returned the
picture
,
with the assurance, that nothing but its being
the actual representation of a divinity had
miraculously
preserved it from destruction by the intensity
of his devotion. In a short time the whole affair
was forgiven and forgotten by Catalina.
CHAPTER VIII.
A Hero in snuff-coloured Breeches.
A few
days afterward Sybrandt arrived in his
snuff-coloured suit, which of itself was enough to
ruin the brightest prospects of the most thriving
wooer. Think what a contrast to the splendours
of an aid-de-camp! the scarlet, gold-laced coat, the
bright spurs, and the gorgeous epaulettes. Poor
Sybrandt! what superiority of the inside could
weigh against this outside gear? Catalina received
him, I cannot tell exactly how. She did not know
herself, and how should I? It was an odd,
incomprehensible
,
indescribable compound of affected
indifference
,
and affected welcome; fear of showing too
little feeling, and horror of exhibiting too much. In
short, it was an awkward business, and Sybrandt
made it still more so, by being suddenly seized with
an acute fit of his old malady of shyness and
embarrassment
.
Such a meeting has often been a
prelude to an eternal separation.
The very next evening after his arrival Sybrandt
made his debut in the snuff-coloured suit, at a grand
party given by his excellency the governor, in
honour of his majesty's birthday. All the
aristocracy
of the city were collected on this occasion,
and, in order to give additional dignity to the
ceremony
,
several people of the first consequence
delayed
making their appearance till almost seven
o'clock. The hoops and heads were prodigious;
and it is recorded of more than one lady, that she
went to this celebrated party with her head
sticking
out of one of the coach windows, and her hoop
out at the other. Their sleeves it is true were not
quite so exuberant as those of the present graceful
mode; nor was it possible to mistake a lady's arm
for her body, as is sometimes done in these
degenerate
days by near-sighted dandies; one of whom,
I am credibly informed, actually put his arm round
the sleeve instead of the waist, in dancing the waltz
last winter with a young belle just from Paris.
Many a little sharp-toed, high-heeled satin shoe,
sparkling in diamond paste buckles, did execution
that night; and one old lady in particular displayed,
with all the pride of conscious superiority, a pair of
gloves her mother had worn at court in the reign of
the gallant Charles the Second, who came very
near asking her to dance, and publicly declared her
to be quite as elegant as Nell Gwyn, and almost
as beautiful as the Dutchess of Cleveland. These
consecrated relics descended in a direct line from
generation to generation in this illustrious
family
,
being considered the most valuable of its
possessions
,
until they were sacrilegiously purloined
by a gentleman of colour belonging to the house,
and afterward exhibited during several seasons at
the African balls. To what vile uses we may
come at last!
All the dignitaries of the province were present
on this occasion, for their absence would have been
looked upon as a proof of disloyalty that might have
cost them their places. Here were the illustrious
members of the governor's council, who represented
his majesty in the second degree. Next came the
Vol. II.C
chief justice, and the puisne justices, all in those
magnificent wigs which, as Captain Basil Hall
asserts
,
give such superiority to the decisions of the
judges of England,inasmuch as that when the
head is so full of law that it can hold no more, a
vast superfluity of knowledge may be
accommodated
in the curls of the wig. Hence it has been
gravely doubted whether those profound decisions
of my Lord Mansfield and Sir William Scott, which
constitute the law and the
profits
in our courts, did
actually emanate from the brains or the wigs of the
aforesaid oracles. Here too figured his majesty's
attorney-general and his majesty's solicitor-general,
who also wore wigs, but not so large as those of
the judges, for that would have been considered a
shrewd indication that they thought themselves
equally learned in the law with their betters. Next
came the rabble of little vermin that are farmed out
upon colonies in all ages and nations, to fatten on
the spoils of industry, and tread upon the people
who give them bread. Custom and excise officers,
commissioners and paymasters, and every
creeping
thing which had the honour of serving and
cheating his majesty in the most contemptible station,
here took precedence of the ancient and present lords
of the soil, and looked down upon them as inferior
beings. His majesty was the fountain of honour and
glory; and his excellency the governor being his
direct and immediate representative, all claims to
distinction were settled by propinquity to that
distinguished
functionary. Whoever was nearest to him in
dignity of office was the next greatest man; and
whatever lady could get nearest the governor's lady
at a party was indubitably ennobled for that night,
and became an object of envy ever afterward.
Previous
to the late Revolution more than one of our
aristocratic
families derived their principal distinction
from their grandmothers having once dined with the
governor, and sat at the right hand of his lady at
dinner.
If Sybrandt, the humble and obscure Sybrandt,
who had nothing to recommend him but talents,
learning, and intrepidity of soulif he was awed by
the majesty of this illustrious assemblage of
dignitaries
,
almost all of whom tacked honourable to their
names, who can blame him? And if, as he
contrasted
his snuff-coloured dress with the gorgeous
military costumes of the aids-de-camp and officers,
he felt, in spite of himself, a consciousness of
inferiority
,
who can wonder? And if, as he gazed on
the big wigs of the judges, and the vast
circumference
of those hoops in which the beauties of
New-York
moved and revolved as in a universe of their
own, he trembled to his inmost heart, who shall dare
to question his courage?
To the weight of this feeling of inferiority,
which pressed upon the modesty of his nature,
and, as it were, enveloped his intellects in a fog
of awkward embarrassment, were added various
other causes of vexation. When it was whispered
about that he was the country beau, the accepted
one of the belle of New-York, the scrutiny he
underwent
would have quailed the heart of a roaring lion.
The young ladies, who envied Catalina the conquest
of the two aids, revenged themselves by tittering at
her beau behind their fans.
Lord, whispered Miss Van Dam to Miss
Twentyman
,
did you ever see such an old-fashioned
creature? I declare, he looks frightened out of his
wits.
C 2
And then his snuff-coloured breeches! said the
other. He is handsome, too; but what is a man
without a red coat and epaulettes!
My readers will excuse the insertion of a certain
obnoxious word in the reply of the young lady, when
they understand it was uttered in a whisper. I am
the last man in the world to commit an outrage upon
female decorum, and am not so ignorant of what is
due to the delicacy of the sex as not to know that
though it is considered allowable for young ladies
now-a-days to expose their persons in the streets
and at parties in the most generous manner, as well
as to permit strangers to take them round the waist
in a waltz, it would be indelicate in the highest
degree to mention such matters in plain English.
In fashionable ethics, indelicacy consists not so
much in the thing itself as in the words used in
describing
it.
While the young ladies were criticising the merits
of our hero's snuff-coloured costume, the mothers
were investigating his other capabilities.
They say he will be immensely rich, quoth
Mrs. Van Dam.
You don't say so? cried Mrs. Van Borsum.
Yes, he has two old bachelor uncles, as rich as
Crsus.
Crsus? who is he? I don't know him.
A rich merchant in London, I believe.
Well, but is it certain he will have the fortunes
of both the old bachelors?
O, certain. One of them has adopted him, and
the other made his will and left him all he has.
What a pity he should marry such a flirt as that
Miss Vancour!
O, a very great pity. Really I am sorry for the
young fellow; he deserves a better wife. And she
thought of her daughter.
Indeed he doesso he does, echoed the other
lady; and she thought of
her
daughter. They both
began to despair of the aids, and the military and
the civil dignitaries; and the next object of their
ambition was a rich provincial.
It was not many hours after this conversation
before
our friend Sybrandt was introduced to these
good ladies, at their particular instance, and by them
to their daughters.
Is he rich enough to take me
home?
whispered
Miss Van Borsum to her motherhome being the
phrase for Old England at that time, when it was
considered vulgar to belong to a colony.Is he
rich enough to take me home?
As rich as Crsus, the great London merchant.
Then I am determined to set my cap at him in
spite of his snuff-coloured , thought Miss
Van Borsum. By one of those inextricable
manuvres
with which experienced dames contrive
arrangements
of this sort, Sybrandt was actually forced into
dancing a minuet with Miss Van Borsum, although
he would almost have preferred dancing a jig upon
nothing. The young lady nearly equalled Catalina
in this the most graceful and ladylike of all dances;
and having a beautiful little foot
et cetera
, many were
the keen darts she launched from her pointed satin
shoes and diamond buckles at the hearts of the
beholders. The dancing of our hero was not
altogether
despicable; but the snuff-coloured !
they did his business for that night with all the
young ladies and their mothers who did not know
he was the heir of two rich old bachelors.
CHAPTER IX.
Of the noble revenge of Sir Thicknesse Throgmorton. The
Author lauds the Ladies.
Gilfillan
, who was speedily advertised by several
communicative and good-natured old ladies, that
could not bear to see him made a fool of, that
Sybrandt was the real formidable man after all
eyed him with an air of taunting ridicule. Sybrandt
was on the lookout too, and returned these
demonstrations
with interest. But Gilfillan was a generous,
good-natured fellow, and ere long that kind feeling
with which every genuine Irishman looks at a
stranger, overcame the hostility of rivalship.
By the galligaskins of my great ancestor, the
Prince of Breffny, quoth he, there can be no
danger in such a pair as thatand he immediately
introduced himself to our hero, with a frank
cordiality
that was irresistible. Sybrandt felt himself
drawn towards him, in spite of his being a rival.
But how did he know Gilfillan was his rival?
Pshaw! gentle reader, if you can't comprehend that,
you had better go and study metaphysics. Do you
suppose it possible for him to converse with Madame
Van Borsum and dance with her daughter, without
knowing all about it? You must think women had
no tongues in the days of your great-grandmother.
The behaviour of Sir Thicknesse Throgmorton
was a perfect contrast to that of Colonel Gilfillan.
He affected to take not the least notice of Sybrandt,
and pouted majestically with Catalina. He
pretended
not to hear when she addressed him
neglected
to ask her to dancecame very near flirting
with Miss Van Dam, only he did not know how
retired
into a corner where he stood two hours,
sometimes
resting on one leg, then on the other, like unto
a goose; and finally refused to cut up a boiled
turkey at supper, when requested by the governor's
lady: at which piece of unheard-of audacity every
body threw down their knives and forks in
astonishment
.
That very night he consulted his pillow, and
determined to jilt Catalina, not having at that time
the fear of the law before him, which hath since
remunerated so many broken-hearted young ladies
for the loss of one husband by enabling them to
purchase a second with the spoils of the first. He
resolved, therefore, to desert our heroine, and break
her heart. It never entered the head of this honest
gentleman that she was very happy to be rid of him.
But to mortify her still more, he determined to pay
his devoirs to another. For this purpose he selected
the wife of an honest burgher residing in
Broad-street
,
to whom he addressed a flaming love-letter in
English. The good woman not being able to read
it, one language being at that time considered quite
enough for an honest woman, like a dutiful wife
carried it to her husband to interpret for her. The
worthy burgher was in the same predicament with
his wife, and Gilfillan being an old customer, put
it into his hands for translation. After this he
went forthwith to Sir Thicknesse to expostulate with
him, and know what de duyvel he meant. You
can't marry mine
vrouw
, cause she's
cot
one huspand
alreaty; said he, with great appearance of reason.
Gilfillan made a most capital story out of this, and the
dignified baronet was so quizzed wherever he went,
that he soon asked leave of absence, and returned
to England, where it is said he found plenty of proud
blockheads who mistook awkwardness for dignity,
and clumsiness for the air noble, to keep him in
countenance. The reader will be pleased to recollect
I am speaking of days of yore, and that the English
beaux have since been greatly improved in grace
and politeness by frequent association with our
sprightly belles. But I am anticipating my story.
Be this as it may, it is with pain I confess that the
snuff-coloured garments heretofore commemorated,
the tittering of the young ladies, the criticisms of
their mothers, and above all the sly remarks of the
officers, the ill-natured side-speeches of Mrs.
Aubineau
,
together with a certain secret consciousness
on the part of our heroine that our hero made but a
sort of an indifferent figure at this illustrious gala,
operated somewhat unfavourably to the interests of
Sybrandt. Women in general (I mean before they
are married) can scarcely be said to have any
opinions
of their own. They are entirely under the
dominion of fashion. They will not do a thing which
is perfectly innocent, because it is
not
the fashion;
and they will frequently do things unbecoming the
delicacy of the sex, because it
is
the fashion. Nay,
their very virtues appear sometimes to be the sport
of fashionwhich is nothing but the result of the
whims and caprices of nobody knows who; an
emanation
from nobody knows wheresometimes the
eccentricity of a lady of
ton
sometimes the prurient
offspring of the vanity of an opera dancer; and at
others the invention of a fantastic milliner. A dress
may be elegant and becoming to the last degree, yet
if it is out of fashion a lady who aspires to the least
consideration will scarcely dare to be seen in it.
Her very manners and morals, too, are more or less
under the sway of this invisible despot; and ladies
who resist every other species of tyranny submit to
this with the resignation of martyrs. An
unfashionable
dress is death to a fashionable young lady, and
an unfashionable lover purgatory. When a man
once comes to be laughed at in the world of fashion
his time is come,whatever may be his merits, it
is all over with him. Yet notwithstanding these
little foibles of the sex, none but a morose
disappointed
old bachelor will deny that they are delightful
ingredients in the sour cup of life. In infancy, in
manhood, and in old agein our sports, enjoyments,
and relaxations, they are our choicest companions;
in the cares and troubles and disappointments of this
world they are our best solace, our most faithful
friends; and in the last hours of weak humanity,
yea, on the bed of death, they are the ministering
spirits to smooth our pillow, alleviate our sufferings,
and finally close our eyes and wrap us in the
winding-sheet
,
the last clothing of humanity. But what am
I about, prosing away at this rate, when I ought to
be sprinkling my pages with blood, murders,
seduction
and adultery, after the manner of thrice
immortal
club-footed lord and his bloody-minded
imitators
.
C 3
CHAPTER X.
How oft the colours of men's clothes
Their future destinies disclose!
Our
heroine was a womana delightful specimen
of a womanyet still a woman; born, too, before
the commencement of the brilliant era of public
improvement and the progress of mind. I could
never learn that she spoke either French or Italian,
though she certainly did English and Dutch, and
that with a voice of such persuasive music, such
low, irresistible pathos, that Gilfillan often declared
there was no occasion to understand what she said
to be persuaded into any thing. But in truth she
was marvellously behind the present age of
developement
.
She had never in her life attended a
lecture
on chymistrythough she certainly understood
the ingredients of a pudding; and was entirely
ignorant
of the happy art of murdering time in strolling
up and down Broadway all the morning, brought to
such exquisite perfection by the ladies of this
precocious
age. Indeed, she was too kind-hearted to
murder any thing but beaux, and that she did
unwittingly
.
But still she was a woman, and could
not altogether resist the contagion of the ridicule
poured out upon poor Sybrandt's snuff-coloured
inexpressibles
.
Little did she expect the time would
one day come when this would be the fashionable
colour for pantaloons, in which modern Corinthians
would figure at balls and assemblies, to the delight
of the universe.
Being a woman, then, she did not pause to inquire
whether snuff-colour was not in the abstract just as
respectable as blue or red, or even imperial purple.
She tried it by the laws of fashion, and it was found
wanting. Now, there is an indissoluble tie between
a man and his dress. As dress receives a grace
sometimes from the person that wears it, so does it
confer a similar benefit. They cannot be separated
they constitute one being; and hence some
modern
metaphysicians have been exceedingly puzzled
to define the precise line of distinction between a
dandy and his costume. It was by this mysterious
identity of the man and his dress that the fortunes
of our hero came nigh to be utterly shipwrecked.
Catalina confounded the ridicule thrown upon his
snuff-coloured inexpressibles with the man himself;
and he too, for the few hours that the party lasted
and the young lady remained under the influence of
fashion, became ridiculous by the association.
By degrees she found herself growing ashamed
of her old admirer, whose attentions she received
with a certain embarrassment and haughty coolness,
which he saw and felt immediately; for Sybrandt
was no fool, although he did wear a snuff-coloured
suit made by a Dutch tailor. Neither did he lack
one spark of the spirit becoming a man conscious
of his innate superiority over the gilded swarm
around him. The moment he saw the state of
Catalina's feelings, he met her more than half-way,
and intrenched himself behind his old defences of
silent neglect and proud humility. He spoke to her
no more that evening. Though Catalina was
conscious
in her heart that she merited this neglect, still
this was a very different thing from being
satisfied
with it. She became only the more
dissatisfied
at being thus neglected. Gilfillan would not
have behaved so, thought she, while she remembered
how the worse she treated him the more lowly and
attentive he became. She mistook this submission
to her whims or indifference for a proof of superior
love, and therein fell into an error which has been
fatal to the happiness of many a woman, and will be
fatal to that of many more, in spite of all I can say
on the subject. The error I would warn them against
is that of confounding subserviency with affection.
They know little of the hearts of men, if they are
ignorant that the man who loves a woman as he
ought, and whose views are disinterested, will no
more forget what is due to himself than what is due
to his mistress. He will sink into the slave of no
woman, whom he does not intend to make a slave
in return. It is your fortune-hunters alone that
become
the willing victims of caprice, and submit to
every species of mortification the ingenuity of
wayward
vanity can invent, in the hope that this
degrading
vassalage may be at length repaid, not by
the possession of the lady, but her money. It must
be confessed, that the event too often justifies the
expectation. Be this as it may, before the
conclusion
of this important evening the company perceived
evident signs of a coolness between the two lovers;
and Gilfillan, who watched them with the keen
sagacity
of a man of the world, redoubled his
attentions
.
It is hardly necessary to say, that our heroine
received them with redoubled complacencyfor, as
I observed before, she was a woman; and what
woman ever failed to repay the neglect of her lover,
even though occasioned by a fault of her own, with
ample interest? If she thinks to make me jealous,
she is very much mistaken, thought Sybrandt, while
he perspired in an agony of vexation.
The next morning Sybrandt breakfasted at home,
said little, and thought a great dealthe true secret
of being stupid. Mrs. Aubineau asked him fifty
questions about the ball, and especially about Miss
Van Borsum. But she could get nothing out of him,
except that he admired that young lady exceedingly.
This was a great bouncer, but at lovers' perjuries
the quotation is somewhat musty. Catalina
immediately
launched out in praise of Gilfillan, whom she
also declared she admired exceedingly. This was
another bouncer. He amused her and administered
to her vanity; but the truth is, she neither admired
or respected him. Still the attentions of an
aid-de-camp
were what no mortal young lady of that
degenerate
age could bring herself voluntarily to
relinquish
,
at least in New-York. Our hero, though he
had his mouth full of muffin at the moment Catalina
expressed her admiration of Gilfillan, rose from the
table abruptly, and seizing his hat sallied forth into
the street, though Mrs. Aubineau called after to
say she had made an engagement for him that
morning.
Catalina, said Mrs. Aubineau, do you mean
to marry that stupid man in the snuff-coloured
clothes?
He has a great many good qualities.
But he wears snuff-coloured breeches.
He is brave, kind-hearted, generous, and
possesses
knowledge and talents.
Well, but then he wears snuff-coloured breeches.
He has my father's approbation, and
And yours?
He had when I gave it.
But you repent it now? said Mrs. Aubineau,
looking inquiringly into her face.
He saved my life, replied Catalina.
Well, that calls for gratitude, not love.
He saved it twice.
Well, then, you can be twice as grateful; that
will balance the account.
But he saved it four times.
Well, double and quits again.
But, my dear madam, II believenay, I am
sure that I love my cousin in my heart.
What! in his snuff-coloured suit?
Why, I am not quite sure of that, at least here
in New-York among the fine red-coats and bright
epaulettes; but I am quite sure I could love him in
the country.
In his snuff-colours?
In any colours I believe. To tell you the truth,
cousin, I am ashamed of the manner in which I
received
him after an absence of months, and of my
treatment at the ball last night. I believe the evil
spirit beset me.
It was only the spirit of woman, my dear,
whispering you to woo the bright prospect that
beckons you. Do you know you can be a countess
in perspective whenever you please?
Perhaps I might; but I'd rather be a happy wife
than a titled lady.
You would! exclaimed her cousin, lifting up
her eyes and hands in astonishment.
Indeed I would.
Then you must be more or less than woman,
cried the other, panting for breath.
Listen to me, my dear cousin. I know you
meant it all for my happiness in giving encouragement
to Sir Thicknesse and Colonel Gilfillan. But the truth
is, I don't like either of them, and I do like my cousin
Sybrandt. Sir Thicknesse is a proud, stupid dolt,
without heart or understanding; and Colonel
Gilfillan
,
with a thousand good qualities, or rather
impulses
for
he is governed by them entirelyis not,
I fear, nay, I know, a man of integrity or honour.
Not a man of honour! exclaimed Mrs.
Aubineau
again, with uplifted eyes and hands, Why, he
has fought six duels!
But he neither pays his debts nor keeps his
promises
.
He'd fight a fiery dragon.
Yes, but there are men, and very peaceable men,
too, whom he is rather afraid of, said Catalina,
smilinghis tradesmen. The other day I was
walking with him, and was very much surprised at
his insisting we should turn down a little, dirty,
narrow
lane. Just as he had done so he changed his
mind, and was equally importunate with me to turn
into another. I did not think it necessary to comply
with his wishes, and we soon met a tradesman who
respectfully requested to speak with my colonel.
Go to the dl for an impudent scoundrel! cried
he, in a great passion, and lugged me almost rudely
along, muttering, an impudent rascal, to be dunning
a gentleman in the street.
Well?
WellI know enough of these tradesmen to
know that they would not venture to dun an officer
in the street if they could meet with him elsewhere.
The example of my dear father has taught me that
one of the first of our duties is a compliance with
the obligations of justice.
Well Catalina, I must say people get very odd
notions in the country. What do you mean to do
with your admirers?
Why from the behaviour of Sir Thicknesse last
night, I hope I shall be troubled with him no more.
If Colonel Gilfillan calls this morning, I shall take
the opportunity of explaining to him frankly and
explicitly the state of my obligations and affections.
I will appeal to his sense of decorum and propriety
for the discontinuance of his attentions, and if he
still persists, take special care to keep out of his way,
until the state of the river will admit of my going
home.
And I, thought Mrs. Aubineau, shall take
special care to prevent all this.But what do
you mean to do with the man in the snuff-coloured
suit?
Treat him as he merits. I have been much
more to blame than heit is but just, therefore, that
I should make the first advances to a reconciliation.
I shall take the earliest opportunity of doing so, for
his sake as well as my own; for my feelings since
our first meeting here convince me I cannot treat
him with neglect or indifference without sharing in
the consequences.
Well, you are above my comprehension,
Catalina
;
but I can't help loving you. I can have no
wish but for your happiness.
Of that, said Catalina, good-humouredly, I
am perhaps old enough to judge for myself.
I don't know that, my dear. Women can hardly
tell what is for their happiness, until they have been
married a twelvemonth. But what do you mean to
do with yourself to-day?
I mean to stay at home and wait the return of
my cousin. The sooner we come to an understanding
the better.
And I shall go visiting, as I have no
misunderstandings
to settle with good Mr. Aubineau. Good
morningby the time I come back I suppose it will
be all settled. But, my dear Catalina, added she,
suddenly turning back, and addressing her with great
earnestnessmy dear friend, do try and persuade
him to discard his snuff-coloured suit, will you?
I shall leave that to you, cousin; for my part I
mean to endure it as a punishment for my bad
behaviour
to the owner. But Catalina never had an
opportunity of putting her heroic resolution into
practice.
CHAPTER XI.
A good Resolution sometimes comes a day after the Fair.
Sybrandt
had proceeded directly from Mr.
Aubineau's
to the quarters of Colonel Gilfillan, with a
design
of explaining to him his claims on Catalina, and
demanding a relinquishment of his attentions. He
was told the colonel had stepped out for a few minutes,
and requested to wait his return. During the interval
he happened to take up a music-book which lay on
the table. It opened of itself, and a miniature picture
fell from it on the floor. Sybrandt took it up with
the intention of replacing it, when to his dismay and
horror he discovered in it the likeness of Catalina,
which Gilfillan, with an inexcusable want of
delicacy
and propriety, had procured to be copied from
the original while in his possession. The blood of
Sybrandt rushed to his heart, and thence to his face
and fingers' ends, where it tingled and burnt like liquid
fire. He stood trembling with rage and anguish,
the picture in his hand, when Gilfillan entered and
was beginning in his gayest tones, with
My dear Mr. Westbrook, by my soul you're
welcomewhen Sybrandt interrupted him without
ceremonyColonel Gilfillan, when I inform you
I have a deep interest in the question, I hope you
will answer it franklyMay I ask where you
procured
this picture?
Gilfillan felt himself in the predicament of one
who has been detected in doing what he cannot
justify; he therefore sheltered himself under an air
of haughty indifference: added to this, our hero's
snuff-coloured suit did him another ill turn here. It
impressed upon the mind of Gilfillan that he had to
do with a clodhopper of the first magnitude, whom
he might banter, or bully, or quiz at pleasure. Never
man was more mistaken than Colonel Gilfillan. He
little suspected this homely suit covered a man that
would not turn out of the path he had chosen for any
thing in the shape of man. He accordingly replied,
with a careless if not contemptuous hauteur,
Certainly, MisteraaMister Westbrook,
you are at perfect liberty to ask any question of
mebut allow me to observe, it depends upon myself
whether I choose to answer.
But, sir, you will permit me to say you
must
do
me the favour to answer this question.
Must! you don't say so, sir?
Look ye, Colonel Gilfillan, this is no time for
trifling
;
nor will I permit you to trifle on this
occasion
.
Is it known to you that an engagement
subsists
between the original of that picture and myself,
sanctioned by her parents?
By my soul, Mr. Westbrook, it is a matter of
perfect indifference whether there does or not. If a
lady makes an engagement I suppose she has a right
to break an engagement when she is tired of it; and,
by the glory of the stars! I am the man that will
assist her any time in such a praiseworthy
undertaking
.
Very well then, I am to presume you were
acquainted
with the circumstance?
You may presume what you please, Mr.
Westbrook
it's
all one to me.
You will not gratify my inquiries, then, though I
have, I trust, justified the interest I have a right to
take in the affairs of this young lady?
Faith will not I, replied the colonel, carelessly.
Then let me tell you, sir Sybrandt's voice
rung, his colour heightened, and his eye flashed.
Hold there, young gentleman, interrupted the
colonel. From the tone of your voice, and the
flash of your eye, I gather you are going to say
something disagreeable; take care what you
do
say.
I say to your caution what you were pleased to
say to my informationthat it is a matter of perfect
indifference to me. And I further say, Colonel
Gilfillan
,
that I neither recognise in your preceding or
your present conduct any thing that entitles you to
particular respect.
Before you go any further, my friend, let me ask
you a civil question,will you fight?For it must
come to that if you say the thousandth part of such
another word.
Sybrandt went to the table, and in an instant
presented
a paper to the colonel, on which were the
following
words:
Meet me at six to-morrow morning, at Hoboken,
and I'll answer your question.
The colonel was somewhat startled at this prompt
dealing in a man in a snuff-coloured suit. He was
not frightenednothing on earth could frighten him,
except a dun,but he was seized with an involuntary
respect for the snuff-coloured gentleman, that made
him almost regret having treated him so cavalierly.
He changed his tone instantly. He kept his eye
on the paper as he continued asking questions.
At six to-morrow?
At six
With pistols did you say?
With pistols, if you please, or
O, it's all the same to me. Mr. Westbrook, let
me ask you one questiondo you mean to make
your will beforehand? because, if you do, I wish
you'd leave me that picture after your death, as you
don't seem inclined to give it me while alive.
Sybrandt had all this while held the picture in his
clenched hand, almost unconsciously. But on being
thus reminded of it, he threw it contemptuously on
the table.
Now that is treating the original discourteously,
said the colonel, taking it up; and upon my soul,
if you had not been beforehand with me I should
have picked a quarrel with you for it. Faith, a
charming lady, and I'll wear her image next my heart
to-morrow.
So saying, he coolly deposited the picture in his
bosom, and Sybrandt inwardly vowed to himself
that he would aim right at the faithless resemblance.
We understand each other now, Colonel
Gilfillan
?
O faith, there can be no misunderstanding in
such plain English.
Good morning then, colonel.
Good morning, Mr. Westbrook, answered the
colonel. Now, who the dl would have taken
that snuff-coloured breeches for a lad of such
mettle
?
I am determined to be friends with him the
very next minute after I've blown his brains out.
The colonel was here suddenly interrupted by a
message from his excellency requiring his immediate
attendance. He accordingly hurried off to the
government-house, while Sybrandt slowly turned
towards
the mansion of Mr. Aubineau, where Catalina
was anxiously waiting to put her good resolutions
in practice. A storm of contending passions
agitated
his mind, and when he came in sight of the
house he turned away heart-sick with his wounded
feelings, and wandered for hours in the fields that
skirted the city. Sometimes he determined to
depart
without seeing Catalina, and at others to see her
once more, reproach her with having trifled with his
happiness, and then bid farewell for ever.
CHAPTER XII.
Gilfillan and Sybrandt set out on a long journey.
Gilfillan
, in the mean time, had an interview with
the governor, who informed him that a packet had
just arrived from England with despatches apprizing
him war had been declared between that country
and France, and directing him to make immediate
preparations to defend the frontier against the inroads
of the French and Indians.
It is necessary to notify the commanding officer
at Ticonderoga with the least possible delay, and
that the bearer of the message be acquainted with
my views on the subject. I have selected you for
that purpose. When can you be ready, colonel?
To-morrow morning, at eight o'clock.
That won't do; you must be ready to-day; a
vessel is waiting for you.
Impossible, sir, exclaimed Gilfillan, abruptly,
remembering his engagement with Sybrandt.
How? impossible! why, what can prevent you?
you are a single man, and a soldier should be ready
at a moment's warning.
But, your excellency, I have an engagement
which I cannot violate.
With a lady?
No, a gentleman.
Well, I will make vour excuses; so be ready in
three hours
Impossible, cried Gilfillan again.
His excellency looked offended.
Colonel Gilfillan, said he, I cannot conceive
any engagement possible which can excuse a soldier
from the performance of his duty to his country.
An affair of honour, sir?
No, not even an affair of honour, colonel. Your
first duty is to your country; she has bought your
services by bestowing honours on your, and you
have no right to throw away a life which belongs to
her. To whom are you pledged?
To Mr. Westbrook, sir.
Whew! ejaculated his excellency; I
understand
the business now. But you shall place your
honour in my hands, and I pledge you mine to make
such explanations as shall save you harmless. Go,
and be ready.
Gilfillan still lingered. Colonel Gilfillan, said
the governor, firmly, either obey my orders or
deliver
me your sword. My business is pressing;
yours may be deferred to another day; and I again
pledge myself that your honour shall suffer no stain.
Gilfillan reflected a moment, and coldly replied,
I will be ready in one hour.
Go, then, and make what preparations you can,
and be here within that time. I will finish your
despatches
.
Gilfillan returned to his lodgings, and the first
thing he did was to send the following note.
TO SYBRANDT WESTBROOK, ESQ.
Sir,
You will soon hear that war is declared
between the cock and the lion; and this is to inform
you that his excellency ordered me with
despatches
to the frontier. I must depart in an hour;
consequently the settlement of our little private
affair must lie over for the present. But there is a
time for all things, and we must wait with patience.
When you can wait no longer, you will find me,
probably, somewhere about Lake George or
Ticonderoga
.
You know the motto of my family is
Ready, ay ready. Adieu for the present.
B. F. M.
Gilfillan
.
His next step was to stride away to the mansion
of Mr. Aubineau, for the purpose of bidding
farewell
to Catalina, whom he surprised in a deep revery,
waiting the return of Sybrandt.
Colonel Gilfillan, said she, haughtily, and in
displeasure at being thus interrupted, I neither
wished nor expected this visit.
Do not be angry, madam; I come to bid you
a long farewell. The calumet is buried, the
tomahawk
is dug up, and the two old bruisers are going
to have another set-to.
Explain yourself, colonel.
War, bloody war, madam. I set out in one
hour for the frontier, and heaven only knows
whether
you will see poor Gilfillan again. Give him
some hope; something to live upon when he is
starving in the wilderness; some little remembrance
to cheer him if he lives, or to hug to his heart
when dying.
I cannot hear such language, Colonel Gilfillan.
Listen to me seriously, for I am going to speak
seriously. I have been vain, silly, and unreflecting
in suffering, as I have done, your attentions, flighty
and half-jest as they seemed. I never thought you
in earnest.
Vol. II.D
Not in earnest! heavenly powers! have not
my eyes, my tongue, my actions, my heart, a
thousand
times proved the sincerity of my passion. I
loved you the first minute I saw you, and I shall
love you the last moment I see the light of day.
I am sorry for it.
Sorry for it! sorry that a warm-hearted and,
I will add, a generous, honourable soldier casts his
heart at your feet, lives in your smiles, and holds
his life at a pin's fee, when he dreams he can lay
it down in your service? Upon my soul, madam,
I can't for the soul of me see any cause for sorrow
in that.
I would not be the cause of misery to any
human being.
Ah! that's just what I love to hear you say.
Then you willyou will be the cause of happiness
to your poor servant?
I cannot in the way you wish.
No! and why not, jewel of the world?
I cannot return your affections.
Faith, madam, and that is the last thing I wish.
I don't want you to return my affections, only just
to give me your own in exchange.
My affections are not in my power.
You puzzle me, angel of obscurity. Upon my
soul, if we haven't power over our affections, I don't
know what else we can command. I should as
soon doubt my power to command a corporal's
guard as my own heart.
In one word, Colonel Gilfillan, I am engaged to
another.
O, that's only your hand.
My heart went with it, sir.
Yes, but you took it back again?
No, sir, I gave it to Mr. Westbrook, and for
ever.
The man with the snuff-coloured breeches!
Js, what is this world coming to? thought
Colonel
Gilfillan. Then, overpowered by the genuine
ardour of a brave and enterprising Milesian, he
poured forth a flood of passionate eloquence. He
besought her to love him, to marry him, to run away
with him, to pity him, and, finally, to kill him on
the spot. He fell on his knees, and there remained
in spite of all her entreaties and commands. She
was offendedwhat woman would not have been?
She pitied himwhat woman would not have
done so? He seized her hands, and kissed them
from right to left in a transport of impetuosity,
and was gradually working himself up into a
forgetfulness
of all created things, except himself
and his mistress, when he was awakened by the
apparition of a man in a snuff-coloured suit just
within side the door. He started on his feet chock
full of blood, murder, and love.
I beg pardon, exclaimed the snuff-coloured
apparition. I beg pardon for my accidental
intrusion
.
Don't let me interrupt you, colonel, and
straightway it disappeared.
Catalina started on her feet. Leave me, sir,
cried she, with angry vehemence. Leave me this
very instant, sir. You have destroyed my
happiness
for ever; and she burst into a passion of
tears.
The generous soul of Gilfillan was moved with
this appearance of strong agony. If, thought
he, she really loves this snuff-coloured man, I am
the last person to disturb a mutual affection. Faith,
I see it's all over with me; and now for the
tomahawk
D 2
and scalping knife. By my soul, I feel just
now as if I could drink the blood of a Christian; as
to your copper-coloured Pagans, by the glory of my
ancestors, I'll pepper them.
At the conclusion of these wise reflections, he
advanced
towards Catalina, who retired with evident
symptoms of fear and aversion.
Miss Vancour, said Gilfillan, with solemnity,
do you really love this snuff-coloured gentleman?
I doI have reason to love him; he twice saved
my life.
Then upon my soul, madam, I am sorry for what
I have done, and ask your pardon.
He was proceeding to repeat the petition on his
knees, when Catalina exclaimed with precipitation,
O! for Heaven's sake, no more of that!
Well then, madam, be assured that all that man
can do to undo the harm I have done I will doand
so farewellmay you be ten thousand times happier
than I should have been had you preferred me, and
that's altogether impossible. So saying, he bowed
with proud humility, leaving Catalina in that state
of misery which combines the agony of the heart
with the feeling of self-condemnation. Had not
my vanity tempted me to encourage this man,
thought she, I should have been spared the
mortification
of this present moment, the wretchedness I
see in the future. The fault is all my ownwould
that the punishment might be so too; but I have
wounded two generous, noble hearts.
On the departure of Gilfillan, Sybrandt in a state
of desperation forced himself into the presence of
our heroine, with a magnanimous resolution of
relinquishing
his claims, and declaring her free to marry
whom she pleased. She received him with deep
humility, from whence all the pride of woman was
banished. She attempted a faltering explanation.
Sybrandtsaid sheSybrandtII have
something to say to youI
It is unnecessary; I know it all, replied he,
proudly interrupting her. Farewell, Catalinayou
are free!
A few hours after he was on his way to Albany.
Gilfillan's note had apprized him of the necessary
postponement of their meeting, and he hoped to
overtake him at Albany, and there frankly relinquish
all claim to Catalina. It was a hard struggle
between revenge and a nobler feeling. Colonel
Gilfillan
,
however, kept the start of him, and some time
elapsed before they met again. Sybrandt returned
home and buried his secret in his own bosom. When
questioned by Colonel or Madam Vancour on the
subject of Catalina, he answered sometimes with
embarrassment, sometimes with negligence. They
suspected something disagreeable had occurred, yet
could not tell what. But public events soon
occurred which occupied the almost exclusive
attention
of Colonel Vancour and his family. Rumours
of wars, of burnings and massacres on the frontier,
coming nearer and nearer every day, brought the sense
of danger home to the very bosoms of the people of
Albany and of the flats. Rural quiet was banished
from the firesides of the peaceful Dutchmen; rural
occupations ceased in the fruitful fields, and Ceres and
Cupid, and all their train of harvests, flowers, fruits,
sighs, smiles, hopes, wishes, promises, and deceits,
gave place to gloomy anticipations of blood and
massacre. Even little Ariel lost his vivacity at times,
and no longer talked of ringing the pigs' noses. He
took down his rusty musket, and polished it as bright
as silver. He employed himself in running bullets
and other warlike preparations, and even meditated
joining the army at Ticonderoga. Damn it,
Sybrandt
,
would he say, suppose you and I make a
campaign, hey?
CHAPTER XIII.
Adieu a while to the Dutchman's Fireside.
Sybrandt
not only meditated, but had determined
on such a course. About this time his old friend and
host, Sir William Johnson, paid a visit to Colonel
Vancour, to arrange with him a plan for subsisting
the army in the uncultivated regions of Lakes George
and Champlain. Sybrandt took the opportunity to
offer his services, and Sir William gladly accepted
them. I want a volunteer aid, said he, and you
are the very man. When can you be ready?
In five minutes.
Good; I like short answers, they are the signs
of prompt actions. I will give you till the day after
to-morrow.
Sybrandt went immediately to the good Dennis
to announce his intention, and ask his consent to be
a soldier. There was at that time a latent spark of
warlike spirit alive in the bosom of the peaceful
cultivators
of the field. Every where the proximity of
the Indians made a residence near the frontier, or
indeed far from the cities and military stations, one
of danger and alarm, and kept up a feeling of manly
preparation.
Thou shalt go, my boy. I am too old now to
go myself, and thou shalt be my substitute. Thou
shalt take the best horse from my stable; the truest
servant of my household, and the warmest blessing
of my heart, and go forth.
Sybrandt set about his preparations, and tried to
banish every thing else from his recollection. The
morning after his conversation with Sir William, he
went over to Colonel Vancour's to tell him he was
ready. The colonel and madam looked
inquisitively
in his face, and wondered if he would leave
any message or letter for Catalina. But he never
mentioned her name. I must send for my daughter
home, thought the good colonel. I am glad this
foolish engagement is broken off, thought his good
wife; and her silk gown rustled with conscious pride
at the thought of still living to be the mother of a
real titled lady. That evening Sybrandt visited
some of his old haunts. I will see them before I
go; perhaps I may never see them again. So he
rambled out by himself alone, in the mild twilight
of an early spring day. The sacred calm of the
country, so different from the racket of the noisy
town, disposed his soul to the tenderest melancholy.
Past scenes and early recollections thronged on his
memory, while he wandered along his accustomed
paths, where every object reminded him of the
woman who had trifled with his affections, and
inflicted in his heart an incurable wound. By
degrees, the thought of her ill treatment roused
a salutary feeling of indignation; wounded pride
came to the relief of his morbid sensibility. He
shook the incumbent weight of sickly lassitude from
his spirit, wiped the starting tear from his eye, and
returned home with a manly resolution to meet his
future fortunes, whatever these might be, with
fortitude
and resignation.
Sybrandt, said Colonel Vancour, on taking
leave after supper,Sybrandt, have you written
to Catalina?
No, sir.
Have you received any letters from her since
your return?
None, sir.
And what does all this mean, young man?
It means, sir, replied Sybrandt, almost choking
with wounded pride and feeling,it means that
she will one day tell you what it meansI
cannot
.
The next day Colonel Vancour wrote to his
daughter to return home, under the protection of the
wife of an officer he knew was on the eve of joining
the army on the frontier.
By daylight Sir William and his aid joined a
detachment
on its march to Ticonderoga under the
temporary command of the former. They rode for
some distance, now and then encountering a solitary
habitation; but leaving Glenn's Falls all traces
of civilized man were lost in the vast uncultivated
empire of nature. The corps which our hero
accompanied
formed part of a crack regiment,
distinguished
for its technical discipline, exquisite
neatness
,
and veteran service in the wars of Europe.
The soldiers were proud of their snow-white
pantaloons
,
and the officers valued themselves on the
splendours of their embroidery and epaulettes,
which only furnished a mark for the savages, and
cost many a gallant warrior his life. The first thing
Sir William did was to attempt initiating them into
some of the modes of Indian warfare. He set the
officers the example of doffing their rich military
accountrements, and substituting a common soldier's
coat, with the skirts cut off. He denounced all
displays
of glittering finery, which answered no other
purpose here than enabling the savages to descry the
D 3
march of an enemy at a distance. The gunbarrels
were blackened for the same purpose; and for boots
and spatterdashes he substituted Indian leggins of
strong coarse cloth. But what mortified the vanity
of these military heroes more than all, was his
peremptory
order to crop their fine powdered hair,
which at that time was considered the most valued
ornament of a soldier. The detachment had
moreover
been provided with a mighty kitchen apparatus
of chairs, tables, cooking utensils, and other luggage,
which, however convenient in European wars, was
here in the wilderness a useless, nay, a dangerous
encumbrance. It rendered their march through the
tangled woods and untrodden paths more slow and
difficult, and embarrassed them in the day of battle.
Sir William, the first halt they made for
refreshment
,
invited the officers to dine with him in his tent.
Instead of chairs and tables, they found only
bear-skins
spread on the ground, and their host seated on
a log of wood, ready to receive them. When the
dinner was brought in, which consisted of a large
dish of pork and pease, Sir William coolly took out
of his pocket a leathern pouch, and drawing forth a
knife and fork, deliberately and with great gravity
divided the meat, helping each to a portion. The
gentlemen looked round for implements with which
to eat their meat, but finding none, remained in
awkward
and indignant embarrassment.
Gentlemen, said he, at length, is it possible
that soldiers destined for a service like ours have
come without the necessary implements of this kind?
Did you expect to find in the wilderness of America
the means or the opportunity of enjoying the same
luxuries and conveniences afforded in the heart of
Europe? But you must not lose your dinner,
added he, smiling, and directing the servant to
furnish
each of the guests with a knife and fork similar
to his own, which he desired them to preserve with
care. It will be difficult to supply their loss where
we are going, said he.
The officers, who were proud of their experience
in the splendid wars of Europe, where the theatre
was a world, and the spectators the people of a
world, received these lessons of wisdom and
experience
as little less than insults. To be lectured by
a PROVINCIAL OFFICER!it was not to be borne!
What could he know about the science of war, or
the discipline of great armies, who never saw ten
thousand regular troops together in his life? They
grumbled, and put on the air of proud, enforced
submission
.
But Sir William Johnson was not a man
to be turned from his purpose by murmurs or
opposition
.
He had been accustomed to be his own
master and the master of others in the wilderness.
He had, by the exercise of courage, talents, energy,
and perseverance, conquered the stubborn minds of
the proudest, the most daring and impracticable race
that ever trod the earth, either in the Old or the New
World. In short, among savage and civilized men
he exercised the only divine right ever conferred on
manthe right of leading and being obeyed on the
ground of superior physical and mental energies.
Sybrandt admired and studied the character of
this singular man, who combined as much mental
and physical power as was ever perhaps
concentrated
in one individual. But our hero continued,
notwithstanding his heroic resolution to shake off the
depression of his spirits, to labour under the
night-mare
of indolent, gloomy lassitude. He spoke only
when spoken to, and displayed little alacrity in
performing
those military duties which Sir William
committed to him, principally with a view to rouse
his dormant energies into action. One day, as they
were slowly ascending the mountain which bounds
the southern extremity of Lake George, Sybrandt
was more silent and abstracted than usual.
Young man, abruptly exclaimed Sir William,
young man, are you in love yet?
Sybrandt was startled; and the red consciousness
shone in his face.
I am answered, said Sir William; there is a
written confession in your face. But look! we are
at the summit of the mountain. The water you see
studded with green islands, and bounded by those
mountains tipped with gold, is Lake George. At the
extremity of Lake George is Ticonderoga; at
Ticonderoga is glory and danger. Resolve this
instant to be a man; to devote yourself to the present
and the future; to forget the past, at least so far as
it interferes with the great duties a soldier owes to
his country; or return home this instant. Young
man, I did not bring you here to ruminate, but to
act.
Sybrandt rode close up to him, and exclaimed, in
a low, suppressed tone
Sir William Johnson, show me an enemy, and
I will show myself a man.
Good! cried Sir William, slapping him on the
shoulder, good! I see you only want action; and
by my soul. I will take care you shall have enough
of it. They descended the mountain, and were
accommodated that night in Fort George, close on
the margin of the lake,that beautiful lake, to
which neither poetry nor painting can do justice, and
which combines within itself every charm that
constitutes
the divinity of nature. It was then the
mirror of a wilderness; now it reflects in its bosom
all the charms of cultivation. Hither, in the
summer
season, when tired of the desperate monotony
of Ballston and Saratoga, the wandering devotees
of fashion, who seek pleasure every where except
where it is to be found, resort, to become
ennui
with the beauties of nature, as they have with the
allurements of art. It is indeed a charming scene
for love, music, poetry, and inspiration; to indulge
in luxurious reveries; to recall past times, meditate
on future prospects, or gaze enraptured on the
sublime
and beautiful combination before us, and
perchance
recall
Some ditty of the anclent day,
When the heart was in the lay.
CHAPTER XIV.
Sybrandt begins to act instead of think.
After
resting one night at Fort George, they
proceeded in boats which were waiting for them
down the lake, and in good time arrived at
Ticonderoga
.
Here Sir William turned over the
reinforcement
he had brought with him to its proper
division, and himself took command of the
provincials
and Indian allies; the latter consisting of the
warriors of the Five Nations. The situation of
Ticonderoga, or
Old Ti
, as it is familiarly called,
enables it to command the best route between
Canada and New-York, and, consequently, it had
always been a bone of contention between the
French and English, while the former possessed the
Canadas and the latter the United States. At the
period of which I am now speaking here was
assembled
the finest army that had hitherto been
collected in one body in the New World, as to
numbers, discipline, and appointments.
The commander was a brave, experienced, and
capable officer; but he knew little of the nature of
an irregular warfare in the wilderness against savages
and woodmen, and, what was far worse, was too
proud to learn. He might have found in Colonel
Vancour and Sir William Johnson most able and
efficient instructers; but he could not brook the idea
of being schooled by
provincials
, and gloomy were
the forebodings of these two experienced
gentlemen
,
during their last conference, that the obstinacy
of the commanding general, in applying the tactics
of Europe to this warfare of the woods, would be
fatal to the expedition, and occasion the defeat, if
not the destruction, of this fine army.
Sir William was not a man to be idle in such
stirring times, or, indeed, at any time, and he
determined
that Sybrandt should have little leisure for
devouring his own heart in idleness and
disappointment
.
He accordingly detached him on various
services; sometimes to gain information of the
motions
of the enemy, who were said to be advancing
in force; sometimes with parties down Lake George
to the fort of that name, which was a principal dept
of supplies from Albany; and at others to scour
the woods in search of vagrant parties of hostile
Indians, of whom large numbers were attached to
the army of the enemy. In all these services
Sybrandt
acquitted himself with courage and
discretion
.
Bravo, would Sir William exclaim; you
were made for a soldierto command, not to obey
to lead men, not to be led by a woman. I see I
shall make something of you. To-night I shall put
you to the knife, and try your metal to the utmost.
I am ready, answered Sybrandt.
Listen then, replied Sir William. Our general
is a good soldier and an able officer, so far as mere
bravery and an acquaintance with European tactics
go. But he is not fit to command here; he is not
the Moses to lead armies through the wilderness.
He is ignorant of his enemy, and undervalues him;
bad, both bad. He has not the least conception
that an army of savages may be within twenty feet
of him, and he neither see nor hear them. He
cannot
divest himself of the absurd notion, that they
must have baggage-wagons, and horses for their
artillery, and depts of provisions, and all the
paraphernalia
of a regular army on the plains of
Flanders
.
He does not know that an army of savages
are neither heard nor seen till they are felt, that they
travel like the wind, and with as little encumbrance
as the wind. He will consequently be taken by
surprise and cut to pieces, unless I and my
provincials
and red-skins make up for his careless folly
by our wise vigilance. Now to the point.
From various indications, which none but an
Indian or a backwoodsman can comprehend, I am
fully satisfied that the enemy is in much greater force
than he chooses to have believed; and this is what
I want to be certain of before to-morrow morning,
because I have been apprized by the general, that
he considers it disgraceful to his majesty's arms to
be cooped up in a fort by an inferior enemy. He
means to march out in battle array to-morrow, with
drums beating, colours flying, and every other device
to apprize the enemy of his motions. If he does,
it requires not the spirit of prophecy to predict that
he will sacrifice, not only the interests of his country,
but the lives of hundreds, perhaps thousands, of
brave men. The service is perilous; why should
I disguise it? it is almost certain death; but you
are no common man; nay, I don't flatter you. I
would pledge my life on your marching up to the
cannon's mouth without winking an eye, if it were
necessary. I would go myself on this service, but my
rank and the command I hold makes it impossible.
Name the service, Sir William. Life is of little
value to me, and if
Pish! exclaimed the knight, impatiently.
Disgust of life is an ignoble impulse to heroic
actions
.
I wish you to be animated by the love of your
country and the desire of glory. Such motives are
alone worthy of the man who risks his life in
undertakings
of extreme peril.
Sir William Johnson, replied Sybrandt, proudly,
you are my superior in rank and in merit, if you
please, but this gives you no right to insult my
feelings
,
nor am I inclined to submit to it. As a
soldier
,
do with me as you please.
You are right, young man, and I beg your
pardon
.
Well then, let your motive be what you
please; if not ambition, love; both are equally
powerful, if not equally noble. If your mistress is
true, she will rejoice in your success; if she is
false, the most noble revenge you can take will be
to make her regret having lost the opportunity of
participating in your fame. Give me your hand;
are we friends again?
Sybrandt received it with an acknowledgment
of grateful and affectionate respect.
What escort am I to have? asked he.
None; an escort would inevitably betray you.
A boat and a single man to row it is all I can allow
you.
As you please; I am satisfied.
Sir William then proceeded to instruct him in the
course he was to pursue. To go on this expedition
by land would subject him to inevitable discovery.
He was therefore to be furnished with an Indian
canoe, with a single man to paddle it, and under
cover of the night, which promised to be sufficiently
dark, proceed silently down the narrow strait into
Lake Champlain, only so far as that he could return
with certainty before daylight. He was enjoined
not to neglect this, for the narrowness of the strait,
lined as it was without doubt by parties of skulking
Indians, would expose him to certain death, if once
seen.
Should you discover the position of the enemy,
continued he, you must depend upon your own
sagacity, and that of Timothy Weasel for the
direction
of your subsequent conduct.
Timothy Weasel! who is he?
What! have you never heard of Timothy
Weasel
,
the Varmounter, as he calls himself?
Never.
Well then, I must give you a sketch of his story
before I introduce him. He was born in
New-Hampshire
,
as he says, and in due time, as is
customary
in those parts, married, and took possession,
by right of discovery I suppose, of a tract of land
in what was at that time called the New-Hampshire
grants. Others followed him, and in the course of
a few years a little settlement was formed of real
'cute Yankees, as Timothy calls them, to the amount
of sixty or seventy men, women, and children.
They were gradually growing in wealth and
numbers
,
when one night, in the dead of winter, they
were set upon by a party of Indians from Canada,
and every soul of them, except Timothy, either
consumed in the flames or massacred in the attempt
to escape. I have witnessed in the course of my
life many scenes of horror, but nothing like that
which he describes, in which his wife and eight
children
perished. Timothy was left for dead by the
savages, who, as is their custom, departed at the
dawn, for fear the news of this massacre might
rouse some of the neighbouring settlements, in time
to overtake them before they reached home. When
all was silent, Timothy, who, though severely
wounded in a dozen places, had, as he says, only
been playing' possum,' raised himself up and looked
around him. The smoking ruins, mangled limbs,
blood-stained snow, and the whole scene, as he
describes it with quaint pathos, is enough to make
one's blood run cold. He managed to raise himself
upright, and, by dint of incredible exertions, to reach
a neighbouring settlement, distant about forty miles,
where he told his story, and then was put to bed,
where he lay some weeks. In the mean time the
people of the settlement had gone and buried the
remains of his unfortunate family and neighbours.
When Timothy got well, he visited the spot, and
while viewing the ruins of the houses, and
pondering
over the graves of all that were dear to him,
solemnly devoted the remainder of his life to revenge.
He accordingly buried himself in the woods, and
built a cabin about twelve miles from hence, in a
situation the most favourable to killing the kritters,
as he calls the savages. From that time until
now he has waged a perpetual war against them,
and, according to his own account, sacrificed almost
a hecatomb to the manes of his wife and children.
His intrepidity is wonderful, and his sagacity in the
pursuit of this grand object of his life beyond all
belief. I am half a savage myself, but I have heard
this man relate stories of his adventures and escapes
which make me feel myself, in the language of the
red skins, `a woman' in comparison with this
strange compound of cunning and simplicity. It is
inconceivable with what avidity he will hunt an
Indian
;
and the keenest sportsman does not feel a
hundredth part of the delight in bringing down his
game, that Timothy does in witnessing the mortal
pangs of one of these `kritters.' It is a horrible
propensity: but to lose all in one night, and to
wake the next morning and see nothing but the
mangled remains of wife, children, all that man
holds most close to his inmost heart, is no trifle. If
ever man had motive for revenge, it is Timothy.
Such as he is, I employ him, and find his services
highly useful. He is a compound of the two races,
and combines all the qualities essential to the
species
of warfare in which we are now engaged. I
have sent for him, and expect him here every
moment
.
As Sir William concluded, Sybrandt heard a
long dry sort of H-e-e-m-m, ejaculated just
outside of the door. That's he, exclaimed Sir
William; I know the sound. It is his usual
expression
of satisfaction at the prospect of being
employed
against his old enemies the `kritters.' Come
in, Timothy.
Timothy accordingly made his appearance, forgot
his bow, and said nothing. Sybrandt eyed his
associate
with close attention. He was a tall, wind-dried
man, with extremely sharp, angular features, and a
complexion of course bronzed by the exposures to
which he had been subjected for so many years. His
scanty head of hair was of a sort of sunburnt colour;
his beard of a month's growth at least, and his eye of
sprightly blue never rested a moment in its socket.
It glanced from side to side, and up and down, and
here and there, with indescribable rapidity, as though
in search of some object of interest, or apprehensive
of sudden danger. It was a perpetual silent alarum.
Timothy, said Sir William, I want to employ
you to-night.
H-e-m-m, answered Timothy.
Are you at leisure to depart immediately?
What, right off?
Ay, in less than no time.
I guess I am.
Very wellthat means you are certain.
I'm always sartin of my mark.
Have you your gun with you?
The kritter is just outside the door.
And plenty of ammunition?
Why, what under the sun should I do with a gun
and no ammunition?
Can you paddle a canoe so that nobody can
hear you?
Can't I? h-e-e-m-m!
And you are all ready?
I 'spect so. I knew you didn't want me for
nothing, and so got every thing to hand.
Have you any thing to eat by the way?
No; if I only stay out two or three days I sha'n't
want any thing.
But you are to have a companion.
Timothy here manufactured a sort of
linsey-wool-sey
grunt, betokening disapprobation.
I'd rather go alone.
But it is necessary you should have a
companion
;
this young gentleman will go with you.
Timothy hereupon subjected Sybrandt to a rigid
scrutiny of those busy eyes of his, that seemed to
run over him as quick as lightning.
I'd rather go by myself, said he again.
That is out of the question, so say no more
about it. Are you ready to go nowthis minute?
Yes.
Sir William then explained the object of the
expedition
to Timothy much in the same manner he had
previously done to Sybrandt.
But mayn't I shoot one of these tarnil kritters if
he comes in my way? said Timothy, in a tone of
great interest.
No; you are not to fire a gun, nor attempt any
hostility whatever, unless it is neck or nothing with
you.
Well, that's what I call hard; but maybe it will
please God to put our lives in dangerthat's some
comfort.
The knight now produced two Indian dresses,
which he directed them to put on, somewhat against the
inclinations of friend Timothy, who observed that if
he happened to see his shadow in the water he should
certainly mistake it for one of the tarnil kritters, and
shoot himself. Sir William then with his own hand
painted the face of Sybrandt so as to resemble that
of an Indianan operation not at all necessary to
Timothy; his toilet was already made; his
complexion
required no embellishment. This done, the
night having now set in, Sir William, motioning
silence, led the way cautiously to one of the gates
of Ticonderoga, which was opened by the sentinel,
and they proceeded swiftly and silently to the high
bank which hung over the narrow strait in front of
the fort. A little bark canoe lay moored at the foot,
into which Sybrandt and Timothy placed
themselves
flat on the bottom, each with his musket
and accoutrements at his side, and a paddle in his
hand.
Now, said Sir William, almost in a whisper,
now, luck be with you, boys; remember, you
are to return before daylight without fail.
But, Sir William, said Timothy, coaxingly,
now,
mayn't
I take a pop at one of the tarnal
kritters
,
if I meet 'em?
I tell you, No! replied the other; unless you
wish to be popped out of the world when you come
back. Away with you, my boys.
Each seized his paddle; and the light feather of
a boat darted away with the swiftness of a bubble in
a whirlpool.
CHAPTER XV.
A Night Adventure.
It's
plaguy hard, muttered Timothy to
himself
.
What? quoth Sybrandt.
Why, not to have the privilege of shooting one
of these varmints.
Not another word, whispered Sybrandt; we
may be overheard from the shore.
Does he think I don't know what's what?
again muttered Timothy, plying his paddle with a
celerity and silence that Sybrandt vainly tried to
equal.
The night gradually grew dark as pitch. All
became of one colour, and the earth and the air
were confounded together in utter obscurity, at least
to the eyes of Sybrandt Westbrook. Not a breath
of wind disturbed the foliage of the trees, that hung
invisible to all eyes but those of Timothy, who
seemed to see best in the dark; not an echo, not a
whisper disturbed the dead silence of nature, as they
darted along unseen and unseeing,at least our
hero could see nothing but darkness.
Whisht! aspirated Timothy, at length, so low
that he could scarcely hear himself; and after
making a few strokes with his paddle, so as to shoot
the boat out of her course, cowered himself down to
the bottom. Sybrandt did the same, peering just
over the side of the boat, to discover if possible the
reason of Timothy's manuvres. Suddenly he
heard, or thought he heard, the measured sound
of paddles dipping lightly into the water. A few
minutes more, and he saw five or six little lights
glimmering indistinctly through the obscurity,
apparently
at a great distance. Timothy raised
himself
up suddenly, seized his gun, and pointed it for
a moment at one of the lights; but recollecting the
injunction of Sir William, immediately resumed his
former position. In a few minutes the sound of
the paddles died away, and the lights disappeared.
What was that? whispered Sybrandt.
The Frenchmen are turning the tables on us, I
guess, replied the other. If that boat isn't going
a-spying jist like ourselves, I'm quite out in my
calculation
.
What! with lights? They must be great
fools.
It was only the fire of their pipes, which the
darkness made look like so many candles. I'm
thinking what a fine mark these lights would have
bin; and how I could have peppered two or three
of them, if Sir William had not bin so plaguy
obstinate
.
Peppered them! why, they were half-a-dozen
miles off.
They were within fifty yardsthe kritters; I
could have broke all their pipes as easy as kiss my
hand.
How do you know they were kritters, as you
call the Indians!
Why, did you ever hear so many Frenchmen
make so little noise?
This reply was perfectly convincing; and
Sybrandt
Vol. II.E
again enjoining silence, they proceeded with
the same celerity, and in the same intensity of
darkness
as before, for more than an hour. This
brought them, at the swift rate they were going, a
distance of at least twenty miles from the place of
their departure.
Turning a sharp angle, at the expiration of the
time just specified, Timothy suddenly stopped his
paddle as before, and cowered down at the bottom
of the canoe. Sybrandt had no occasion to inquire
the reason of this action; for happening to look
towards the shore, he could discover at a distance
innumerable lights glimmering and flashing amid the
obscurity, and rendering the darkness beyond the
sphere of their influence still more profound. These
lights appeared to extend several miles along what
he supposed to be the strait or lake, which
occasionally
reflected their glancing rays upon its quiet
bosom.
There they are, the kritters, whispered
Timothy
,
exultingly; we've treed 'em at last, I swow.
Now, mister, let me ask you one questionwill you
obey my orders?
If I like them, said Sybrandt.
Ay, like or no like. I must be captain for a
little time, at least.
I have no objection to benefit by your
experience
.
Can you play Ingen when you are put to it?
I have been among them, and know something
of their character and manners.
Can you talk Ingen?
No!
Ah! your education has been sadly neglected.
But come, there's no time to waste in talking Ingen
or English. We must get right in the middle of
these kritters. Can you creep on all-fours without
waking up a cricket?
No!
Plague on it! I wonder what Sir William
meant by sending you with me. I could have done
better by myself. Are you afeard?
Try me.
Well, then, I must make the best of the matter.
The kritters are camped outI see by their fires
by themselves. I can't stop to tell you every thing;
but you must keep close to me, do jist as I do, and
say nothing; that's all.
I am likely to play a pretty part, I see.
Play! you'll find no play here, I guess, mister.
Set down close; make no noise; and if you go to
sneeze or cough, take right hold of your throat, and
let it go downwards.
Sybrandt obeyed his injunctions; and Timothy
proceeded towards the lights, which appeared much
farther off in the darkness than they really were,
handling his paddle with such lightness and
dexterity
that Sybrandt could not hear the strokes. In
this manner they swiftly approached the
encampment
,
until they could distinguish a confused noise
of shoutings and hallooings, which gradually broke
on their ears in discordant violence. Timothy
stopped his paddle and listened.
It is the song of those tarnal kritters, the
Utawas
.
They're in a drunken frolic, as they always
are the night before going to battle. I know the
kritters, for I've popped off a few, and can talk and
sing their songs pretty considerably, I guess. So
we'll be among 'em right off. Don't forget what I
ttold you about doing as I do, and holding your tongue.
E 2
Cautiously plying his paddle, he now shot in
close to the shore whence the sounds of revelry
proceeded, and made the land at some little
distance
,
that he might avoid the sentinels, whom they
could hear ever and anon challenging each other.
They then drew up the light canoe into the bushes,
which here closely skirted the waters. Now leave
all behind but yourself, and follow me, whispered
Timothy, as he carefully felt whether the muskets
were well covered from the damps of the night; and
then laid himself down on his face, and crawled
along under the bushes with the quiet celerity of a
snake in the grass.
Must we leave our guns behind, whispered
Sybrandt.
Yes, according to orders; but it's a plaguy hard
case. Yet upon the whole it's best; for if I was
to get a fair chance at one of these kritters, I believe
in my heart my gun would go off clean of itself.
But hush! shut your mouth as close as a
powder-horn
.
After proceeding some distance, Sybrandt getting
well scratched by the briars, and finding infinite
difficulty in keeping up with Timothy, the latter
stopped short.
Here the kritters are, said he, in the lowest
whisper.
Where? replied the other in the same tone.
Look right before you.
Sybrandt followed the direction, and beheld a
group of five or six Indians seated round a fire, the
waning lustre of which cast a fitful light upon their
dark countenances, whose savage expression was
heightened to ferocity by the stimulant of the
debauch
in which they were engaged. They sat on
the ground swaying to and fro, backward and forward,
and from side to side, ever and anon passing round
the canteen from one to the other, and sometimes
rudely snatching it away, when they thought either
was drinking more than his share. At intervals
they broke out into yelling and discordant songs,
filled with extravagant boastings of murders,
massacres
,
burnings, and plunderings, mixed up with
threatenings of what they would do to the red-coat
long knives on the morrow. One of these songs
recited the destruction of a village, and bore a
striking
resemblance to the bloody catastrophe of poor
Timothy's wife and children. Sybrandt could not
understand it, but he could hear the quick suppressed
breathings of his companion, who, when it was done,
aspirated, in a tone of smothered vengeance, If I
only had my gun!
Stay here a moment, whispered he, as he crept
cautiously towards the noisy group, which all at once
became perfectly quiet, and remained in the attitude
of listening.
Huh! muttered one, who appeared by his dress
to be the principal.
Timothy replied in a few Indian words, which
Sybrandt
did not comprehend; and raising himself from
the ground, suddenly appeared in the midst of them.
A few words were rapidly interchanged; and Timothy
then brought forward his companion, whom he
presented
to the Utawas, who welcomed him and handed
the canteen, now almost empty.
My brother does not talk, said Timothy.
Is he dumb? asked the chief of the Utawas.
No; but he has sworn not to open his mouth
till he has struck the body of a long knife.
Good, said the other; he is welcome.
After a pause he went on, at the same time eying
Sybrandt with suspicion; though his faculties were
obscured by the fumes of the liquor he still continued
to drink, and hand round at short intervals.
I don't remember the young warrior. Is he of
our tribe?
He is; but he was stolen by the Mohawks many
years ago, and only returned lately.
How did he escape?
He killed two chiefs while they were asleep by
the fire, and ran away.
Good, said the Utawas; and for a few moments
sunk into a kind of stupor, from which he suddenly
roused himself, and grasping his tomahawk started
up, rushed towards Sybrandt, and raising his deadly
weapon, stood over him in the attitude of striking.
Sybrandt remained perfectly unmoved, waiting the
stroke.
Good, said the Utawas again; I am satisfied;
the Utawas never shuts his eyes at death. He is
worthy to be our brother. He shall go with us to
battle to-morrow.
We have just come in time, said Timothy.
Does the white chief march against the red-coats
to-morrow?
He does.
Has he men enough to fight them?
They are like the leaves on the trees, said the
other.
By degrees Timothy drew from the Utawas chief
the number of Frenchmen, Indians, and
coureurs
de bois
, which composed the army; the time when
they were to commence their march; the course
they were to take, and the outlines of the plan of
attack, in case the British either waited for them in
the fort or met them in the field. By the time he
had finished his examination, the whole party with
the exception of Timothy, Sybrandt, and the chief,
were fast asleep. In a few minutes after, the two
former affected to be in the same state, and began to
snore lustily. The Uttawas chief nodded from side
to side; then sunk down like a log, and remained
insensible to every thing around him, in the sleep of
drunkenness.
Timothy lay without motion for a while, then
turned himself over, and rolled about from side to
side, managing to strike against each of the party in
succession. They remained fast asleep. He then
cautiously raised himself, and Sybrandt did the same.
In a moment Timothy was down again, and Sybrandt
followed his example without knowing why, until he
heard some one approach, and distinguished, as they
came nigh, two officers, apparently of rank. They
halted near the waning fire, and one said to the other
in French, in a low tone:
The beasts are all asleep; it is time to wake
them. Our spies are come back, and we must
march.
Not yet, replied the other; let them sleep an
hour longer, and they will wake sober. They then
passed on, and when their footsteps were no longer
heard, Timothy again raised himself up, motioning
our hero to lie still. After ascertaining by certain
tests which experience had taught him that the
Indians still continued in a profound sleep, he
proceeded
with wonderful dexterity and silence to shake
the priming from each of the guns in succession.
After this, he took their powder-horns and emptied
them; then seizing up the tomahawk of the Utawas
chief, which had dropped from his hand, he stood
over him for a moment, with an expression of deadly
hatred which Sybrandt had never before seen in his
or in any other countenance. The intense desire
of killing one of the kritters, as he called them,
struggled a few moments with his obligations to obey
the orders of Sir William; but the latter at length
triumphed, and motioning Sybrandt, they crawled
away with the silence and celerity with which they
came; launched their light canoe, and plied their
paddles
with might and main. The morning breeze is
springing up, said Timothy, and it will soon be
daylight. We must be tarnal busy.
And busy they were, and swiftly did the light
canoe slide over the wave, leaving scarce a wake
behind her. As they turned the angle which hid
the encampment from their view, Timothy ventured
to speak a little above his breath.
It's lucky for us that the boat we passed coming
down has returned, for it's growing light apace.
I'm only sorry for one thing.
What's that? asked Sybrandt.
That I let that drunken Utawas alone. If I had
only bin out on my own bottom, he'd have bin stun
dead in a twinkling, I guess.
And you too, I
guess
, said Sybrandt, adopting
his peculiar phraseology; you would have been
overtaken and killed.
Who, I? I must be a poor kritter if I can't dodge
half a dozen of these drunken varmints.
A few hours of sturdy exertion brought them at
length within sight of Ticonderoga, just as the red
harbingers of morning striped the pale green of the
skies. Star after star disappeared, as Timothy
observed
,
like candles that had been burning all night
and gone out of themselves, and as they struck the
foot of the high bluff whence they had departed,
the rays of the sun just tipped the peaks of the high
mountains rising towards the west. Timothy then
shook hands with our hero.
You're a hearty kritter, said he, and I'll tell
Sir William how you looked at that tarnal tomahawk
as if it had bin an old pipe-stem.
Without losing a moment, they proceeded to the
quarters of Sir William, whom they found waiting
for them with extreme anxiety. He extended both
hands towards our hero, and eagerly exclaimed
What luck, my lads? I have been up all night,
waiting your return.
Then you will be quite likely to sleep sound
to-night
,
quoth master Timothy, unbending the intense
rigidity of his leathern countenance. I am of
opinion
if a man wants to have a real good night's rest,
he's only to set up the night before, and he may
calculate upon it with sartinty.
Hold your tongue, Timothy, said Sir William,
good-humouredly, or else speak to the purpose.
Have you been at the enemy's camp?
Right in their very bowels, said Timothy.
Sir William proceeded to question, and Sybrandt
and Timothy to answer, until he drew from them all
the important information of which they had
possessed
themselves. He then dismissed Timothy
with cordial thanks and a purse of yellow boys,
which he received with much satisfaction.
It's not of any great use to me, to be sure, said
he as he departed; but some how or other I love
to look at the kritters.
As to you, Sybrandt Westbrook, you have
fulfilled
the expectations I formed of you on our first
acquaintance. You claim a higher reward; for you
E 2
have acted from higher motives and at least equal
courage and resolution. His majesty shall know of
this; and, in the mean time, call yourself Major
Westbrook, for such you are from this moment.
Now go with me to the commander-in-chief, who
must know of what you heard and saw.
CHAPTER XVI.
A Bush Fight.
Sybrandt
bowed his thanks. The idea of being
named with commendation to
the king
was
sufficient
honour at that time to a modest provincial.
But he had a still higher in the thought that
Catalina
would hear of his honours, and perhaps
regret
,
as Sir William had hinted, that she could
no longer hope to share them. With these
inspiring
anticipations he accompanied Sir William
to the presence of the commander-in-chief; they
found him surrounded by a number of officers,
among whom he was startled to see Colonel Gilfillan,
who had just returned from a mission to New-York,
whither he had been despatched by the general the
very day Sybrandt joined the army at Ticonderoga.
They recognised each other by a stately bow and a
flush of the cheek.
When his excellency had heard the report of
Sybrandt
,
and commended his intrepidity, he announced
his intention to sally forth and surprise the enemy,
instead of remaining cooped up in their defences like
cowards.
Caution is not cowardice, observed Sir
William
.
It is certain that the enemy exceeds us in
numbers. As to surprising them, it is sufficient to
say they have two thousand Indians with them.
Might I advise, sir, I would respectfully suggest that
we remain here and receive the enemy in our
intrenchments
,
where we can keep them at bay until
their Indian allies desert them, as they certainly will
after being beaten back a few times. In addition to
being thus weakened, the want of necessary supplies
will soon oblige them to abandon the siege. When
they retire, then will be the time to come out upon
them: a retreating enemy is half conquered.
His excellency the commanding general did not
relish this wise counsel, for at least two very
substantial
reasons. He disdained to be governed by the
advice of a
provincial officer
, and he had been brought
up in the solemn conviction that one Englishman was
a match for two Frenchmen by land or by water.
The young officers of the line, in scarlet coats and
gorgeous
epaulettes, were all of the same opinion, with
the exception of one, who, had he lived in happier
times, and served in a sphere less obscure, would
have left behind him a name equally illustrious with
those of Wolfe, Montgomery, and Montcalmthat
admirable soldier, whose glory even defeat could
hardly obscure. It was therefore determined that
the army should march out against the enemy, and
orders were immediately given for that purpose.
As the officers separated to their respective
destinations
Sybrandt sought a meeting with Gilfillan, who
favoured his wishes exceedingly.
Colonel Gilfillan, said he, permit me to remind
you of a certain affair in New-York which still
remains unsettled. The sight of Gilfillan had
banished all his former pacific resolutions.
Major Westbrook, said the other, to-day for
our country, to-morrow for Catalina.
You remind me of a higher duty; to-morrow
be it; and he touched his hat, and bowed with a
soldierlike courtesy.
To-morrow, replied Gilfillan, touching his hat
likewise, and bowing still lower. And thus they
parted for the present.
Come, Westbrook, said Sir William, let us
go and make our wills. To-morrow, if I am not
mistaken, many a poor fellow of us will have a lock
of hair the less upon his head. But never mind,
death is certain, and duty imperative. I cannot
approve, but to-morrow you shall see Sir William
Johnson what he always has been and always will
befaithful to his country, whether he approves or
disapproves.
The whole of this busy day was spent in
preparing
for the departure of the army, which took
place early the next morning. The shores of Lake
Champlain had never before witnessed so gallant
an array of martial splendours, nor the solitudes of
her hills ever resounded to such a blast of rousing
music as now echoed in their deepest recesses,
scaring the eagles from their inaccessible eyries,
and the wild deer from their impenetrable retreats.
The officers of the regular army, as the native
British
troops were called, were all in the highest
spirits, anticipating victory and promotion. But the
old gray-headed provincials, who were better versed
in border warfare, shook their heads and marched
forth in gloomy resignation, foreseeing in this
careless
confidence of the general the certainty of
disaster
and defeat. The hot-headed red-coats
tauntingly
ascribed their deportment to cowardice or
disaffection
;
but it was nothing more than the fearful
augury of experiencea prophetic insight into the
future, founded on a knowledge of the past.
The march was necessarily fatiguing, owing to
the obstructions every where opposed to them by
the rough inequalities of a country as yet almost in
a state of nature. Add to this, they were
encumbered
with an inconvenient and unnecessary
quantity
of baggage, which rendered their progress more
slow and laborious. In vain did Sir William and
some of the old provincial officers impress on the
general the necessity of sending out experienced
spies in advance to scour the thick woods into which
they were now penetrating; in vain did they urge
the halting of the army for repose and refreshment.
He was inflated with a stupid and obstinate idea
that he was going to take the enemy by surprise,
and, as is not uncommon in such cases, in his
eagerness
to gain his object, neglected the means
necessary
to guard against a similar disaster.
It was about the middle of a long sultry summer
afternoon that the army became embarrassed in
passing through a tract of wet ground, covered with
a forest of those majestic trees which give such
sublimity to our primeval woods. The heat was
intense, although they were in the midst of
impenetrable
shades; for the air was dense and stagnant,
and the want of a free circulation was more than
equivalent to the absence of the sun. The road, if
road it might be called, which was little more than a
space about thirty yards wide cleared of wood, became
deeper and more embarrassing as they advanced,
and soldiers and horses began to pant, and falter, and
stick fast in the mud. At the moment when the
whole army was thus entangled and struggling under
fatigue, heat, and hunger, a horrible shout, followed
by a discharge of guns in front and rear, and all
around them, rung in their ears, and struck a chill
into the stoutest heart. White skins and red skins
seemed, like the fabled armies we read of, to spring
out of the ground; every trunk of a tree sent forth
death and destruction into the beleaguered host, and
invisible hands pointed invisible guns, and launched
invisible arrows. Here was no wheeling to the
right or to the left, or forming of columns, or
concentrating
of battalions, or any of the practised
evolutions
of European warfare. Each man had his
individual foe, and each man fought his own
desperate
fight.
The moment the yell echoed through the forest
Sir William exclaimed to Sybrandt, who was
marching
at his side, weary and disheartened,
There they are! I thought as much. The
headlong blockhead!
Your commands, Sir William, eagerly
answered
the other.
Commands! nobody commands now, but the
great Leader of the hosts of heaven. The law of
nature is come again, and all are equal here. Every
man for himself, and God for us all! shouted he,
in a voice that echoed through the forest, as he
drew a pistol and dashed, as fast as the woods and
marshes would permit, in the direction of the horrible
yellings that still continued. Sybrandt followed, or
rather kept at his side. But there was no enemy
to be seen, though every instant the officers, in their
red coats and splendid embroidery, fell dead by
invisible
hands.
We are fighting with shadows, said Sir
William
,
as the balls and tomahawks flew about,
barking
the trees or entering the flesh of the devoted
men falling victims to the folly of one alone.
By degrees, though quicker than I can relate it,
parties of the Five Nations rallied round their old
leader, and Sir William soon saw himself at the
head of a considerable number. With these he
commenced his operations in the regular style of
bush-fighting, to which all other modes of warfare
are mere children's play. Each man then depends
on his own skill, cunning, and daring; each man
concentrates his soul and body in efforts for
self-preservation
alone, and the impulse of glory is
changed to the instinct of love of life. The fight
soon became equal between the hostile Indians and
Sir William and his valiant Mohawks, who still
continued the objects of terror to all the savages
from the Atlantic to the shores of Lake Superior.
Old King Hendrick, who was with them, still
retained
his courage and vigour, and seconded his
friend Sir Williamwhom he once
dreamed
out of
a suit of regimentalswith all his might and
cunning
.
Nor was friend Sybrandt idle. He, as well
as all the rest, now fought on foot, either from choice
or necessity; and, as the obstructions of the ground
prevented acting in concert, he was frequently
engaged
in personal contests with the hostile party.
But the Indians never, if they can help it, or unless
under circumstances of particular advantage, like to
match their physical powers with the white man,
either because they know their own superiority in
the manuvres of bush-fighting, or the superiority
of the other in vigour and perseverance.
It so happened, however, that Sybrandt, who had
now received two or three flesh-wounds, which had
somewhat weakened him in the devious vicissitudes
of the fight, encountered an Indian, who seemed the
principal or one of the principal leaders of the
hostile
band. He wore a suit of buckskin fitting close
to his body, and a military cap with feathers. He
had a tomahawk in his hand, which seemed to be
his only weapon. The sole defence of Sybrandt
was a loaded pistol, with what was very rare at
that time, a double barrel. It was one of a pair
which constituted the only inheritance he received
from his father. With cautious malice the Indian
and the white man eyed each other; the former
keenly scrutinizing the latter to ascertain his means
of defence, and Sybrandt displaying equal curiosity.
The chief was at length satisfied that Sybrandt was
unarmed, he having, at first sight of the savage,
concealed his pistol for the purpose of disarming his
caution. He accordingly approached our hero with
uplifted tomahawk, still however with the
characteristic
caution of his race, until Sybrandt thought
him sufficiently near, when he discharged one of
his barrels, but not with a true aim. The ball just
grazed his shoulder. The chief, supposing him now
at his mercy, rushed upon him, but was received by
a dead shot of the other barrel. It entered his
heart, and he fell dead.
Bravo! exclaimed Sir William, who just at
that moment made his appearance, covered with
blood and dirt. Bravo, major, you have done
good service. That is the very head and soul of
the hostile Indians. The moment they miss him
they will disperse. The feat shall make you a
colonel, if we survive this day.
And it happened as he had predicted. By
degrees
the Indians remitted their attacks, and as the
news of the death of their great chief was whispered
among them, they discontinued their hostilities, and
gradually disappeared.
The battle is over in this quarter, said the
knight, and called his Mohawks to follow him in
the direction where the firing still continued. Here
they found a scene of complicated confusion and
carnage, principally, however, all on one side. The
British army had been taken at such disadvantage,
and knew so little of this mode of warfare, that their
efforts were entirely inefficient. The provincials
alone made some effectual resistance, and when
reinforced
by Sir William and his Mohawks, were at
length able to repulse the enemy, who retired in
perfect order, and with scarcely any loss. In
passing
thus from one extremity of the fight to the other,
Sybrandt became separated from his companions in
the obscurity of the wood. While seeking the
direction for joining them again, he heard something
like a faint halloo at a little distance. After a
moment's
reflection he made his way towards the
sound with the caution becoming his situation, until
at length, peering about beneath the branches, he
discovered an officer lying at the foot of a tree,
with his body partly raised and resting against
it. At a little distance was an Indian grasping a
knife, cautiously advancing, with an evident
intention
to practise upon him the bloody rites of
savage barbarity. The face of the officer was
turned towards Sybrandt, and, pale as it was, he
at once recognised Gilfillan. In a moment the
history of the past rushed upon his mind, and in a
moment he lived over his former anger, regrets, and
disappointments. All these were merged the next
moment in one generous feeling. He determined to
rescue his rival at every risk. Levelling his pistol
with a steady aim, he waited the approach of the
savage, who was so intent upon his bloody purpose
that he did not perceive him. When about half a
dozen paces from Gilfillan, Sybrandt fired, and the
Indian dropped. In another moment he was at the
side of Gilfillan, who held out his hand to him, and
said, faintly,
Major Westbrook, I thank you;not for my life,
for that is gone past all recovery, I think; but you
have saved my skin from being ripped from my
head; and, by my soul, I am grateful. I have
something
to say to you; and the sooner I can say it the
better.
At this moment Sybrandt perceived a second
Indian
approaching with his tomahawk. He attempted
to rise and meet him, but he had been bleeding
imperceptibly
for several hours, and his strength was
now quite gone. He sunk down again insensible,
at the instant that he heard the report of a gun, and
the exclamation, Take that, you tarnal kritter.
CHAPTER XVII.
An Explanation.
This
was a bloody day for England and her
colonies
,
and its consequences fatal to the success of their
combined arms during the remainder of the war.
The shattered remnant of the army found its way
back to Ticonderoga, two thousand less than it
went out. But fortunately the French did not
pursue
,
owing to the defection of their Indian allies;
they being as usual discouraged by their losses,
which had been great, owing to the bravery and
conduct of Sir William Johnson and his Mohawks.
They employed themselves in running about the
wood where the battle was fought, plundering the
slain, and inflicting the last act of barbarity upon
those in whom life remained. Many a gallant
soldier
fell in this forest-fight who deserved a more
illustrious field and a more worthy commemoration
than mine. Among these was Lord Howe, of
whom the records of the times speak as of one
whose high honour, signal courage, and martial
qualities gave promise of a life of glory and
success
.
But what are the auguries of hope, even
when drawn from such well-founded inspirations as
these, but the heralds of disappointment?
For some hours there was a blank in the life of
our hero; and that the blank did not last for ever
was owing to his trusty companion of the night but
one before, Timothy Weasel. Timothy had joined
the army that day as a volunteer, or rather amateur,
and long afterward boasted that he had sacrificed
one of the kritters to the shade of each of his
murdered
family. After rescuing Sybrandt and Gilfillan
from the savage in the manner just related, he came
up to the young men, the former of whom he found
insensible. He examined his wounds, of which his
long experience in the trade of vengeance had made
him no indifferent judge.
Is he dead? asked Gilfillan, faintly.
Only in a swound, replied Timothy; the
blood is almost out of his body, and that's mostly
what's the matter with him. It's a pity he should
die of nothing, as I may say; for I can tell you he's
a decent sort of a kritterhe isn't afeard of nothin.
I know thatI owe him my rescue from the
scalping knife, and I would give what remains of
life, if it were a thousand times as much, to save
him. Can't it be done?
Timothy considered a moment. It's likely it
may. Stay here till I come back, and, mind don't
neither of you stir a peg from the place.
There's no danger of that, answered Gilfillan,
with a melancholy smile, glancing his languid eye
from his broken leg to the inanimate body of
Sybrandt.
Timothy strode away in haste, leaving the two
young men to await his return. He staid till the
shadows of evening began to fall; and Gilfillan,
worn out with pain, anxiety, and weakness, had
sunk down by the side of our hero. In this
situation they were found by Sir William, who had
been apprized by Timothy of their melancholy state.
He lost not a moment, but came, conducted by
Timothy, with a body of his Mohawks to their relief.
In a few minutes they made a litter of boughs, on
which they placed the two wounded soldiers, and
forthwith bent their way as fast as possible for
Ticonderoga
.
The motion of the litter put into
circulation
the little blood that yet lingered in Sybrandt's
veins, and brought him by degrees to a consciousness
of his situation. Gilfillan also came to himself
betimes. It was morning before the party arrived
at the intrenched camp: the cold dews of the night
had operated on the exhausted frames of the young
soldiers, and chilled them almost into ice; so that
when they arrived it was a moot point whether they
were dead or alive. Immediate care was taken to
dispose of them as comfortably as possible, and the
assistance of surgeons obtained.
The wounds of Sybrandt were found in no way
dangerous of themselves; but it was feared that loss
of blood and exposure to the night air might be
followed by consequences that would endanger his
life. The situation of Gilfillan was still more
critical. A ball had struck his knee, and shattered
it in a terrible manner. The surgeons at once
pronounced
the necessity of amputation the next day,
when his strength was a little restored. A groan,
such as his previous sufferings had never forced from
him, marked the feeling with which the handsome
Gilfillan received this annunciation; but he uttered
not a word. They were in the same room together,
at the request of Gilfillan, who lay awake that night,
restless and feverish. Sybrandt was also so much
exhausted that he had scarcely strength to sleep;
and ever and anon he could hear Gilfillan mumbling
to himself in tones of feverish indistinctness, They
sha'n't make a sight of me. What's the use of
paying such a price for life? What will the girls
say to my wooden leg? and such like exclamations.
About daylight in the morning he asked Sybrandt
if he was awake, and finding that he was, spoke to
him as follows:
Westbrook, I have something to say to you; and
perhaps I'd better say it now, for upon my soul, I
think, nay, I'm sure, it's all over with me.
Be of good cheer, Colonel Gilfillan, replied the
other; after the amputation you'll be better.
And by the glory of my ancestors, Westbrook, if
I'm not better before that happens, I shall never be
better. I mean to die with both my legs on.
Surely you are not afraid of an amputation?
Afraid! cried Gilfillan, raising himself in his
bedLook you, Major Westbrook, if I had a pair
of pistols here just nowbut what am I talking
about; don't I owe my life, at least what's left of it,
to you? Now listen to me, and mind what I say.
He then disclosed to him the true history of the
picture, and his rejection by Catalina the day he was
seen by Sybrandt at the feet of that young lady,
kissing her hands. She loves you, said he, faintly,
and none other. She told me so with her own
sweet lips, and the tears in her truth-telling eyes.
Is this true, on your soul, Colonel Gilfillan?
True, on the word of a dying man. Now let us
be friends while I live, and faith there will be little
time for our friendship to wear out.
When the surgeons visited the young men in the
morning, they found Sybrandt somewhat better,
though feverish: but they shook their heads when
they examined the wound and felt the pulse of
Gilfillan, declaring that nothing but immediate
amputation
could save him.
Then I am a dead man, said he; for my leg
shall go with me to the grave. We have kept
company
all our lives, and I won't part with my old
friend now, at the last pinch. Any thing else,
doctor.
Any thing else will be nothingyou will be dead
in less than four-and-twenty hours; and indeed, it is
extremely doubtful whether even that will save you.
Then the matter is settled, said Gilfillan.
Then you are a dead man, replied the surgeon,
bluntly.
Be it so, was Gilfillan's reply.
CHAPTER XVIII.
The Burial of a gallant Soldier.
All
that day, and until the next morning, Gilfillan
was at times delirious with pain and fever; but
towards the evening he came to himself, was
entirely
free from pain, and addressed Sybrandt
coherently
.
You feel better? said Sybrandt, hopefully.
I feel no pain now.
Then you must be better.
I
am
bettermy sufferings are pastby sunset
I shall be well.
Sybrandt understood him, and did not reply.
After a silence of a few minutes, Gilfillan spoke
again.
Westbrook, said he, faintly, can you lift me
that little trunk on the table?
I cannot stand, said the other.
Perhaps
I
can reach it; and with an effort he
raised himself, and managed to reach it himself,
though he almost sunk under the exertion. The
attendant came in at that moment to expostulate
against his talking.
Pooh! said Gilfillan, go about your business,
will you? But stay; I want you to bear witness
that I charge Major Westbrook with this trunk.
As to the rest, I don't care who has it. Now go
away. The attendant retired.
Vol. II.F
Westbrook, continued he, after a pause, there
is a picture in this trunk which belongs to you. I
procured it like a rogue, and I restore it like an
honest man, now that it can be of no further use to
me. There are some little keepsakes of my sister,
who married and died in France. Give them to
Catalina; she need not be afraid of my claiming
them when I am dead. My watch you will take
the first opportunity of sending home to my father.
I can't write to himbut you will do it. Say to him
that I blessed his old gray head, and died a true
son of my father and of old Ireland. There is a
seal attached to it, with my crestthe crest of the
ancient Connaught kings; wear that for my sake,
and
Here his ideas seemed to become indistinct; at
least Sybrandt could not understand what he said
for a minute or two.
Westbrook, whispered he, I am going.
Shall I call assistance?
No; but I wish I could reach your hand, to
give it one shake. No matterwe are friends.
God bless you  my father  Catalina  old
Ireland
!
The last words were almost unheard by
Sybrandt
,
and in a little while the soul of the gallant
Gilfillan was on its way to that country which all
visit in turn; of which none know any thing but the
dead, who tell no tales.
Gilfillan was buried with the honours of war,
one of the most solemn and affecting ceremonies
that can be offered to our contemplation. The
scene and the occasion combined to render it
peculiarly
striking and magnificent. The remnant of
the army followed his remains to the grave with
arms reversed and muffled drums, while the whole
concentrated band poured forth the rich and tender
music of Ellen-a-Roon, the favourite air of the
dead soldier. The minute-guns roared among the
recesses of the mountains, and echoed along the
lake, as the ceremony proceeded; and three rounds
of musketry announced that the body of the gallant
Gilfillan was deposited in the bosom of its mother
earth.
It is over! exclaimed Sybrandt, who had lain
stretched on his bed, listening to the strain of music
and the roaring artillery. He is gone, poor
fellow
!
perhaps I shall soon follow. The thought
was not pleasant; for he felt that he had something
to live for now.
The French army had been prevented from
immediately
following up its victoryfor such it was,
in factby the disaffection and insubordination of
the Indians, who formed an indispensable ingredient
in these border wars. They had suffered severely,
gained little plunder, and become tired of the service;
for perseverance in war forms no part of their
character
.
It was with difficulty they could be kept
together; and this circumstance afforded a respite
to the English force, which, reduced as it now was,
took the opportunity to retreat to the head of Lake
George.
During this period, the situation of Sybrandt
continued
very critical. His wounds were of little
consequence
;
but the loss of blood, the exposure to the
night-air, and the subsequent agitation of his mind
occasioned by the explanation with Gilfillan, brought
on a slow fever, which threatened fatal
consequences
.
Such was his weakness, that, though his
friend Sir William paid the kindest attention to his
F 2
ease and comfort, he scarcely survived his removal
by water to Fort George, and was brought there
in a state that rendered recovery almost hopeless.
In the mean time Catalina had returned to the
house of her father; but not the Catalina who had
left it the autumn before. After the departure of
Sybrandt
,
Gilfillan, and Sir Thicknesse Throgmorton,
she had nothing to gratify either her affection or her
vanity. The resources of dissipation and flirtation,
so frequently successful in curing the wounds of the
heart, all failed her. Nothing was talked or thought
of but the war; all business and gayety was at a
stand; and the officers, who constituted the
ingredient
which gave a zest to balls, parties, and general
society, were all gone to the frontier. She had,
therefore, ample leisure for reflection and regret.
Though she blamed Sybrandt for not entering into
the very recesses of her heart, and seeing himself
there struggling with a little troop of vanities and
caprices for mastery, still she could not in
conscience
deny that he had sufficient apparent cause,
at least, for his desertion; and thus to the
disappointment
of her hopes was added the sting of
self-reproach
.
Her vivacity departed; her colour faded;
and the rich fulness of her form, where youth and
health had unitedwith a happy consciousness of
the present, a sanguine anticipation of the futureto
consummate the face and figure of a Hebe, gave
place to paleness, lassitude, and indifference. To
this succeeded a fretful impatience to go home,
which was met by an equal though secret
impatience
on the part of Mrs. Aubineau to be rid of her.
That good lady never, to the last day of her life,
forgave Catalina her folly in not jumping at the
opportunity
of becoming a titled lady.
In this state of things the summons of Colonel
Vancour for his daughter to return home was a
relief equally welcome to Catalina and her lady
hostess. The guest who is tired of the hostess, and
the hostess tired of her guest, are remarkably civil
at parting. Nothing could surpass the affectionate
farewell of Mrs. Aubineau except the grateful
acknowledgments
of Catalina. Let not our stern
moral readersfor the sternest moralists now
regularly put on their spectacles to read a new
novellet them not cast the bitterness of their
censures
upon this elegant simulation. What would
this world be, and who would or could live in it, if
every body blurted out the secret feelings of their
hearts in each other's faces? Neither friendship,
nor love, nor the ties of kindred, let them be ever
so strongly knit, could stand such a test. They
would perish and be rent in twain by the rough
application of such a touchstone. Civility and good
words are not perhaps so much actual hypocrisy, as
the triumph of reflection and propriety over the
impulses
of prejudice and ill-nature.
CHAPTER XIX.
Catalina returns Home.
Catalina
embarked in one of those Albany
packets which then constituted the only vehicles of
transportation on the noble Hudson, under the
protection
of the wife of an officer occupying a high
station on the frontier. The scene and the season
were scarcely more different from those which
presented
themselves on her journey down the river,
than were her feelings and anticipations at the two
periods. But the changes, though great, bore no
resemblance to each other. They formed a perfect
contrast. Then the hopes of Catalina were
blossoming
in full luxuriance, while the beauties and the
flowers of nature were faded into the gay yet
melancholy
hues of the departing year. Now the young
and fresh products of the genial spring, the air, the
woods, the birds, the insects, the voice and the face
of nature, all breathed, and moved, and whispered,
and sung of renovated joy and animated nature. Not
so with Catalina. She represented not the smiling,
blushing, full luxuriance of spring's rosy-lipped
goddess
,
but the faded, and still fading charms of
autumn's
melancholy, musing, silent representative.
The vessel proceeded prosperously before the
sweet south winds, but, sad to say, was four days on
her passage. What a loss of time! for people that
have nothing to do especially. Had our heroine
been fortunately born in this age of developement
even in this behindhand hemisphereshe might
have been home in twelve hours! But if she had
been still more distinguished by Providence, and
been born, not only in this happy age, but in such a
happy country as old England, she might
peradventure
have travelled to Albany on a railroad at the
rate of sixty miles an hour! What a prodigious
saving of time! and if the business of young ladies
consisted in saving time, what a prodigious
advantage
in this rapid travelling!I beg pardon, the
march of improvement has ordained I should say
locomotionshe might have arrived at home in less
than three hours!
Well, sir, and what if she had?
Why, sir, she would have saved such a prodigious
deal of time! she would have got home three days
sooner to her friends.
And missed the anticipation of seeing them all
that time?
Pooh! what is anticipation compared to the
reality?
Ask any old lady or gentleman you meet, and
they will tell you.
My dear sir, then the short and the long of the
matter is, you don't think fast travelling an
improvement
?
Faith not I. I believe if the happiness, or the
interests, or the superiority of man had in any way
depended on fast travelling, Providence would have
made a race-horse of him, or furnished his honour
with a pair of eagle's wings.
My good sir, you are a century behind the spirit
of the age.
Never mind; one of these days I shall get into
a locomotive engine and overtake it.
So Catalina, poor girl, was upwards of four days
in getting to Albany. Does not the fair reader, who,
peradventure, at the moment of reading this, sits at
a window with our book in her hand, looking at the
whiskered beaux as they pass up and down
Broadway
does
she not shudder at this dead loss of time
this blank in the existence of poor Catalina?
Perhaps she is anticipating a visit to the Springs, to
Long-Branch, or Nahant, and grows pale at the very
anticipation of a four days' passage, involving four
days of absence from these happy retreats of
people
whose time is so precious. Let us see what
privations this delay involves. The loss of at least
forty-eight tumblers of Congress waterof four
execrable
dinnersof four restless, uncomfortable nights
a subscription ballthree dozen changes of dress
and three hundred and seventy-five desperate
yawns, at the Springsof four or five bathings
on the beach, followed by four or five shiverings
when the sea-breeze comes inof the pleasure
of seeing the ladies make their transits to and fro
from the waves, looking not like the fabled
goddess
rising from the ocean, but, with reverence be it
spoken, like old clothes-women when they go in
and drowned rats when they come outof
spending
day after day in a delightful variety of
eating
,
drinking, and sleepingsleeping, eating, and
drinkingand drinking, eating, and sleepingof
being obliged to devour your dinners quicker than
they do in a manufactory or a steamboat, and discuss
crabs and tough mutton against timeto sleep before
dinner and after dinner, and between dinner and tea;
finally, to endure the exemplary tyranny of Mrs.
Sears, and suffer under the worst of all despotisms,
that of a petticoat government, at Long Branch:
or to pass all day watching for the sea-serpentto
magnify every porpoise into his likenessto see the
ripplings of the waves assume the likeness of his
joints, and to exercise the last degree of human
credulity
in believing in the existence of that fabled
monster under the penalty of being frowned on by
the young ladies, and denounced by their honoured
fathers as freemasons, Jackson men, and
unbelievers
,
at Nahant. To think that a young lady or
gentleman of enlightened views and cultivated
intellect
should lose four days of all or any of these
delights for lack of a steamboat or locomotive is
enough to discompose the machinery of a
hundred-and-twenty-horse-power-engine
.
Yet to all this was
Catalina subjected, without being a whit the wiser
or more miserable on that account. Where
ignorance
is bliss, &c.every body knows the rest,
at least every body that reads poetry and novels
that is to say, every body that can read.
Catalina, however, in spite of the backwardness
of the age, got home at last.
Festina lente
, said
Augustus Csar, and so say I. Nobody ever did
any thing well in a hurry, except running away.
She was received by her honoured parents with
tender welcome, and she received that welcome with
tears flowing from a hundred recollections of the
past. The first caresses being over, they had leisure
to observe her altered appearance, which they did
with a silent interchange of anxious looks. They
however said nothing; they suspected its cause, and
this was not the time or the occasion to allude to
the subject. But honest Ariel, who was on the
high ropes with joy at her return, and never wandered
out of the little circle of the present moment, being
suddenly struck with her paleness, as suddenly
exclaimed.
F 3
Why, Catalinawhy, dn it, what's the
matter? you look like a ghost!
Nothing, uncle, answered she, and burst into
tears.
Why, dn it now, why, don't cry; I didn't mean
toto and honest Ariel, whose heart melted like
a dish of butter in the sun, fairly wept to keep her
company.
She is fatigued with her voyage, said the
considerate
mother, and had better lie down a little while
before dinner. Come, my dear, and Catalina
followed
her mother to her chamber.
I'll be shot if I know what to make of all this,
exclaimed Ariel, wiping his eyes.
Nor I, thought the colonel, but we shall know
in good time. Her mother will get it all out of her
before to-morrow.
And so she did. The fact is, she knew it all
before from her friend, Mrs. Aubineau. But she had
no objection to hear it again; for, thought she, a
good story never loses by telling.
Ah! Catalina, exclaimed she, shaking her
head, you'll never live to be a titled lady, I'm
afraid.
I shall never live to be any thing, I believe,
replied Catalina, and her tears flowed apace.
The
honourable
Colonel Gilfillan, said madam,
is, I believe, on the frontier.
I wish, thought Catalina, he were any where,
so I might never see his face again.
And Sybrandt Westbrook is there, too.
Catalina did not wish
he
was where she might
never see him again, though the old lady, I believe,
did.
He is a jealous-pated fool, said madam.
Who, dear mother?
Sybrandt.
Indeed, mother, you are mistaken, said she,
firmly.
Then you gave him cause, said madam, in a
tone rather of exultation.
Indeed, I did notthat is, if he had known
my real feelings he would have been satisfied.
Ah! thought the mother, it's an old story for
girls to behave like little dls to their lovers, and
then blame them because they cannot see into their
hearts. They might as well try to see into the
inside ofshe could not find a comparison to suit
her exactly, but I believe a pumpkin came into her
head.
Madam told the old gentleman all about it, and
immediately after went to Albany, for a purpose
that nobody about her could fathom, though I have
a shrewd guess. But I will not betray the secrets
of the old lady, though, rest her soul, she is dead
long ago, and I am not afraid of ghosts. All I can
disclose is, that some days after this mysterious
journey, the affair of Catalina was talked of at
several tea-parties, though nobody could ever
discover
how it leaked out.
I shall write to Sybrandt, and set matters right,
quoth the straightforward old gentleman, Colonel
Vancour.
What! screamed madam and Catalina, both
togetherwhat, and tell I am
dying
for him!
O, father, I'd rather be dead!
I'd rather see hermarried to the honourable
Colonel Gilfillan, thought the old lady.
It can be no impeachment to the delicacy of
a young lady to relieve her lover from any
erroneous
impressions of her conduct You know he
loved you, and that is sufficient.
But, father, he may have fallen in love with
somebody else since.
O, certainly, exclaimed the colonel, smiling,
with some beautiful squawer.
Alas! men have no sensibility, thought
Catalina
,
with a sigh, when my father makes a jest of
the soul-subduing passion!
People grow wiser as they grow older, my dear
little heroine, or at any rate they grow more selfish,
and that is often mistaken for wisdom. For my
part,
tempora mutantur
, &c.; times change and men
change with them; but this does not prove that
either change for the better.
Catalina opposed writing to Sybrandt, and so did
her mother, although she could not help feeling
anxious about the depressed health and spirits of
her daughter. Nobody ever died of love though,
thought she, and she thought right. It is not a
disease
in itself, but it often produces diseases that sap
the sources of life, and bring on a premature decay.
The process is slow but sure. Be this as it may,
the colonel had two to one against him, and they
were women. The colonel was but a manso he
grumbled and submitted. What could man do more?
CHAPTER XX.
An anti-charitable Chapter.
I could
never yet, to this blessed hour, satisfy
myself whether Catalina was most glad or most
sorry at thus carrying her point. At any rate it
was one of Pyrrhus's victories, and she never wished
to gain such another. She was now free to indulge
the luxury of grief; but grief, like all other luxuries,
soon ceases to be a luxury. It is one of the most
tiresome things in the world for a constancy. It does
very well for a burst or a paroxysm; but for every
day, and all day longfor every night, and all the
livelong nighthuman nature cannot stand it, and
seeks refuge from the carking, gnawing fiend in the
performance of its duties to itself and to others.
Blessed necessity!
Catalina forced herself to enter upon the
employments
and duties of domestic life; and whoever seeks
employment will soon take an interest in what they
are doing. There are a thousand little acts of duty,
or kindness, or attention which woman, and only
woman, can perform, and which neither interfere
with the delicacy of a lady, nor the acquirement and
practice of elegant accomplishments. The union,
I confess, is not common; but I have seen women,
and thank heaven for it, who united both the will
and the power to be useful with the utmost polish
of mind and manners, and the highest intellectual
attainments becoming the sex. I wish I could
meet a few more of them. But if they were
common
,
they would no longer be a rarity; and if they
were no longer a rarity, nobody would prize them.
Doubtless it is best as it is. Let us bow with
humble
resignation, and thank our stars, as menfolk, that
there are so many of the sex who are not all
angel
;
for if there were more of them quite perfect,
where under the sun should we find men worthy
of them.
Catalina was calculated to be both a blessing and
an ornament to her home, a jewel in the bosom of a
husband, or she would never have been chosen as
our heroine from all the rest of her sex. Though
not perfect, she was a perfect woman; and whoever
is not satisfied with that, let him die the death of
a bachelor. There was a library too in the
mansion
of Colonel Vancour, which, though principally
composed of majestic Latin tomes of the Dutch
school, was here and there relieved by works of a
lighter nature. There were but few novels, but
being a rarity, they were the more seducing, and
being right excellent, they would bear to be read
frequently. They did not depend altogether on the
momentary excitement of the story, but possessed
latent beauties which gradually opened themselves
like rosebuds to the morning sun at every new
perusal
.
Besides these, Catalina had music and friends,
and the liberality of her father allowed her the
means of procuring every rational enjoyment.
What a shame to be unhappy with so many
sources of happiness! Yet our heroine was not
happy. There was one thing wanting, and that
was a want of the heart. It was the companion of
her childhood; the choice of her youth; the
preserver
of her life. She often visited the spot where
the terrible conflict with Captain Pipe took place,
and always returned with renewed regrets; she
could not sit at her window and look into the garden
without recalling to mind the perils she had
encountered
,
and the life she owed to the watchful
tenderness of her lover; nor could she walk in any
direction without something or other presenting itself
which brought him to her remembrance clothed
with every claim to her tenderness and gratitude.
But she had lost him, and that by her own weak
vanity.
Yet she did not yield to the weakness of her
heart. She tried every resource, and finally that
of teaching children to read and write. During her
absence in New-York, Madam Vancour had been
seized with a passion for doing good on a great scale
a dangerous propensity in woman, because it is
apt to degenerate into the weakness of indiscriminate
charity. To relieve the distresses of mankind
without
encouraging their vices, their idleness, and
extravagance
is a nice and delicate task; it requires a
knowledge of the dark side of the world and a
self-denial
which women happily seldom attain; and
hence it is that the large share they have taken of
late in the distribution of public and private charities
has without doubt been one of the main causes of
the vast increase of idleness, poverty, and their
consequent vices, which cannot but be evident to
every observer.
With the best intentions in the world, mingled, as
all our best intentions are, with a little alloy of
vanity
and self-applause, Madam Vancour resolved to
institute a school for the gratuitous education of the
children of the neighbouring poor. Not that there
were any poor people in the neighbourhood that
really required her charity in this respect; for riches
and poverty were not at that early period so
disproportionately
distributed as they are at present. But
still, though all were able by industry and economy
to afford their children such instruction as was
necessary to their modes of life (and all beyond is not
only superfluous, but pernicious), still this new-born
desire to do good whispered Madam Vancour that it
would be very charitable to relieve these people
of the burden of educating their own offspring.
Accordingly
she set about it with enthusiasm; and her
first step was to convince these worthy folks, who
had hitherto managed to get on very well, that it
was a great hardship for them to be obliged to
deprive
themselves of certain of the little luxuries
of life to pay for the schooling of their children.
Vat! mine own lawfully-pegotten shildren?
exclaimed old Van Bombeler, who got his living by
making flag-bottomed chairs; why, who den should
pay for dere schooling, if not me? Ain't I dere
fader?
But Madam Vancour soon brought Van Bombeler
to reason, by showing how he could buy six quarts
of pure Jamaica rum, and as many pounds of sugar,
besides a new gown for Mrs. Van Bombeler, with
the money it cost him for the schooling of his three
children. Duyvel! quoth Van Bombeler, why,
I never tought of dat before! So he consented to
madame's desirable proposal. In this manner the
good ladyfor good she certainly was in the
abstract
,
though I fear not practically so in this
instance
in
this manner did she persuade the good
people her neighbours to relinquish the honest, nay,
proud gratification of educating their own children
by the sweat of their own brows. There was one,
and only one, sturdy Dutchman who rejected her
benevolence, and insisted, nay, swore, that nobody
should put their charity upon him. I'll work my
fingers to de bone; and den, if I can't send dem to
school, what's de reason, I should like to know, if
dey can't pay for dere own schooling when dey
grow pig enough? But madame had her revenge
she took away his trade of whisk-brooms, by
setting
up another man in the business; who, as he
lived in one of Colonel Vancour's small houses and
paid no rent, ruined the other by underselling him.
By this means the obstinate fool was brought to
reason; and finally his poverty if not his will
consented
to have his children educated upon charity.
But these difficulties in procuring objects for the
exercise of her new-born virtue soon vanished.
Custom by degrees reconciled the good people to
the degradation of depending on charity for what they
could procure by their own labour; the numerous
examples which in good time presented themselves;
the countenance of madame, to whom they all looked
up with respectful deference; and above all the
means of self-gratification which this diversion of
the fruits of their labour produced; all tended to
consummate this salutary revolution of opinion. It
was surprising to see, in the course of a little while,
how anxious everybody was to get rid of the burden
of educating their children; and with what singular
satisfaction Master Van Bombeler boasted that he
could now afford to drink twice as much as he did
before this blessed invention of charity. In a little
time a great improvement was observed at the Flats;
the children all looked up to Madam Vancour
instead
of their ignorant parents; and the parents
began to wear clothes of a better fashion; to spend
a little more time abroad and a little less at home;
to take a great interest in all matters that did not
concern them; and to elevate their noses much
higher in the scale of creationnow that they
began
to see into the natural and indefeasible claim
which everybody's children had to be educated by
anybody, just as it pleased God. But the most
salutary
consequence was, that the parents began
gradually
to take less interest in their children, conceiving
them to belong altogether to society; and, by in a
great degree leaving them to the care of others,
happily
relieved them from the contagion of their bad
example.
CHAPTER XXI.
Pliny the younger.
Madame Vancour
was extremely fortunate in
procuring
a most efficient auxiliary in the consummation
of this her good work, in the person of Master Pliny
Coffin (the sixteenth), whilom of Nantucket island.
Pliny was the youngest of nine sons and an
unaccountable
number of daughters, born unto Captain
Pliny Coffin (the fifteenth), a most indefatigable and
industrious man by day and by night. Being called
after his uncle, Deacon Pliny Mayhew (the tenth),
he was patronised by that worthy Spermaceti candle
of the church, as he was called, and sent to school
at an early age, with a view to following in the
footsteps
of his uncle. But Pliny the younger had a
natural and irresistible vocation to salt water,
insomuch
that at the age of eighteen months, or
thereabouts
,
being left to amuse himself under the
only tree in Nantucket, which grew in front of
Captain Coffin's (the fifteenth) house, he crawled
incontinently down to the seaside, and was found
disporting himself in the surf like unto a young
gosling. In like manner did Pliny the younger, at
a very early age, display a vehement predilection for
great whales, to the which he was most probably
incited by the stories of his father, Pliny the elder,
who had been a mighty whaler in his day. When
about three years old, a whale was driven ashore
at Nantucket in a storm, where he perished, to
the great joy of the inhabitants, who flocked from
all parts to claim a share of his spoil. On the
morning of that memorable day, which is still recorded
in the annals of Nantucket, Pliny the younger was
missing, and great search being made for him, he
was not to be found in the whole island; to the grief
of his mother, who was a very stout woman, and had
killed three Indians with her own fair hand. As the
people were gathered about the body of the whale,
discussing the mysterious disappearance of the child,
what was their astonishment to behold him coming
forth from the stomach of the great fish, laughing
right merrily at the prank he had played!
But the truth must be confessed; he took his
learning after the manner that people take physic,
more especially doctors, with many wry faces and
much tribulation of spirit. In fact he never learned
his lesson in his whole life, until arriving at his fifth
year, by good fortune a primer was put into his
hand wherein was the picture of a whale, with the
which he was so utterly delighted that he learned
the whole two lines under it in the course of the day.
The teacher aptly took the hint, and by means of
pasting the likeness of a whale at the head of his
lessons, carried him mightily along in the career of
knowledge. In process of time he came to be of
the order of deacons, and was appointed to preach
his first sermon, whereby a great calamity befell him,
which drove him forth a wanderer on the vast
continent
of the universe. Unfortunately the
meeting-house
where he was to make his first essay stood
in full view of the sea, which could be distinctly seen
from the pulpit; and just as Pliny the younger had
divided his text into sixteen parts, behold! a mighty
ship appeared, with a white bone in her teeth, plowing
her way towards the island with clouds of canvass
swelling in the wind. Whereupon the conviction
came across his mind that this must be the good ship
Albatross, returning from a whaling voyage in the great
South Sea; and, sad to relate, his boyish instincts
got the better of his better self. Delirious with eager
curiosity, he rushed from the pulpit, and ran violently
down to the seaside like one possessed, leaving deacon
Mayhew and the rest of the congregation, as it were,
howling in the wilderness. The deacon was wroth,
and forthwith disinherited him. The people said he
was possessed of a devil, and talked of putting him
to the ordeal; whereupon the unfortunate youth
exiled himself from the land of his nativity, and went
to seek his fortune among the heathen, who had
steeples to their churches, and dealt in the
abomination
of white sleeves. Of his wanderings, and of the
accidents of his pilgrimage I know nothing, until his
pilgrimage directed him to the Flats, where there
were neither whales nor whaling ships, to lead him
into temptation.
As one of the contemplated improvements of
Madam Vancour, was the introduction of the
English language among her pupils, instead of the
heathenish Dutch dialect, she eagerly seized the first
offer of Pliny, and engaged him forthwith to take
charge of her seminary. In this situation he was
found by Catalina, who, as we have before stated, in
the desolation of her spirit, resolved to attempt the
relief of her depression by entering upon the difficult
task of being useful to others. She accordingly
occasionally associated herself with Master Pliny in
the labours of his mission, greatly to the consolation
of his inward man. He took great pains to initiate
her into the mysteries of his new philosophical,
practical, elementary, and scientific system of
education
,
on which he prided himself exceedingly, and
with justice, for it hath been lately revised and
administered among us with singular success, by
divers ungenerous pedagogues, who have not had the
conscience to acknowledge whence it was derived.
As Newton took the hint of the theory of
gravitation
from seeing an apple fall to the ground, and as
the illustrious Marquis of Worcester stole the first
idea of the application of steam by seeing the
risings and sinkings of a pot-lid, so did Master Pliny
model and graduate his whole system of education
from the incident of the whale in the primer.
Remembering with what eagerness he had himself
been attracted towards learning by a picture, he
resolved to make pictures the great means of drawing
forth what he called the latent energies of the infant
genius, spurring on the march of intellect, and
accelerating the development of mind. But as
pictures were scarce articles in those times, he
devoted one day in the week, in which he sallied
forth with all his scholars, to collect materials for
their studies; that is, to gather acorns, pebbles,
leaves, briers, bugs, ants, caterpillars, and what not.
When he wanted an urchin to spell Bug, he
placed one of these new professors of the art right
above the word, and mighty was his exultation at
seeing how the child was assisted in cementing
B-U-G together, by the bug. In this way he taught
every thing by sensible objects, boasting at the same
time of the originality of his method, little suspecting
that he had only got hold of the fag end of Chinese
emblems and Egyptian hieroglyphics. But pride
will have a fall. One day, at Catalina's suggestion,
master Pliny put his scholars to the test by setting
them to spell without the aid of sensible objects,
and by the mere instrumentality of the letters.
They made sad work of it; hardly one could spell
bug without the presence of the insect to prompt
them. They had become so accustomed to the
assistance of the
thing
, that they paid little or no
attention to the letters which represented it; and
Catalina ventured to hint to master Pliny, that the
children had learned little or nothing. They knew
what was a bug before, and that seemed to be the
extent of their knowledge now. Yea, answered he,
but it makes the acquisition of learning so easy.
To the teacher, certainly, replied the young
lady. In fact, when she came to analyze the
improvements
in master Pliny's system, she found that
they all tended to one point, namely, diminishing, not
the labour of the scholar in learning, but of the
master in teaching. I forbear to touch on all the
other various plans of master Pliny for accelerating
the march of mind. Suffice it to say, they were
all one after another abandoned, being found
desperately
out at the elbows when subjected to the test
of wear and tear. They have, however, since been
revived with wonderful success by divers illustrious
and philosophical pedagogues abroad and at home,
who have brought the system to such perfection,
that they have not the least trouble in teaching, nor
the children any thing but downright pleasure in
learning. Happy age! and happy Pliny, had he
lived to this day to behold the lamp which he lighted
shining over the whole universe. He, however,
abandoned his system at the instance of a silly girl,
and soon after deserted the Flats; the same cause
being at the bottom of botha woman.
The evil spirit which possessed master Pliny
to run out of the pulpit now prompted him to
run his head into the fire. Pliny was a
rosycheeked
,
curly-headed, fresh-looking man, sorely
admired by the Dutch damsels thereabout, and still
more by a certain person who shall be nameless.
He thought himself an Adonis; and he thought to
himself that no young lady in her senses would
turn schoolmistress voluntarily, and without some
powerful incitement. The said demon whispered
that this incitement could could nothing but admiration
of his person, and love for his company. Upon
this hint he first began to ogle the young lady; then
to take every opportunity to touch her hand, or press
against her elbow, until she could not but notice the
peculiarity of his conduct. Finally, he wrote her a
love-epistle, of such transcendent phraseology that
it frightened Catalina out of school for ever. She
did not wish to injure the simple fellow, and took
this method of letting him know his fate. Poor
Pliny the younger pined in thought, and soon after
took his departure for the land of his nativity, where,
when he arrived, he was kindly forgiven by his
uncle, the deacon, and received into the bosom of
the meeting-house. Here he preached powerfully
many years, never ran after whale ships more, and
in good time, by the death of his father, came to be
called Pliny the elder.
CHAPTER XXII.
Letters without Answers.
Thus
our unfortunate heroine was destined to lose
all her admirers one by one. In the mean time, during
the progress of those events, a correspondence on
public
affairs had been carried on between Sir William
Johnson and Colonel Vancour, in which the former
had taken occasion to mention the conduct of
Sybrandt
in terms of high approbation. He spoke of
him as a youth of uncommon talents and intrepidity,
in whose future welfare he took the deepest interest.
The officers, too, who occasionally stopped at the
mansion-house in their journeys from the frontier to
New-York, all united in bearing testimony to his
gallantry and enterprise; and, to crown all, the
despatches
of the general to his government at home
made honourable mention of our hero. Catalina
was not ignorant of all this, nor could she help
feeling
a proud gratification, that the man to whom she
had given her heart was worthy of the gift. But
he is lost to mehe is woundedperhaps dying;
and he does not think it worth while to write or
send to us.
But in this she did our hero injustice. He lay a
long time lingering between life and death; but at
length the vigour of youth, strengthened by his
hopes of the future, got the better of the low fever
Vol. II.G
which had succeeded his wounds and exposures,
and he began gradually, but slowly, to recover. As
soon as his strength would permit, he wrote to
Catalina, informing her of his explanation with
Gilfillan
;
apologizing for his unfounded jealousy, his
rash departure from New-York, and throwing
himself
on her generosity for pardon. It happened at
this time there was no opportunity to send the
letter by a public express, nor had Sybrandt patience
to wait for one. In casting about for a messenger,
he recollected a half Indian, a sort of lounger and
hanger-on about the fort, who performed all sorts
of menial offices for rum, and was, in the most
comprehensive
sense of the word, a vagabond. Still he
had the reputation of courage, sagacity, and fidelity
in the performance of his engagements; and our
hero determined to employ him as the messenger of
Dan Cupid, who most probably was never served
by such a valet before. He had in times past been
accustomed to forage about the Flats, where he was
well known, and where Sybrandt became acquainted
with him.
He accordingly intrusted him with his letter,
together
with two others, one for the good Dennis,
the other for Colonel Vancour, the contents of which
the reader may imagine for himself if he pleases.
He was also imprudent enough to furnish the fellow
with money to bear his expenses, instead of giving
him a knapsack and provisions; and thus he
despatched
him, with many injunctions to proceed
without delay, deliver his letters, wait an answer,
and then return as soon as possible. This trusty
blade, instead of following these directions, took the
first opportunity of his arrival at Albany to get
exceedingly
corned
, as the phrase now is, and so
continued
until all his money was spent. As a matter
of necessity, he then became sober; but his letters
were gonehe had lost or destroyed them, or they
had been taken from him; he could not tell how or
when.
The trusty messenger then deliberated what was
proper and safe to be done. To go to the Flats
without his credentials was out of the question; and
to return to Fort George for a new set of
instructions
would be a vast accession of trouble, without
any accession of pay. Nay, he might possibly get
a broken head for his pains. This compendium of
the virtues of the red and the white rose had an
equal antipathy to having his head broken and to the
volunteering of additional trouble without additional
pay. The result of his cogitations was a resolution
to put the best face on the matter, make up a good
story, and return forthwith to his employer. He
accordingly entered the presence of Sybrandt with
an intrepidity of face and manner that would have
done honour to the most practised diplomatist.
Have you brought any letters? asked our hero,
eagerly, as he raised himself from the bed, where
he still spent some hours of every day.
No, sir; I no bring any ting!
Did you see the young lady? said our hero,
faintly.
Yes, sir; I see her, and give her the letter.
And did she read it?
O, yes; she read it, and say very nice letter
and then she laugh.
Laugh! thought poor Sybrandt; and his heart
sank within him; but she gave you something in
return?
Yes, sir; she gib me a guinea, and tell me go
G 2
back agin as fast as I camede letter no want
answer.
Did she look pale? was she thin? asked he,
after a dead pause of agonized feeling.
O Lord, sir! no; her cheeks red as berries, and
she merry as a cricket: she laugh very much when
I tell her you sick a-bed.
Sybrandt groaned an echo to the laugh of his
unfeeling
mistress. It was some minutes before he
could rally his spirits to ask any more questions.
Did you see the colonel and Madam Vancour?
O yes, sir; colonel very goodgive me a dram,
and say he 'spose Major Sybran dead by dis time.
And he, too, laughed, I suppose? said
Sybrandt
,
in bitterness of spirit.
No, he no laugh out loud like young madam
he only smile a leetlesoand the rascal just
showed his ivory teeth.
Sybrandt found himself sicker and sicker at the
heart, with every word he heard.
And what did Madam Vancour say when you
told her my situation? resumed he, at length.
She tell meno more than Master Sybran
desarve
.
Worse and worse!thought poor Master
Sybrandt
the
draught becomes bitterer and bitterer:
well, let me drink it to the bottom, to the dregs
and he called anger and indignation to come and be
his supporters.
And what said my other uncle, Mr. Dennis
Vancour?
Whatold gentleman lives on the hill? O, he
say he 'spose Master Sybran be dead 'fore he letter
get at him, and tell me no occasion to write.
Sybrandt (as soon as he could muster strength and
heart to do it) proceeded to question the mischievous
mongrel closely and strictly as to the truth of his
tale, which seemed to be at war with all he knew
of his mistress and his uncles. But the fellow was
armed at all points, and answered with such
consummate
cunning, that at length our hero was
compelled to believe that Catalina had made such a
representation of his conduct to her family on her
return as had for ever alienated him from their
confidence
and affection.
Very well, said he, after going rapidly through
these reflections, and arriving at this consoling result
very welltherenow goand he gave him
money for having performed his duty so speedily
and well.
I will trouble
her
no more; I will trouble
them
no more, said he, as he laid himself down on his
bed, with a hope that he might never rise from it
again. There was every appearance this hope
would soon be realized; for the result of this
journey
co-operating with his weak and nervous state
of mind and body, seemed now on the point of
extinguishing
in a few days, perhaps a few hours, the
last spark of life in his aching heart.
CHAPTER XXIII.
The last sleep of a good man.
Not
many days after the events recorded in our
last chapter, a young officer stopped at the hospitable
mansion of Colonel Vancour, on his way from Fort
George to New-York. It was in the dusk of the
evening, and he was of course invited to stay all
night. The conversation naturally turned on the
events of the war, the prospect of peace, and the
situation of matters on the frontier. Catalina was
sitting at an open window, leaning her white cheek
on her still whiter hand, listening in breathless
silence, to hear perhaps the name of him who
occupied
so large a portion of her thoughts.
Has any thing particular occurred at Fort
George? asked the colonel.
Nothing, I believe, replied the officer; at
least, I heard nothing: I however only stopped there
a few minutes, on my way from the foot of the lake,
where I had been stationed for some time.
Did you happen to hear any thing of Colonel
Westbrook? asked the other in a low tone; but
his daughter overheard him, and her heart beat
quicker in her bosom.
Westbrook! Westbrook!Why, now I think
of itI did hear something of that gallant and
lamented officerhe died the day
Hush! for heaven's sake! whispered the
colonel. But the caution came too late. The words
of the officer had met the ear of Catalina, and thence
passed like daggers to her heart, and stilled its
beatings
for a few minutes. She did not faintshe did
not shriek, or scream, or wring her handsbut she
sat like a statue of pure white marble carved by
some famous artist to represent the silence of
unutterable
grief. Her mother was watching, and came
and sat beside her daughter, who leaned on her
bosom, and said not one word. In the course of a
quarter of an hour she recovered sufficiently to beg
Madam Vancour to go up stairs with her, and they
left the room together.
After her departure the colonel proceeded with
his inquiries.
You were saying, sir, that you understood
Colonel
Westbrook was dead. When I inform you
that he is a near relation, and an object of great
interest to my family, I hope you will excuse me for
requesting you to be particular in relating the
circumstances
of his death.
I am sorry, replied the young officer, that I
cannot comply with your wishes. As I mentioned
before, I stopped but a few minutes at the Fort to
receive despatches, and while sitting with the
general, who was preparing them, the servant of
Colonel Westbrook came running in to say his master
had just expired. The general expressed great
regret, and I, having received the despatches, came
away without hearing any thing further on the
subject.
Catalina did not rise with the sun as usual the
next day, though it was one of the loveliest of all
the lovely progeny of Summer. She attempted
it, for she was not one of those who yield the
victory
to grief or sickness without a sore struggle.
When she saw the beams of the morning sun shining
against the wall, and heard the birds calling her at
the window, she attempted to rise, but her head
became
so dizzy she was obliged to let it fall again
quietly upon the pillow. The old lady became
alarmed; and all thoughts of being mother to a real
titled lady vanished before the fears of maternal
tenderness
.
Accordingly she determined, as people frequently
do when it is rather too late, to perform an act of
unparalleled magnanimity; an act which merits
being commemorated in brass and marble: in short,
she determined to desert the opposition, and go
over to her husband. Accordingly, she went to the
colonel, and frankly proposed to write to Sybrandt
a full explanation of Catalina's conduct and present
feelings, and invite him home.
What! now that he is dead! said the good
man, with tears in his eyes.
That's true; I declare I forgot it, replied the
dame; what shall we do?
Submit to the will of Heaven.
Well, I declare it's very provoking though.
What! to submit to the will of Heaven?
No, my dear; that he should die just at this
time.
Such provoking accidents often happen in this
world. You and I have lived long enough to see
the hopes of youth wither in the blossom, the fruits
of manhood's toils and cares mildewed before they
were ripe. There is nothing certain in this world
but death: why, then, should we be surprised that
he died in the prime of his days? It is not half so
strange as that you and I have lived to be old.
This was rather an ungallant speech, since age
has ever been considered in polite society a reproach
to a lady, and any allusion to it an offence to
good-breeding
.
But the good madam forgave, or did not
notice it. She was thinking of something nearer
her heart than compliments. Was she not a
remarkable
woman?
But perhaps, after all, said madam, the
report
of his death may be a mistake of the servant.
He may only have fallen into that state between life
and death, which marks the crisis of a slow fever.
Such reports generally turn out to be true. But
I will see if I can gather any further information on
the subject.
He ordered his horse, and rode to Albany, for the
purpose of making inquiries. The commanding
officer at Albany had received letters by the hands
of the young gentleman who had brought the news
of Sybrandt's death, at the foot of one of which was
this short postscript:
Colonel Westbrook is just dead!
The old gentleman returned, with a heavy heart,
to the mansion of his fathers, and communicated
this confirmation to his wife. They debated whether
to disclose the whole at once to their daughter.
It is best she should know it all, since she must
know it soon, said the colonel; go thou and tell
herI cannot. He walked forth into the fields,
now glorious in all the panoply of summer. But
he viewed them through the spectacles of sorrow,
and the sunny landscape seemed all bathed in tears.
It was now Catalina's turn to be sick. She heard
the confirmation of the death of poor Sybrandt; and
the loss of her lover was imbittered by the
consciousness
that she was a principal accomplice.
G 3
She it was that had driven him from his home, to
the wars in which he had perished. But for her
foolish vanity, her capricious inconsistencies, he
might have been still livingand living for her.
The thought was bitterness itself. But she rallied
her pride, her piety, her strength of mind, her duty
to her parents, and they conquered at last. Yet the
victory was hardly won; though the mind sustained
itself nobly, its associate and fellow-labourer, the
body, sunk under the conflict. Months passed
away before she could sit up and contemplate the
calm and tender aspect of nature, now fast putting
on the many-coloured vesture of the waning year.
Nor was she the only sufferer. The good Dennis
the early friend, the father of our hero in all acts of
fatherly affectionwho had smoked his pipe almost
threescore years in quiet in the same old arm-chair
heard the news of Sybrandt's death without any
outward symptoms of sorrow or despair. He
possessed
no great store of sensibility, but a slight
shock will shake down an old building. He
knocked the ashes out of his pipe deliberately against
his thumb-nail, and that evening, and the next, and
the next morning, noon, and night, when it was
brought to him he put it aside without uttering a
word.
Massa in a terrible bad way, said his old dusky
valet, who had been his playmate in youth, his faithful,
humble friend through life; massa in a terrible bad
way when he no smoke he pipe.
The old man reasoned philosophically, or at least
he came to the right conclusion, which the vulgar
generally do by a sort of short-hand cut of their
own. It is astonishing, as it is mortifying to the
pride of human learning, to see how many, how
very many of the discoveries of philosophers
have been anticipated by the homely experience of
the unlearned of this world. They may not perhaps
know the reason, but they know the thing is so, and
this answers their purpose quite as well.
The old
natural
philosopher was right. There is
no surer indication of a wounded spirit or diseased
body than the disrelish of a long-cherished habit.
It smells of mortality. The quiet resignation with
which the good Dennis received the first shock,
gave place in a day or two to a degree of
restlessness
and impatience entirely at war with his usual
deportment. It seemed as if his mind was disturbed
by conflicting feelings of some kind or other, for he
frequently shut himself up in his little private room,
where he kept his papers, and where he was
sometimes
found when called to his meals, leaning on his
elbows on a table with papers before him. When
thus disturbed, he would appear rather pleased than
otherwise, as though he had been relieved from some
unpleasant struggle or uncertainty. On the fourth
day after receiving the news of Sybrandt's death, he
was found sitting in his arm-chair, dead. He had
died without pain, for his face had all the placid quiet
of a sweet sleep, and he sat upright as when alive.
Ah! poor massa! exclaimed the old man of
colour; he smoke him last pipe now! and nature
squeezed some honest tears from his dry and
withered sympathies.
Dennis Vancour was a good man. He neverfor
it was not the fashion at that timehe never was
secretary, or, what is still better, treasurer to a society
for expending the hard gains of honest industry, in
the encouragement of idleness and unthrift. He
never went about begging of others what he was able
to bestow himself; nor did he spend his time in the
mischievous occupation of doing good to his
fellow-creatures
,
the poor, by teaching them as the wise and
benevolent Franklin has it, that there are other
means of support besides industry and economy.
But these sins of omission were more than
balanced by rare and valuable virtues. He never
belied, or cheated, or overreached a human being;
he never denied his good offices or good report to the
deserving, nor inquired before he bestowed them,
whether they were given to a member of his favourite
society or his favourite religion. He walked quietly
on his way without jostling a living soul with his
elbow, or interfering with his concerns unless desired
to do so; and within the circle where alone ordinary
men can be useful in their exertions or their
beneficence
the
circle of his friends and neighbourshe
diffused all his life a benign yet temperate influence,
which caused every one that knew him to love him
while living, and cherish his memory after he was
gone. When he died, he left what he had received
from his father to his nearest natural heirs, nor did
he insult Heaven by robbing his kindred to commute
for his own transgressions.
The day but one after the decease of the good
man, on whose memory I confess I delight to dwell,
the bell of the little octagon stone church at the
Flats gave melancholy warning that the body of some
heir of immortality was about to be consigned to
that narrow house wherein no air can blow. There
is to my mind and to my early recollections
something
exquisitely touching in the tolling of a
church-bell
amid the silence of the country. It communicates
for miles around the message of mortality. The
ploughman stops his horses to listen to the solemn
tidings; the housewife remits her domestic
occupations
,
and sits with needle idle in her fingers, to
ponder who it is that is going to the long home; and
even the little thoughtless children, playing and
laughing their way from school, are arrested for a
moment in their evening gambols by these sounds
of melancholy import, and cover their heads when
they go to rest.
In a little while was seen a long procession of
various rustic carriages, followed by people on foot
and on horseback, of both sexes, and of all ages,
slowly emerging from the court of the house whence
the soul of the good man had ascended to its reward,
and proceeding to the place appointed for all
living. The simple ceremony was soon over. A
prayer was uttered, a hymn was sung, many an
honest tear mixed with the earth thrown into the
grave, as the nearest and dearest hung anxiously
over it; and the remains of the good Dennis reposed
in peace between the grave-stones of his honoured
parents.
He was a good man
, said an old patriarch of
almost a hundred years, and the testimony was
vouched by the hearts of all present. Does any one
wish a nobler epitaph? If he does, let him go and
take his choice of the legends engraven on the
mouldering monuments of human vanity,no part of
which is true perchance but the veritable
Hic jacet
.
Had he lived a little while longer, he would not
perhaps have been wiser, but he would have learned
something, as the advertisements in the newspapers
say, greatly to his advantage. But who would
wish to rob him of an end so quiet, so resigned, so
blessed, that he might learn the truth, and endure
possibly a few years of infirmity and suffering; live
as some men live, to nurse the waning lamp of life
by day and night, anxious and shivering lest every
breath of air should blow it out; live in the perpetual
fear of what must soon inevitably come, die without
hope, and rot in the polluted atmosphere of a
dishonoured
name. Who would wish so unkind a wish?
Not I; for to my mind that man is most to be envied
who is beyond the reach of calumny, and debarred
by death from perhaps committing suicide on his
own fame.
CHAPTER XXI.
A Ghost!
However
people may grieve for the decease of a
relative, they seldom neglect opening his will the
first decent opportunity. Such is the curiosity of
mankind! This ceremony accordingly took place
the day after the funeral of Mr. Dennis Vancour.
That worthy gentleman, it would seem, on hearing
of the death of his nephew, had altered the
disposition
of his property, and substituted Catalina his
sole heiress, in the room of Sybrandt Westbrook.
The change occasioned no surprise to the elders of
the family, and certainly no pleasure to the young
lady. She would have restored it to her cousin with
her whole heart, and something else besides, had he
not been beyond the reach of her generosity. As it
was, the bequest was rather painful than otherwise,
for it seemed almost like a robbery of the dead.
The colonel one day thought he would write to
the commanding officer at Fort George, to request
of him the particulars of the death of his nephew,
as well as to inquire as to the disposition of his
effects. He did so; but it was a considerable time
before an opportunity occurred of sending the letter
through the wilderness. In the mean time nothing
particularly worthy of note took place in the family.
Catalina gradually recovered a degree of
composure
becoming the dignity and strength of her
character, and returned to her usual occupations and
amusements. But the worm was in the bud, and the
blush on her cheek was neither that of health or
hilarity. Time passed on slowly and heavily,
without bringing with it either present pleasure or
inspiring anticipations.
It was now the brown and gloomy month of
November, when neither verdure is seen in the
forest nor music heard in the fields, except that of the
howling winds. A man on horseback, followed by
a servant with a portmanteau, was seen to ride up
to the door of the habitation once tenanted by Dennis
Vancour, but now intrusted to the care of his servants,
consisting of the venerable old negro heretofore
noticed, and his wife equally aged, with some half a
dozen of their ebony grandchildren. It was the
dusk of the evening, and they were all gathered
round a rousing fire in the kitchen; for, be it known
to all who know it not already, that the two animals
in the world most devoted to heat and sunshine are
the black snake and the gentleman of colourby the
which association I mean no sort of disrespect to
the latter.
The horseman dismounted, so did his servant, and
both proceeded to enter the premises with as little
ceremony as if they were at home, or, if not at home,
at some place where they might expect an equal
welcome. Not one of the trusty guardians of the
house heard or saw these intruders; for as soon as
the ebony race get thoroughly warmed through, the
next thing is to fall fast asleep, as a matter of course.
The stranger knocked with the butt-end of his whip;
no one came. He then proceeded to manuvre the
great gaping brazen lion that guarded this enchanted
castleanglice, the knockerwhich. I am bound to
say, had lost none of its brightness. The sound was
heard across the river, but it awaked not the family
of the ebonies; they belonged to the race of the
seven sleepers. The stranger became impatient,
nay, anxious, at the air of silence and desertion about
the house. He paced the piazza back and forth
some half a dozen times, and then proceeded round
the end of the house to the kitchen in the rear, and
looked through the windows, where he saw the
sleeping beauties.
The sight seemed to animate him, for he went and
briskly lifted the latch, and entered the region sacred
to the stomach. No one stirred, and no sound was
heard save a sonorous concord of harmony, in which
each of the company bore a part. The stranger
advanced, and shook the shoulder of the patriarch
of the tuneful tribe. He might as well have shaken
the body of the good man of the house, who died
some two months before. He sat immoveable, like
one of the goodly company that was petrified into
black marble, in the story of the fisherman and the
genii. The stranger then hallooed in his ear, but that
was asleep too. Blockhead! quoth the stranger,
muttering to himself, and seizing a basin or bowl, I
think it was a wooden bowl, of water, he very
unceremoniously dashed it into the face of the
exemplary
sleeper, and spoiled one of the finest naps on
record.
Bo-o-o-o! exclaimed old ebony, as he started
up, amazed and indignant at this inundation. He
wiped his eyes, probably for the purpose of seeing
the clearer, and took a look at the stranger, which
look was followed by immediate prostration,
accompanied
by a yell of such singular originality that I
shall not attempt to describe it. The reader may,
however, form some judgment of its powers, when I
inform him that it actually awakened the rest of the
sleepers, and dissolved the enchantment of the black
islands. The moment they laid their eyes upon the
stranger, the cry of a spook! a spook! was
repeated with extraordinary energy, and followed by
the dispersion of the whole tribe different ways, with
the exception of the patriarch, who still lay on his
face, kicking and roaring manfully.
Return we now to the mansion-house of Colonel
Vancour, in the well-warmed parlour of which was
collected the usual family-party. The colonel was
reading; madam, would I could disguise the fact,
but a scrupulous regard to accuracy forbidsmadam
was knitting a pair of stockings for a poor woman
who at that precise moment was frolicking at a
neighbouring tavern; Ariel was, as usual at this hour
of the evening, fast asleep, and musical as ever. He
did not, like Rachel Baker, preach in his naps, but
he could drown the voice of a preacher any day.
Catalina, poor Catalina, was at the window; whence,
by the waning light, she could see and sympathize
with the desolation of nature.
At this moment one of the dark ministering spirits
of the neighbouring mansion rushed into the room
unannounced, and saluted the good company with
the cry of
A spook! a spook! massa Sybrandt's spook!
Hey! what's that you say about Sybrandt, you
little black sinner? exclaimed Ariel, waking up,
which he did always exactly as he went to sleep,
extempore.
O massa Sybrandt's spook come home agin
I'll spook you, you little black imp of mischief,
quoth Ariel, seizing the cushion from his chair, and
launching it at his woolly head; come here with
such a cock-and-bull story as that; get out, you
caterpillar!
But the herald of darkness maintained his station
and his story of the appearance of massa Sybrandt's
spook, until the old people did not know what to
make of it, and the young lady was in a tumult of
conflicting emotions. It was impossible to get any
thing more out of the creature than that the spook
had appeared in a great shower of rain, and knocked
granddaddy flat on his face upon the floor.
Let us walk over, and inquire into the
business
,
said the colonel, helping himself to his hat
and stick; perhaps something is really the matter
with the old man.
Come on, quoth Ariel, seizing a gun which
hung in the hall upon the stately antlers of a deer;
perhapsdn itI don't know what to think of
the matter.
Perhaps it is he
! exclaimed Catalina, as a
hope darted across her mind like the flash of a
newly-lighted taper.
The two gentlemen seemed to share in her hopes,
and departed in great haste.
While this was passing, the stranger had by dint
of shaking, and reasoning, and reproaching the old
negro, at length brought him to a perception of the
reality before him.
And young massa no dead, after allno spook
hey! and the good soul almost wept for joy of
his young master's return, as well as sorrow for his
old master's departure. By degrees he became
sufficiently collected to give Sybrandt an account of
the events we have heretofore recorded. The death
of his kind uncle affected him deeply, far more
deeply than the loss of his estate. He had
disinherited
him, it was true; but no doubt he had been
convinced of his unworthiness by the
representations
of Catalina. There was gall and wormwood
in this thought; and while he was chewing the
bitter morsel, the colonel and Ariel entered without
ceremony. The reception of Sybrandt was
somewhat
cool and statelythe deportment of the
colonel, when the really joyful surprise of the
moment was past, savoured of the recollection of
his nephew's neglect of his daughter, of himself,
and indeed all his nearest, dearest friends. Ariel
was all joy, noise, and forgiveness.
But why the plague did you not let us know
you were alive? said he, at length.
I did not know you thought me dead, replied
the youth.
Thought?we were sure of it. Do you
suppose
that Dennis would have dishem!if he had
not been certain of your death?
True, said the colonel; the bequest was
certainly
made under that impression alone. It
remains
for me to remedy the consequences of this
mistake.
He did right, said Sybrandt; he has left his
fortune to her who best deserved it.
Dn it, boy, you talk like a fool. To leave
you a beggarnonot a beggarI can prevent
that; quoth Ariel.
My dear uncle, I am no beggar; I have a sword
and a commission, a heart and a hand.
Spoke like a brave fellow. But I am very much
mistaken if you don't have something besides a
sword and a commission.
I am content.
But I am not, said the colonel; there cannot
be a doubt that my brother Dennis altered his
bequest
under the full conviction (which indeed was
common to us all) that you were no more.
I cannot conceive how such a report could have
originated, or be believed, sir.
I saw it in a postscript to a letter of the
commander-in-chief
.
Indeed! then I do not wonder, sir, that you
believed
it.
But to the point, resumed the colonel;
Catalina
is of age; and she is no daughter of mine if
she holds this bequest a moment longer than is
necessary to divest herself of it. I pledge you my
honour she will.
And I pledge you mine, sir, said Sybrandt,
somewhat bitterly, that I would rather starve than
accept one single atom of the land, or one penny of
the gold. Thank God! I am not so mean as that!
It is justly yours.
It never shall be mine.
Indeed! replied the colonel, rather offended;
may I ask why? perhaps the donor is not
sufficiently
valued to make the donation welcome?
Spare me on this subject, sir. I had rather not
talk of it; nor is it necessary. To-morrow I shall
return to the army. To-nightfor one nightI will
trespass on the hospitality of my cousin, and remain
here, with her permission.
You shall go home with me, said the colonel,
with honest warmth, notwithstanding he felt the
language and conduct of our hero was somewhat on
the cavalier order; you shall go home with me;
my daughmy wife, your aunt, will be glad to see
you.
You shall go home with me, cried Ariel;
but, now I think of it, I am going to sleep at the
colonel's to-night, because I have got to superintend
a hundred and fifty things there early in the morning.
Sybrandt declared his determination to remain
where he was for the night.
Well, then, said the colonel, advancing, and
taking his hand, promise me, on your honour, you
will visit your aunt before you go away.
Of course, sircertainlyit was my intention.
I owe too much to her kindness to forget both my
respect and my duty: I hope she is well?
Quite well.
And my cousin? Sybrandt forced himself to ask.
Why, wellat least better than she has been.
What! has she been ill?
Very illjust after we received the newsI
mean about two months ago. Indeed she is hardly
recovered; you will be surprised to see her look so
palealmost as pale as you are. But good-night
I can no longer delay making both mother and
daughter
happy with the news that one has recovered a
nephew, the other an old friend. You will keep
your word, and come to-morrow?
Assuredly, sir.Make them happy! thought
he, repeating the words of the colonel; make them
happy with the news that I am alive. Pshaw! they
care not for me, none of them, or they would have
answered my letters. Butand a sudden idea
crossed himbut perhaps, as Sir William
suggested
,
they never received them. It is possible;
and to-morrow I will so far lower my pride as to
put the question. It is but justice to old friends to
give them an opportunity of disclaiming neglect or
unkindness.
CHAPTER XXV.
The birth and parentage of a Rumour.
In
order to account for some portion of the
preceding
details, it will be necessary to go back to
the period when the faithful half-breed did
not
carry
the letters of our hero to the Flats, and of course
returned without answers. This disappointment
acting on the low state of our hero's spirits and
exhausted
frame produced an almost infantine
weakness
,
and rendered him incapable of any kind of
exertion for some time. Having one day, however,
made more than ordinary efforts, and fatigued
himself
greatly, he fell into a fainting fit, which his
servant mistook for death, and in his fright
announced
it as such to the general, in the presence
of the young officer, as before related. The
general
was at that moment closing a letter to the
commanding
officer at Albany, and wrote the hasty
postscript which Colonel Vancour saw.
That Sybrandt ever awakened from his swoon,
was, in a great measure, owing to the persevering
efforts of his friend Sir William, who happened to
be coming to see him just at the moment, and whose
long experience in administering to his subjects, the
Indians, had made him no indifferent practitioner.
He succeeded in restoring him at last, and the
youth again opened his eyes to that world which at
that moment he wished to shut out for ever. The
campaign was now about to close. The tops of
the mountains began to be tipped with snow, the
shores of the lake to be laced in the mornings with
borders of ice, and the deep, dark brown forest,
where nothing of verdure was to be seen but the
solemn evergreen pines and hemlocks, announced
the near approach of the long white winter of the
north.
You must go with me to Johnstown to recruit
before you return home, as I suppose you mean to
do, as soon as you are able. There will be nothing
done here till the spring.
I feel no wish to leave this place. I may as
well die here as any where else.
If you stay here you will certainly die of
consumption
.
I don't like that hollow cough, it smells
of mortality. Come, I will procure you leave of
absence, a comfortable conveyance, and an
excellent
nurse, that is, myself. Nay, no scruples of
love or honour. I say you shall go, or I will put
you under arrest, and carry you in fetters. You
would cut a pretty figure to go home to your
mistress
.
She might lawfully break her faith on the
score of your not being the same man.
I have neither mistress nor home now, said
the youth, in a voice of the deepest depression.
What, again! at your old tricks again? cried
Sir William, holding up his finger in a threatening
manner. Are you committing suicide on your own
hopes and happiness, as usual?
No, Sir William; the fault is not mine
now
at
least, whatever it might have been formerly. I am
an alien from my home, and an offcast of my
mistress
.
Indeed! and by your own fault?
No, on my soul. I was deceived, and the
moment
I discovered my error, hastened to acknowledge
and atone for it. But my letters were read with
scorn on one hand, and unfeeling apathy on the
other. I shall never return home again; at least,
not till I have learned to forget and forgive.
Tell me the particulars; remember you are
talking to a friend, and that with me that name
signifies
the service of heart and hand.
Sybrandt then proceeded to relate what the
reader already knows. The conduct of Catalina in
New-York, his anger and jealousy, the story of the
picture, the explanation of Gilfillan, and, finally, the
mission of the half-breed to the Flats.
Sir William listened with kind attention, and at
the conclusion mused for some time.
Strange! said he, at length. The conduct
of your mistress may be accounted for on the score
of self-reproach, mixed with wounded pride and
delicacy. But that Colonel Vancour, a man so
kind-hearted and so just as I know him to be; and,
above all, that your good uncle, father Dennis, who,
you say, had treated you with such unvaried kindness
from your youth upwardsthat he should have
made such an unfeeling speech is out of all
reasonable
calculation. I cannot account for it; unless,
indeed, some one has belied you; and who could it
be, except. But that is out of the question.
You are grossly deceived, and have deceived me,
in the character of Miss Vancour, or it cannot
possibly
be her.
I think it almost impossible. But she may have
viewed my conduct in a different light from that in
which I have represented it to you. The pride of
the father may have been wounded, and his feelings
may have reached my benefactor, over whom he
had great influence.
Vol. II.H
Sir William mused again, then suddenly
exclaimed
,
I have it!I have it. My life on it, that
scoundrel
half-breed played you a trick. He never
delivered
your letters. Where is he? Let him be
brought before me. I warrant I trip him in
crossing
his track, as these fellows say.
I know not. He wandered away somewhere
not long after I employed him in this business.
I dare say,no doubtno doubtthe rascal
was fearful of being detected. But we shall find
out the truth before long. Have you not written
since?
Why should I?
True, but you shall write instantly; at least,
the very first opportunity. I am almost sure you
have been cheated by that mongrel.
I had rather not write again. To Catalina I
shall certainly not write, nor to her father. Were
my benefactor really my parent, I would beg his
forgiveness, if I had offended him, until he granted
it, or turned me for ever from his door. But it
seems to me it would be meanness to crawl on my
knees to solicitwhat? his charity. I cannot do it.
You are a proud genius, said Sir William,
shaking his head; but I like a little pride; it often
saves man, and woman too, from falling. I shall
write myself then, when I get home, and an
opportunity
occurs. In the mean time, without an if or
and, you are my prisoner. Be ready to accompany
me to-morrow.
I obey, said the other. But nothing about
prisonersI go as a volunteer.
The next morning they were ready to depart,
under the protection of an escort of Sir William's
Mohawks, some of whom by turns carried Sybrandt
in a rude litter of boughs. There were no
carriage-roads
through the wilderness between Fort George
and the capital of the knight's dominions, and
Sybrandt
was still too weak to walk or ride on
horseback
any great distance. The Grand Canal was not
yet dreamed of; and as for railroads, if the people of
that age of non-improvement had heard the people
of this would risk their necks in riding at the rate
of sixty miles an hour, they would have taken it for
granted they were riding towhew!
The exercise of travelling, co-operating with the
new-born hope which the suggestion of his friend
Sir William had awakened, proved of great
service
to our hero, who arrived at the residence of
that worthy knight far better than when he set out.
He remained with him, occasionally hunting and
shooting, and invigorating thus both mind and body,
until both had in some degree recovered a healthful
tone.
As you seemed disinclined to write, said Sir
William, one day, I have done it for you. I shall
send a person to Albany to-morrow. Here is the
letterread, and tell me how you like it. This is
the next best thing I can think of, though my own
opinion is, you had much better go yourself, and
see and hear with your own eyes and ears. This
is the way I always do, whenever it is practicable.
Half the blunders and miseries of this world arise
from sending instead of going.
Sybrandt had been gradually coming to the same
conclusion, and frankly answered,
Well, Sir William, since you will turn me out
of doors, there is no help for it. I will go with
your messenger to-morrow; though, on my soul, I
had rather encounter another bush-fight.
H 2
You are an odd fellow, Westbrook, said the
other, smiling, and seem afraid of nothingbut
a woman. Accordingly all things were made
ready for the morrow.
Westbrook, said the knight, as they were
taking leave, don't forget to invite me to your
wedding.
Will you come? asked Sybrandt, with a
melancholy
smile.
It will be much that shall hinder me. Do you
promise?
I do,but you are far more likely to be invited
to my funeral.
Tut! I am no true prophet if you are a
bachelor
this day twelvemonth. Farewell. I would
thou hadst been my son.
Farewell. Would to heaven I had such a
father.
Our hero proceeded slowly on his journey,
passing
the first night at Schenectady, the next at Albany,
for he was in no haste to get to the end, where he
anticipated but a renewal of his disappointments,
regrets, and mortifications. He staid all day in his
room at Albany, and was congratulated on being alive,
by the few people that saw him. Some scurvy
jest, thought he, and never asked for an
explanation
.
In the evening he left Albany, and arrived at
the mansion of his deceased benefactor in the
manner we have before described.
CHAPTER XXVI.
Our Hero receives back his uncle's estate with an encumbrance.
While
the reader has been travelling backwards
like a crab, the pale and gentle Catalina had been
let into the secret of the ghost story by her mother.
At first she became paler than ever, and could
hardly support herself on her chair. Then she
turned red, and a rosy blush of hope and love abided
on her cheek, where, for many a day, it had not
abided before. I will bestow it all on him again,
thought she, and her full heart relieved itself in a
shower of silent tears.
That night a thousand floating dreams of the
past and the future flitted before her troubled mind,
and as they reigned in turn, gave birth to different
thoughts and determinations. But the prevailing
thought was, that her cousin had treated her
unjustly
and unkindly, and that it became the dignity
of her sex to maintain a defensive stateliness, a
cold civility, until he had acknowledged his errors
and begged forgiveness. She settled the matter by
deciding, that when Sybrandt came the next day to
take his leave, she would deliver him a deed for the
estate of his uncle, which her father was to have
prepared for her, insist on his acceptance, and then
bid him adieu for ever without a sigh or a tear. In
the morning she begged, that when Sybrandt came
to call on her mother, she might be permitted to see
him alone. Her request was acquiesced in, and she
waited in trembling anxiety his promised visit. He
came soon after breakfast, and Madam Vancour
was struck with the improvement a suit of military
uniform, in place of a suit of master Ten Broeck's
snuff-coloured cloth, produced. After a somewhat
painful and awkward interview, Sybrandt forced
himself to inquire after Catalina.
She has had a long illness, said the mother,
and you will scarcely know her. But she wishes
to see you.
To see
me?
cried Sybrandt, almost starting out
of his skin.
Ayyouher old playmate and cousin. Is
that so very extraordinary? replied madame,
smiling
.
She is in the next room: go to her.
Gogoto her, stammered our hero; sure,
you cannot mean
I mean just what I say, I assure you. She is
waiting to see you in the next room. I hope you
don't mean to keep her waiting much longer. And
madame again smiled.
What
can
this mean? thought Sybrandt, while
he crept towards the door with about the same
eagerness a man feels who is just about to be
hanged.
I shall tell Catalina how anxious you were to
see her.
They must think I have no feelingor they
have no feeling themselves; and the thought roused
his native energies. He strutted into the next room
as if he was leading his regiment to battle.
Don't look so fierce, or you will frighten my
daughter, said madame.
But Catalina was frightened almost out of her
wits already. She was too much taken up in ral
lying her own self-possession to observe how
Sybrandt
looked when he walked. He had indeed
been some moments in the room before either could
utter a single word. At length their eyes met, and
the excessive paleness each observed in the
countenance
of the other went straight to the hearts of
both.
Dear cousin, said Sybrandt, how ill you look.
This was what is called rather a left-handed
compliment
.
But Catalina was even with him, for she
answered in his very words:
Dear cousin, how ill
you
look.
Pride and affection were now struggling in the
bosoms of the two young people. Sybrandt found
his courage, like that of honest Bob Acres, oozing
out at the palms of his hands, in the shape of a
cold perspiration; but the pride of woman supported
Catalina, who rallied soonest, and spoke as follows,
at first in a faltering tone, but by degrees with
modest firmness:
Colonel Westbrook, said she, I wished to see
you on a subject which has occasioned me much
pain: the bequest of your uncle and mine. I
cannot
accept it. It was made when we all thought
you were no more; and she uttered this last part
of the sentence with a plaintiveness that went to his
heart. She feels for me, thought he; but then
she would not answer my letter. Catalina
proceeded
:
I should hate myself, could I think for a
moment
of robbing you of what is yourswhat I am
sure my uncle intended should be yours, until
he thought you dead. And the same plaintive
tones again went to the heart of Sybrandt. But
she would not answer my letter, thought he, again.
Sybrandt, continued she, I sent for you, with
the full approbation of my father and mother, to
make over this bequest to you, to whom it belongs.
I am of age; and here is the conveyance. I
beseech you, as you value my peace of mind, to
accept it with the same frankness it is offered.
What, rob my cousin? No, Catalina, never.
I feared it, said Catalina, with a sigh; you
do not respect me enough to accept even of justice
at my hands.
It would be meannessit would be degradation;
and since you charge me with a want of respect to
you, I must be allowed to say that I am too proud
to accept any thing, much less so great a gift as
this, from one who did not think the almost
death-bed
contrition of a man who had discovered his
error, and was anxious to atone for it, worthy of her
notice.
Whatwhat do you mean? exclaimed Cata
lina.
The letter I sent you, replied he, proudly. I
never meant to complain or remonstrate; but you
have forced me to justify myself.
What letter, in the name of Heaven?
That which I wrote you the moment I was
sufficiently
recovered of my woundsto say that I had
had a full explanation with Colonel Gilfillan; to say
that I had done you injustice; to confess my folly;
to ask forgiveness; andand to offer you every
atonement which love or honour could require.
And you wrote me such a letter? asked
Catalina
,
gasping for breath.
I didthe messenger returnedhe had seen
you gay and happy; and he returned with a verbal
message that my letter required no answer.
And is thisis this the solethe single cause
of your subsequent conduct? Answer me, Sybrandt,
as you are a man of honouris it?
It is. I cannotyou know I never could bear
contempt or scorn from man or woman.
What would you say, what would you do, if
I assured you solemnly I never saw that letter, or
dreamed it was ever written?
I would say, that I believed you as I would the
white-robed truth herself; and I would on my knees
beg your forgiveness for twice doubting you.
Then I do assure you, in the purity and
singleness
of my heart, that I never saw or knew aught
of that letter.
And diddid Gilfillan speak the truth, panted
our hero.
She turned her life-begetting eye full upon the
youth, and sighed forth in a whisper, He did, while
the crimson current revisited her pale cheek, and
made her snow-white bosom blush rosy red.
You are mine then, Catalina, at last, faltered
Sybrandt, as he released her soft and yielding form
from his arms.
You will accept my uncle's bequest then?
asked she, with one of her long-absent smiles.
Provided you add yourself, dearest girl.
You must take it with that encumbrance, said
she,and he sealed the instrument of conveyance
upon her warm, willing lips.
What can they have to talk about all this time,
I wonder? cogitated the old lady, while she fidgeted
about from her chair towards the door, and from the
door to her chair. As she could distinguish the
increasing animation of their voices she fidgeted
still more; and there is no knowing what might have
H 3
been the consequence, if Catalina and Sybrandt had
not entered the room looking so happy that the old
lady thought the very dl was in them both. The
moment Sybrandt departed, Catalina explained all
to her mother. Alas! thought the good woman;
she will never be a titled lady; yet who knows
but Sybrandt may one day go to England and be
knighted? This happy thought reconciled her at
once to the whole catastrophe, and she embraced
her daughter, sincerely wishing her joy at the
removal
of all her perplexities.
Dn it, said Ariel, if I ever saw a more
glorious wedding-supper in my life.
Do you recollect my last words when we parted,
Colonel Westbrook, said Sir William Johnson,
their most honoured guest.
I do, Sir William. You are a prophet, as well
as a warrior and legislator.
What did he say, whispered a little blushing
damsel, dressed all in white, and beautiful as the
most beautiful morning in June, who sat by the
side of our hero,What did he say?
He said, in less than a twelvemonth I should be
married to an angel.
Take care it does not turn out like dreams,
which, you know, go by contraries, said the
aforementioned
blushing damsel, whose eye looked
exactly
like love's firmament.
But the knight turned out a true prophet, even
according to the gallant turn given to his prediction
by our hero. Catalina approved herself an
excellent
wife, and a pattern of a mother; for she never
let her husband find out she was not an angel, nor
her children that she could be conquered by
importunity
.
I grieve, however, to say, that the good
Madam Vancour never had the happiness to be
mother to a real titled lady. One of Sybrandt's
cousins however, came over in process of time a
baronet, with bloody hand, and the old lady
consoled
herself, that, if not the mother, she was a near
relation to a near relation of a man whose cousin
could make his wife a lady. What was better than
all this, the cousin was an elderly man, a bachelor,
and Sybrandt was his heir-at-law.
Who knows, thought Madam Vancour,who
knows, but he may die single, and I live to see
Catalina a lady at last. People who have any
thing to expect from the death of others always
calculate to outlive them. Madam was nearly twice
the age of the man on whose demise she was
speculating
.
Sybrandt, said Sir William, I shall be obliged
to depart to-morrow before you are up. Farewell!
and happiness attend you this night, and every day,
and every night. I have but one word to add
action
,
remember, action alone can secure the
happiness
of your future life, by making you useful and
distinguished.
But where is your moral, my good friend?
quoth one of my most devoted readers, an elderly
lady, secretary, treasurer, directress, &c. &c. of
fifty societies. I can't find out your moral,wiping
her specs.
My dear madam, can't you see it through one
of the glasses of your spectacles? The moral of
my story is found in the last words; just as all the
moral of the life of a rogue is gathered from his
dying speech!
Actionpshaw! Remember, action! I wouldn't
give a fig for such a moralnot I.
Well then, my dear madam, if you don't like
that, I will give you another. The moral of my
story is a warning to all young and desperate lovers,
never to go courting in a pair of snuff-coloured
small-clothes, perpetrated by Master Goosee Ten
Broeck.
Pshaw! I'll never read another book of yours,
that I am determined.
Then, madam, you'll never be as wise as your
grandmother.
THE END.